VOL. II.2
CHAPTER I.
Punctual
to her promise, Nurse Agnes, or as she
was commonly called, Aunt Agnes, visited Granny
Gammon on the ensuing day. Agnes thought the old
crone very ill; so much so that she determined to
remain
with her. It was the first day of the fall races;
and Bobby, with the assistance of Pompey, who had
laid up the odd change which his master and others
had given him, had established a booth on the ground
for the double purpose of seeing the sport of which
he was passionately fond, notwithstanding the injury
he had received in indulging in it, and at the same
time of making a little money.
Peggy and Aunt Agnes were the watchers by the
humble bed of Granny Gammon. The light of life
in the invalid was waning fast to extinction. She
seemed like one who was sinking to sleep after a
long and toilsome day's work, but whom the excess
of labour had made restless, for she moved at
intervals
,
and would open her eyes languidly for a
moment
as she tried to change her position. The
wrinkled
face, the freckled forehead, the cheeks and chin
covered with large moles, the thin and hueless lips,
over which its muscles had no control, all betokened
bodily debility, that could not under any circumstance
hold the vital spark long, and which now was about
to yield it without nature having the strength to make
an effort to hold it.
The old woman's mind evidently wandered at
intervals
throughout the day; for at times she would
pick the bed-clothes as though she were picking
cotton
;
and when Towzer, that Bobby had left behind,
barked as the numerous carriages and other vehicles
rattled to the races, Granny Gammon would in a
querulous tone call to Bobby not to teaze the dog, or
bid the animal be still and let her go to sleep. Then,
again, she would rouse herself, ask after Bobby, speak
reprovingly of the races, and turn and talk to Agnes
upon religious topics, as if she sought ghostly
consolation
.
You must not be cast down, child; said Agnes,
in a low voice to Peggy, in one of those periods when
the patient appeared to sleep; you must not be cast
down, but it is not in the nature of things that your
grandmother could live long; and yet, she continued,
in a musing tone to herself, I thought I should go first
as I am the oldest, but all in God's appointed time.
Peggy, let this be a lesson to you, that when you grow
old you may look back without regret, and forward
with hope. (Peggy was weeping, bitterly.) Child! it
is natural that you should weep, for your grandmother
is near and dear to you, but we're all in the hands of
a merciful God. He knows what is best for us, and
what we take for evil is meant for good.
What shall I do, what shall I do; what will
Bobby do? said Peggy, sobbing aloud, if Granny
dies.
Don't laugh so, child, said the old grandmother,
making a restless movement with her hands, when
you know I'm ailing. Then opening her eyes and
casting them on Agnes, she continued after a pause,
Aunty, you're kind to come and see medo you
know I am like to die. Now ain't it strange that the
youngest should die first, ain't it a strange ordering of
Providence.
We are all in God's hands, said Agnes, reverently
looking up.
Thus passed the day. Half an hour after night
Bobby returned from the races, and stealing in quietly
to his Cousin Peggy's side, he asked how his Granny
was.
Awful bad, Bobby, said Peggy, awful; what
did you do at the races?
First rate, said Bobby; I had such a run from
fellows that spent money like watersee here (
producing
a handful of money tied up in the end of a pocket
handkerchief). Poor Granny, you know Cousin Peggy,
she was always wishing as how that we had a cow of
our own? Well, there was a first rate cow and calf
raffled for at the races, for fifty dollars. Jack Gordon
was there knocking round and spending money like
dirt, and corned at that; so he takes a chance for five
dollarshe's always good luckso he wins her.
Then he come to me and made friends, you know,
that is, he wanted tohe spent money, hard silver,
treating the fellows at my booth all day. So I could'nt
but be civil to him, inasmuch as he said as how he
was in a pet when he said them aggravating things.
Well, he stuck to it that I should take the cow and
calf; he'd let'em go, he said, at twenty, cash. There'd
been a fellow treating round at my booth, an' I had
changed a twenty for him; there, said Jack Gordon,
give me that note and take the cow and calf. Well,
you know, Cousin Peggy, if I don't like Jack Gordon,
a bargain's a bargain, an' I'd just as lieve get one out
of him as any body. Now Granny 'll have a cow,
won't she?
The bed of the invalid was in the corner of the
only room that the cabin contained; a rough pair of
stairs led to a loft where Bobby slept; and it was in
the corner, by the stairs, that he held this
conversation
in a whisper with his cousin. His granny was
in a lethargy, from which his entrance had not roused
her. Agnes sat beside her, watching, anxiously, her
countenance.
At this moment, without the inmates of the cabin
having heard the least sound of approaching
footsteps
or voices, the door was thrown suddenly open,
and a constable and several other persons roughly
entered.
The constable glanced round the room, and on
beholding Bobby, who was in the act of exhibiting
his money to Peggy, he walked up to him, and
seizing him by the shoulder, said:
Come, young man, give me up that money: I'm
sorry for you, but you're caught at last.
In God's name, what's the matter? asked Agnes,
have you no respect for the aged and the dying, to
break in the house in this way.
Here Gordon entered the cabin, and said, in a tone,
of which he could not stifle the malignity:
He'll not deny it: where is it? The constable
handed Gordon a bank bill; there, said Gordon,
did you not give me that note for my cowlook at
that other money, damn me, if it ain't the same kind.
Peggy, how do you do? Didn't you give me that
note, Cousin Bobby?
The constable, rough as he appeared, was struck
with compassion on beholding the aged and sick
grandmother, as she opened her eyes, and gazed on
them in bewilderment, and the unutterable
astonishment
and anguish depicted in Peggy's features; he
therefore said to Bobby:
See, Bob Gammon, I just say to you, that you
2*
needn't say anything to criminate yourself unless you
choose.
Criminate myself! said Bobby, in seeming
amazement, I don't understand: let me look at it
yes, I did give Jack Gordon that bill for his cow;
at any rate a bill a good deal like, for it had just such
a cross on the corner.
Who did you get it from? asked the constable.
That's what I don't exactly know, said Bobby.
I never saw the man before, to my knowledge, but
I could tell him if I was to see him again.
Well, exclaimed Gordon, you passed that note
on me, didn't you?
Yes, said Bobby, I think that is the note.
Gentlemen, you hear that, said Gordon. Mark!
he don't deny it. My little lark, you're a bright one.
That note I went to pass at the tavern, and they had
a warrant out on me for passing counterfeit money.
I just want to saddle the right horse, that's all. Look
if that money ain't like this, said Gordon to the
constable
,
who had taken from the boy the money he
had been showing to his cousin when they entered.
Yes, said the constable, these notes are on the
same bank. I'm sorry for you, young man, but you
must go with me.
Where, where? asked Peggy, taking, imploringly,
the hand of the officer.
Before Squire Norris, Miss PeggyI must do
my dutyI'm 'fraid it's all up with him.
All up with who? said Granny Gammon, rousing
herself, and speaking in a tone that was strangely sharp
and hollow by turns. No, I'm ailing; but I'm younger
than Aunty Agnes. So I thought I'd set up with the
old womanit's going hard with her. John Gordon,
what do ye want, she exclaimed, now first recognising
Gordon; did'nt I forbid you coming here?
Granny, I had to come here, or else go to jail.
Some people wanted to cry mad dog at me, as Peggy
knows. That hurt my character with a good many.
I'm for saddling the right horse. Where did Bobby
get all this counterfeit money from?
The old Granny uttered a shrill scream, and raising
herself up in bed, gazed at Gordon with a look from
which all mental wandering had fled.
It's you, is it, John Gordon; and you accuse my
Bobby of this. You lay it at his door, and my door,
and I a dying woman, and his grandmother. You
know, John Gordon, in your heartI see it in your
faceyou know he is as innocent as the babe
unborn
.
No, you've beset him, and you've beset my
Peggyand you've come in my dying hourand all
in hate. You'll think of this when your time comes,
John Gordonan' it will not come to you in your
bed. I'm dying, an' I tell ye soit will not come to
you in your bed. Go out of my house, an' let me die
in peace, if ye don't I'll curse you with my dying
breath at my own door-stone. Bobby is innocent
as a lamb, he continued, addressing the constable,
but in a faltering tone, and gasping for breath; he's
as innocent as a lamb, she muttered again, and sunk
back upon her pillow a corpse. The excitement and
exertion had exhausted the little remnant of life.
Bobby broke away from the officer, who had in
fact released his grasp at the horror of the scene, and,
with his Cousin Peggy, threw himself by the lifeless
body of his grandmother. He spoke not a word,
while Peggy's screams rent the air.
Gordon looked on conscience-smitten, and appalled,
but on Aunt Agnes saying to him:
That if Bobby was innocent he had an awful sin
to answer for, he rallied and replied:
Did he deny passing the money on me? As for
the old woman, how did I know she was sick; damn
herher time was come, any how!
Come, said the constable, going up to Bobby,
and raising him from the bed; this is hard, but I
must do my duty.
For God's sake, exclaimed Peggy, have a little
pity on us!on me, must I be all alone? You heard
what Granny said, they were her dying words! indeed
he is innocent.
Cousin Peggy, said Bobby, in a tone strangely
calm and decided for one of his years and character
under the circumstancesI'll go; Aunt Agnes will
stay with you. As sure as Granny is dead, there, I'm
innocent,she spoke the truth. You stay by poor
Granny,I'll go. He walked up to his cousin,
embraced
her with a long and passionate embrace,
while she sobbed as though her heart was bursting.
He then stepped up to the corpse, took it's hand in
his, gazed upon the relaxed features intensely, as if
to satisfy himself that the spirit had departed; and
pressing his lips to its forehead, said, calmly, I'm
ready, and walked firmly out, followed by all of the
party, save Gordon, who lingered a minute, when
Aunt Agnes told him he had better go.
Peggy, let me speak to you; just one moment,
said he.
Peggy, come here, I tell you, he said, again, in a
commanding tone, and stamping with his foot upon
the floor.
You're enough to make the dead body rise and
drive you out, said Aunt Agnes in deep indignation;
begone, or I'll call the constable and bid him take
you.
Doggedly Gordon left the cabin, and Agnes rose
and fastened the door after him. The persons
who had left with Bobby in custody, stood within a
few steps of the cabin, seemingly waiting for him.
As the door closed on him, he called out, and asked
with an oath, If they were not agoing to search
the house.
Not now, Gordon, said the constable; here's
enough of proofoutside here between the logs,
this chap found a tin box full of it.
Go ahead, then, said Gordon, to the squire's.
The whole party accordingly proceeded to the village,
to the residence of Squire Norris.
CHAPTER II.
Latterly
, the whole country had been flooded with
counterfeit money. Justice had been on the alert to
discover the offenders, but, as yet, unless it was
fastened
upon Bobby, without avail. Suspicion had
been hovering round different persons, but had not
been steadily fixed upon any one. It attached to
Gordon as strongly as to any other; but nothing like
proof of the fact had transpired against him. If he
were guilty he therefore had a double motive for fixing
the charge on Bobby; viz., to clear his own skirts,
and to revenge himself upon the Gammons.
At the tavern in Springdale Gordon had, with
much ostentation, displayed the bank note which he
had received from Bobby in payment for the cow,
exclaiming, It was a beauty.
The tavern-keeper on inspection pronounced it a
counterfeit; and Gordon stoutly maintained it was
not. High words grew between them, till at last he
told Gordon that it was his belief that he knew it
was a counterfeit; and that he believed it was not the
first time he had it knowingly in his possession. At
this Gordon knocked the tavern-keeper down. The
publican was an arrant coward, and there fore he made
no attempts at retaliation, but gathered himself up,
and forthwith repaired to the magistrate, who issued
a warrant against Gordon, both on the charge of
passing counterfeit money, and for the assault and
battery.
Gordon plead guilty to the assault and battery, and
paid the fine. On the charge of passing counterfeit
money, he boldly asserted his innocence. There was
no proof against him, and he was discharged, when
he obtained a warrant against Bobby, stating that he
had received the note from him in payment for the
cow, and that he believed the boy had quantities of it.
Our readers know the result, so far. On arriving at
the magistrate's office they found the squire seated
at his desk, and eager for the examination. Gordon
was sworn. He repeated the charge which he had
made against Bobby at the boy's grandmothers',
though more circumstantially, being under oath.
When he got through, Bobby said he didn't deny it,
that he gave Gordon the note in payment for the cow,
and that he received it from a man whom he did not
know by name, but whom he would recognise should he
ever meet him. He was, however, completely stricken
dumb; when another witness, whose testimony was
corroborated by the constable, produced a tin box filled
with counterfeit paper on the same bank with the note
passed on Gordon, and made oath that he found it
without the door of Granny Gammon's cabin, between
the logs. The constable also testified that he had seen
that very box, which he knew by a mark on the lid,
in Bobby's possession at the races.
Robert Gammon, have you anything to say?
asked the magistrate.
Bobby shook his head, but spoke not.
You had better make a clean heart, Robert
Gammon
,
and tell all about your accomplices.
Bobby made no answer.
What have you to say about the box? asked the
magistrate, solicitous of obtaining some clue for the
detection of others.
It's true, said Bobby; I had that very box at
the races to-day. Jack Gordon asked me to let him
look at it, and I took my money out of it, and give it
to him.
Didn't I give it back to you? asked Gordon.
You did, replied Bobby.
Why didn't you say so, then, my larkyou don't
want to fix counterfeiting on me, do you?
Without noticing the remark of Gordon, Bobby
said to the magistrate:
The box was give to me by Jack Gordon in the
city, at the circus, when I got into that other
counterfeiting
scrape. I had it ever since till to day; he
told me it was a good thing to keep money in, an' I
kept mine in it. As I said he gave it back to me,
and, somehow, a little time afterwards, I lost it on the
race-ground, or it was stolen from me.
You'd better make a clean heart, repeated the
magistrate.
I've no more to say, replied Bobby.
I must commit you, said Norris; the county
court's now sitting, so you'll have a quick trial. The
witnesses must give security for their appearance.
A few minutes afterwards, without saying a word,
Bobby entered the jail in the custody of the constable,
followed by Gordon, who told the officer in a whisper
that he thought he could get something out of the boy
about the gang of counterfeiters, if he would let him
hold a little private discourse with him. The jailer
willingly consented, and Bobby and Gordon were shown
into a kind of anti-room, and left together.
Bobby, said Gordon, in a sympathising tone,
advancing to the boy's side; if you'll be my friend,
I'll be yours. I can get you out of this scrape, yet.
How? said Bobby, throwing his eye on him for
a moment, and then letting it fall on the ground.
Bobby, we must understand each other every
pace and more in the matter. I appeared hard on
you like at your Granny's, and afore Norris, that I
might blind them, and do for you to a greater certainty.
When I was taken up you couldn't blame me for telling
where I got the money, could younow say, could
you?
Go no, said Bobby; say what you have to say.
But mind, resumed Gordon; we must
understand
each other, and as he spoke he sunk his voice
to a whisper, we must mind how we talk here, these
damn dull walls have quick ears, I can tell you. Are
you agreed?
Say what you want to say, at once, Jack Gordon;
what are you afraid of?
Well! you know, Bobby, I want to serve you; the
day you got in to thatother fuss I rode all the way
out here to tell your folks, and get Mr. Sidney to
stand your friend; you know that. I was determined
to stand by you. I rode in town that very night, and
went to the squire's where they had you locked up, on
purpose to tell you what I'd done; but you had put.
This shows you how I felt to you.
Gordon paused for a moment, and snuffed with
his fingers the slim tallow-candle which the jailer had
left on an old oaken table near which the boy stood.
Bobby said nothing, and Gordon resumed. I am a
friend of yours, I am by . But one good turn
deserves another; you see I can quit the village and
not appear; then, what the devil will be the proof
against youdon't you mark it? This counterfeiting
business is penitentiary for ten years. Ten years! I'd
die first; ten yearslittle more to eat than bread and
waterworked to death; shut up between four walls;
no races; no pleasure of any kind; not allowed to see
your nearest and dearest relatives. I'm your friend,
VOL. II.3
Bob Gammon, and I'd save youI would on my soul;
but you must help me if I help you.
How can I help yousay it out! exclaimed
Bobby.
Well, you see, I'm your friendand your Cousin
Peggy, I am her friend. She's alone, now your
granny's dead; she 'll have nobody to take care of
herif you go to the penitentiary she will no doubt feel
herself disgraced and quit the countryturn out, God
knows what; and perhaps you'll never see her again.
You see I tell you truth, plain truth; may I be blasted
if I don't deal with you like brother with brother.
Peggy once as much as promised to marry me, but
those lying tales that's told round, put the devil in her
against meshe don't think that I may be accused
of things and be innocent as you areyou're into a
worse fix than ever I was, and I should be sorry if she
should believe ill against you. To come to the point, this
is the thingyou send for her to-morrow and tell her
what I have saidpoint to her what a lonely
condition
she is in, and that nobody can save you but me.
Paint it all to her and tellyou can persuade her
to marry me.
Jack Gordon, said Bobby, firmly, I'd see my
Cousin Peggy dead, stone dead beside my old granny,
and rot in the penitentiary, before I'd do
that
.
You would, hey? inquired Gordon through his
clenched teeth.
I would, rejoined Bobby, turning away from
him.
Then you shall rot there, muttered Gordon, as he
passed out of the room, and closed the door after him.
I can't get much out of him, said Gordon to the
jailor, as that worthy proceeded to let him out of the
prison. He's a rum onehe'll die with his shoes on.
As the door closed on Gordon, he stepped out in
front of the jail from which the crowd had dispersed,
and eyed the building, as if he would scrutinize its
power of detaining the unfortunate lad. Then, with
a lowering brow, he turned away, and walked quickly
through the village.
CHAPTER III.
After
Aunt Agnes shut the door on Gordon, she
went to the bed and composed decently the body of
the deceased.
Child, said Agnes, your grandmother could
hardly have lived over night, but the sight of that man,
Gordon, on such a message, was too much for her. But
be not cast down. Come to me, child; and kneel by the
bed-side, and let us pray for strength to endure the ills of
life and resignation to our fate, whatever it may be, for
we are in the hands of a just and merciful God.
So speaking, the old woman knelt down with Peggy
by her side, and prayed fervently and long, and
particularly
for the orphans, who were now left to their
own guidance on the cold charity of the world.
After praying, she arose from her knees, and said to
Peggy
Now, child, do you go up stairs and lie down on
your cousin's bedI'll watch by your grandmother,
and in the morning you can go to the village and
have everything arranged as it ought to be.
Mercy! said Peggy, as she observed the candle
flickering in the socket; that's all the light there is
in the house.
No matter, child; God's eye is on us in darkness
as well as in light. Come, compose yourself; go to
rest, child.
Not for the world I would'nt go to bed, said
Peggy; no, I must muster courage, and go up to
Holly, and tell the folks about poor Bobby's
misfortune
and granny's deathalone, we're all alone now,
and I must do what I can by Bobby.
That is a proper sentiment, Peggy; so go, child.
You think the wind sounds mournfully, but it's all in
your own feelings: the stars are bright, continued
the old woman, rising, and looking out of the door,
and though the clouds away off to the west seem to
threaten a change, it won't be before midnight; so
mayhap you'd better go up to Mr. Fitzhurst's, and
tell them what has happened, and bring some of the
servants with you to help me. Don't forget the
candles, child.
After hesitating for a moment, by a strong mental
effort Peggy gathered her cloak around her, and
started on her melancholy errand. She glanced
fear-fully
over the common as she closed the door, and
made a wide circuit, to avoid passing near the clump
of trees that stood about twenty yards from the house,
in the direction of Holly. After she had got some
ten or more steps beyond the trees, she heard
footsteps
,
distinctly, behind her. She stopped for a
moment
,
irresolute whether she should fly back to the
cabin, or exert her utmost speed towards Holly.
Why should I be frightened? she said to herself;
if it is Gordon he dare not harm me; and why
should it be him? As she thus reflected, she
summoned
resolution to look behind, and distinctly saw
the figure of a man approaching her. She
determined
to move forward, as if she had no suspicions;
but the next moment, as the foot-fall became more
distinct, she started on with the speed and fear of a
frightened deer. As she ran, it was evident that the
person behind was following her, for he sprang after
her at his utmost speed. Uttering a scream, that
3*
startled the silence of the night in fascinated terror,
Peggy turned her head, to satisfy herself who her
pursuer was, and as she did so, she ran with her
whole force against a tree that stood directly in her
path. It was a minute before she knew where she
was, such was the stenning effects produced. When
she recovered, she found Gordon standing by her
side.
Why should you run away from me, Peggy?
said Gordon, in an insinuating tone.
Mr. Gordon, are you agoing to haunt me forever,
like an evil spirit?
Forever, Peggy, till I gain your love.
Peggy made no answer, but attempted to move
away.
Stop; you must hear me, Peggy, said Gordon,
sternly detaining her. The word, mind you, is
must
now. If I am your enemy, mark it, you
compel
me; but until you do, in spite of everything, I'm
your friend.
Friend! John Gordon, leave me. I've told you
again and again I've done with you. Friend! and
my poor dead granny's words ringing in my ears.
John Gordon, God's curse is on you. I don't scorn
or hate you any moreI pity you from the bottom
of my heart. Bobby and I are orphans now, alone,
all alone; but our cause is in His hands who protects
the fatherless. I don't need your friendshipI don't
care for your enmity. Go your ways, and may God
forgive you.
When Peggy first started from the cabin, the
presentiment
that she should meet Gordon unnerved her;
but when she recovered from the effects of running
against the tree, and found Gordon by her side, in an
instant the solemn scene she had witnessed, and the
earnest prayer for herself that Agnes had offered
up by the body of her grandmother, arose to her
mind, and gave it a tone and character, such as she
had never displayed before. This new impulse
evidently
had an effect on Gordon; for she moved on,
and, without attempting to withhold her, he walked
beside her. His passions, however, soon resumed
their sway.
Peggy, said Gordon; and he stepped before, and
facing, prevented her advancing; I was not born in
the woods to be scared by an owl. My mind's made
up. I come to you from your Cousin Bobby.
From Bobby! where is he? exclaimed Peggy,
in an anxious tone, no longer trying to pass on.
In jail, Peggy; ironed down.
Merciful Father!
Yes; I've just left him there, ironed down in an
infernal dark dungeon, where there are rats and
vermin
enough to make short work of him. I tried to
talk the jailor into putting him into a better room,
but it wouldn't do; they think Bobby's too hard a
case.
My God! John Gordon, this is your fault.
My fault! your fault, Peggy; you drove me to
desperation. I would have gone myself to jail before
a hair of Bobby's head should have been touched if
it hadn't been for you. He did'nt deny passing the
money on me. I would have screened him if I could.
But what reason had I for doing it: think how he
treated me, how you treated me, see how your
grandmother
was turned against me, as if I had been the
cause of Bobby's fall at the races, of his keeping a
booth thereit's that old negro Pompey's faultor of
that counterfeiting business in town. No; I would
have saved himI can save him.
How, how? I'll bless you forever if you will.
Suppose I quit the country, and don't appear
against him, what proof have they?
Will you, will you! exclaimed Peggy; he's no
counterfeiter, I know he's not; but somehow things
are so against him. Oh! will you leave the country,
Mr. Gordon?
If you go with me, Peggy.
Peggy's head drooped upon her breast, and her
hands fell to her sides as if she had been struck a
violent blow.
Hear me, Peggy; I came from Bobby himself.
He got on his knees to me in his dungeon, and begged
me, in a voice that would move the stones, to save
him. You saw how he was overcome when he left
the cabin in custody; he could'nt say one word. He'll
go distracted. I am afraid. I told him there was no
way of saving him, but by my flying the country; and
that I wouldn't do, unless you went with me. I have
money enough, Peggy, to go to the farthest end of
the earth; you shall want for nothing; I'll be kind to
you, I will; you think me rough, but I'll reform; I'll
be all you wish me, and we'll send for your Cousin
Bobby, and he shall come and live with us. He
never can lift up his head here again if he comes
out, so he must come to ushe will come to us. Say,
Peggy; say you'll go with me; come, now, to the
village; I have a horse and gig there now; in an hour
we'll be in the city. We'll be married there, and
Bobby will be safe. I've money enough; you heard
Bobby say what I bought at his booth I paid for in
silver. No, I touch no notes now-a-days, when to touch
'em is to loose one's character. Come, go with me,
and Bobby will be safe; if he's ruined, sent to the
penitentiary, or dies in jail, it will be all your fault.
Gordon felt plainly that his words had produced a
strong impression on Peggy. She muttered to
herself
,
unconscious of his presence, Cheerfully I would
lay down my life to save him.
Lay down your life. There is no laying down
your life about it, come, and he took her hand to
lead her towards the village.
John Gordon, said Peggy, folding her arms, and
standing firmly, not now; I will not go with you now
to village or to city. My grandmother lies dead, and
Aunt Agnes is alone with her; she must be decently
buriedI must be thereI
will
be there. But if
you can save Bobby, if you have had nothing to do
with harming him, and if you will save himII will
marry you.
I to do with harming him! what puts that into
your head. 'Aint I here to save him. Why not
marry me now? come to the village then, and go
before the squire, and I'll swear to you I'll save
him.
Now! not now, said Peggy, with immoveable
firmness; not now, unless you could put breath in my
poor Granny as well as save Bobby; she must be
decently buried, and I must be there. Oh! Mr.
Gordon, if you say you mean to be kind to
me, in mercy leave me now, and let me do my
errand. Aunt Agnes wonders now what keeps me,
and there's poor Granny lying dead, and I'm talking
about marrying! But I will (and she spoke this
rather to herself than to Gordon) save Bobby, come
what will of it.
Give me your hand, then, said Gordon with an
eager exultation, which he could not conceal, and
swear to me that you will marry me.
I've said it, John Gordon; and upon those
conditions
I'll keep my word; now leave me.
Gordon attempted to kiss her; but Peggy pushed
him aside, and hastened on her way. Gordon stood
as if he wished to follow Peggy, but feared the effect
upon his plans.
I've got her, he said; I've got the true hold on
her at last. I mean to be kind to her too; be sure I
shall be kind to her; there's not a devil in hell shall
have a happier time of it. She loves that Cousin
Bobby, and therefore I hate him. No! he'll be
coming some of his Joe Hitt pranks over me if I save
him. I'll save him safe in the penitentiary. If I had
got the hussey to the cityshe was near consenting.
Ha! I must be after her; what a fool I am; she will
see her cousin in the morning, and I will be blown.
As Gordon thus thought, he advanced upon Peggy's
path. No, it's too late, he resumed; she's off.
Well, I must use fair words. Early in the morning
I'll contrive to see her, and take some message from
Cousin Bobby; that will keep her until I fix the
matter
.
Ha, ha! to get her consent within the sight of
the cabin, and that old dead hag's curse ringing in
my ears!
With this righteous reflection Gordon turned once
more towards Springdale; taking care, however, from
the influence of a superstitious dread, which he could
not overcome, to make a wide path to avoid passing
near the cabin where the dead body of Granny
Gammon
lay.
CHAPTER IV.
The
morning after the interview in the library
with Fanny which had been interrupted by the
entrance
of Bradley, in a wayward mood Pinckney
arose early before the rest of the company, and
proceeded
to town. He rode slowly into the city,
pausing
on a neighbouring hill that descended to it to
moralize
,
with a touch of sadness, upon the busy haunts
of men.
Arrived at Langdale's he entered the parlour, and
was somewhat surprised to see, at the far end, a
magnificently
dressed lady in possession of the room. She
turned as he advanced. When he beheld her
features
he started back without the power of uttering
a word, so great seemed his amazement. The lady
was the first to speak. She arose, and with apparent
tremulous delight, exclaimed, advancing, with both
hands extended:
O! Howard, I am delighted to see you. Pinckney
drew himself up, but in an instant changed his
manner
,
though he said, in a cold tone, and with a profound
bow, as he took her hand:
Miss Clara Atherton, this is an unexpected
pleasure
.
Howard, I hope it is none the less, she replied,
with a most insinuating smile, for being unexpected.
None the less, replied Pinckney, forcing himself
to have manner; but when and where came you
and how came I to find you here?
Perhaps I have followed a recreant knight.
I hope he is not irreclaimable, said Pinckney.
He is a recreant, indeed, if he be; unworthy to
wear fair lady's favour again. But in me, Howard,
you behold the truth of your favourite's saying:
`Truth is strange, stranger than fiction.'
I came with my uncle to this city, meaning to
travel through the United States, and last night on our
arrival we chanced to be introduced to Mr. Langdale
it was mere chance, and in their conversation they
discovered that they were forty-second cousins, or
some such a kinand here we are partaking of Mr.
Langdale's hospitality. I rejoice, indeed, that we
have met him. He has just gone out; we have been
talking about you. I told him that I had met you on
the continent.
What else did you tell him? asked Pinckney,
quickly, and in confusion.
Nothing else, Howard. I found my name had
not been mentioned to him, though, to say truth, I
supposed I had been alluded to in conversations which
I gathered had passed between you.
Pinckney thought (it certainly did not so appear)
that Miss Atherton's tone and manner implied her
belief
in her sex's power, and particularly of her own
in the premises.
Yes, said Pinckney, I spoke to him of the past
as the historian would of the days long gone; I was
a cold commentator on what can return no more.
This remark seemed fraught with the frankness of
truth. And yet it was a bold speech for a man to
make to a womanand such a womanwhom he
VOL. II.4
had once loved. Her beauty was overpowering,it
struck you like a glorious thought that all at once
flashes convictions on you of the truth of what you
had deemed wildest romance. There was a pervading
spirit of grace and beauty, in face and form, in every
tone, look, attitude, and movement, that won you by
its particular spell. The combination had, indeed,
made a splendid woman. There was a languor and
softness in her manner that made you think, at first,
that there was a want of spirit in her character; but
it was like the rosy cloud, that darkens as the
tempest
gathers, and which, when the elementary strife is
fiercest, sends forth the hottest bolt. Her hair was
of a wavy blackness, and her brow as fair and
polished as the sculptured forms of the clime she had
left. The full dark eye beneath it would account for
the mighty ills that have been done by woman.
While it kindled and melted, the mouth seemed in
voluptuous repose, as if it left to the brighter feature
the expression of intellectual power, and reserved
itself for the emotions of a heart all tenderness; but
the moment that she spoke her lips assumed a higher
cast, and the delicate tracery of their muscles
appeared
adapted to the thought by a power beyond
the histrionic art, the unbidden power of nature. She
appeared all sensibility, all softness, and full of
womanly trust, when winning an influence in your
heart; and even when she had won it, and was
exerting
it, unless powerfully wrought upon, she seldom
betrayed any other feelings. If artful, her's was a
fearful artfulness; it was as though the dove had
retained
all its apparent innocence, and obtained the
serpent's power to fascinate and destroy.
Howard, what mean you? she asked, in a tone
of silvery softness.
Nothingif you meant nothing.
I mean! explain yourself, Howard! How your
manner has changed.
And how you have changed! or rather, I am
gifted with vision, but I have been blind; but
enough; let these changes be as though
now
had
ever been. What kind of a voyage had you,
Miss
Atherton?
I thought, when I addressed you by that
name, that you would have corrected me, and
instructed
me to use another, and a more matronly
one.
No, Howard, I am not changed in either name
or nature; and I believe you are aware of what my
matronly name was to have been.
What
one
of your matronly names was to have
been, said Pinckney, and whatever of disagreeable
feeling had heretofore possessed him appeared to pass
away, for a smile of humour, tinged with a little of
the consciousness that he deserved to be laughed at,
passed over his face.
A slight gathering of herself up, as if she were
collecting her feelings, would have betrayed to the
observer that the lady was not agreeably impressed
by the last remark, and the smile that accompanied
it, she said:
What a wayward creature you are, Howard.
The greater sacrifices that are made to you, the
more you require them. Let us understand each
other, Howard. I have made a long voyage for the
purpose. Your manner was so freezingly cold that I
have scarcely yet recovered myself.
Ah! is that it, said Pinckney; so you are all
unaltered. Well, I confess to some changes. I have
recovered myself. But as you have made so long a
voyage, do tell me what has happened since I left you
the affianced bride of The Honourable Mr. Ashley?
As you thought, Howardas your moody fits
made you think, which misinterpreted everything
between us. No, Mr. Ashley was an accomplished
gentleman, long descended, and nobly, and
What has become of him? interrupted Pinckney,
if you please, Miss Atherton.
He is dead, she replied.
Dead! of what disease?
He died in a duel with an American gentleman.
They quarrelled concerning the ownership of a
picture
,
which each, in dealing with a crafty Italian,
considered he had bought.
No matter, Miss Atherton, said Pinckney again,
speaking in an unexcited tone; I confess myself
unsolicitous of knowing anything more of your
private
affairs, since I know that death prevented your
being Mrs. Ashley. How long will you remain in
town? he continued, rising as he spoke, for they had
both taken seats during their conversation. I shall
certainly see you again, I hope?
We part not thus, Howard, said Miss Atherton,
rising; these moody humours that you fall into will
destroy, some of these days, your brightest prospects
your dearest hopes. Hear me: I have made frank
confessions to you; confessions which I told you, at
the time that you extorted them, would sink me in
your esteem; though they were such as should have
elevated me. This must not be between us. We
were both too high-tempered when I last saw you.
We forget the position in which we stood to each
other. I know my conduct requires explanation, and
I wish to make it. Why, Howard, there is no
romance
about it; such things between attached
persons
happen frequently. It is the course of the true
love, the wayward currents of which the poet has
described. We were affianced. Well, I own, Howard,
that with something of a woman's fondness for her
own will and ways, that sometimes, when you came
to see me, I denied myself. Mr. Ashley might have
been with me, or he might notit did not depend
upon his presence or absence. Report at last changed
its rumoursyou know what an idle thing it isand
ceased giving me to you to make me Mrs. Ashley.
You returned to Venice after an absence of a few
weeks, you remember, and found this rumour rife.
Well, upon the instant, without the reflection of an
instant, you dashed into my apartments, and
demanded
an immediate explanation. Howard, I have
never been celebrated for any spirit, that I know of,
except a spirit of endurance; but feeling as I did
towards youhaving given such unrestrained
confidence
my
pride, my woman's dignity, arose. I
repelled
,
I own, in high-wrought anger, your reproaches.
I returned scorn for scorn. I bid you go; but how
could you mind an excited woman under such
circumstances
?
Excuse me, but all this is truth, Miss Atherton.
You assure me there was no breaking of promises,
vows plighted and sworn to me, for the long descended,
little expecting, the eminently wealthy, the all
accomplished
the
Honourable Mr. Ashley.
No, Howard, there was not; be seated, she
resumed
,
as Pinckney stepped to the window. How
unreasonable you are! do you not believe me?
Miss Atherton, said Pinckney, turning round to
her from the window through which he had been
gazing in stern abstraction, I will take an early
opportunity
of again seeing you. We shall meet at
dinner
,
perhaps. Matters of great interest to me
require
my absence now.
Well, Howard, she said, offering her hand to
him as she spoke; we shall meet at dinner, then.
I have said nothing to Mr. Longdale about our
acquaintance
,
only that we were casually acquainted.
Say nothing to him yourself on the subject at present.
You're in a moody, Byronic way, againplague take
4*
my lord of poets, for the fancies he has engendered
in young gentlemen's brains, she continued playfully;
but we'll meet soon again: now do not make it long,
Howard; it must be long, though. And they shook
hands and parted.
On leaving Longdale's, Pinckney instantly mounted
his horse, and took the road to Holly.
So beautiful and so false, said he, as his horse
bore him through the city; she knows not what I
know. Ashley told me himself of their engagement,
showed me the letters that had passed between them; her
letters, stereotypes of her's to me. It won't do; the chain
is broken; Ashley is no more, and now she would
return
to me. What a woman; and what a difference
between such and Fanny Fitzhurst. No, my hopes
are fixed there now, with a wonder they could ever
have been fixed elsewhere. Strange that I should have
felt but scorn in Miss Atherton's presence, for one so
fair, and but pity when I left her! How utterly false
I have found herlet the past go to the winds! I
shall meet Mr. Bradley at Holly as close to Fanny's
side as though his claims were undoubted. Well, she
must decide my fate the first opportunity.
Turning such reflections over and over in his mind,
as Pinckney left the precincts of the city, he put spurs
to his horse, and soon arrived in the vicinity of Holly,
where he beheld Bradley emerging from the woods
with his gun in his hand. As Pinckney passed him,
they bowed with studied courtesy to each other, and
Pinckney hastened on, hoping to find a fit opportunity
of seeing Fanny alone. It was presented to him; for
on entering the hall he met her, and in an anxious
tone, said:
Miss Fitzhurst, do allow me one wordwill you
not take my arm, and let us pass into the library?
Fanny, without answering, timidly took his arm,
and they entered. An hour after Pinckney repaired
to his room with a radiant brow. As he crossed the
hall, he encountered Bradley, who had just returned.
I hope you had luck in hunting, Mr. Bradley?
said he, in a joyous tone.
Only tolerable, replied Bradley, throwing a
suspicious
side glance on the inquirer; did Miss
Fitzhurst
go to Mr. Elwood's?
I believe not, sir; my impression is that she has
deferred her visit until to-morrow.
So speaking, Pinckney bowed, and retired to his
chamber.
CHAPTER V.
On
the morrow the splendid equipage of Mr.
Langdale drove up to Holly. He paid his respects
to its inmates with the easy and graceful courtesy
which marked all his actions.
Miss Fanny Fitzhurst, said he, I have come to
beg a favour of you?
'Tis granted: what is it, Mr. Langdale?
Ah, you tempt me to make a request, which I
know would make you break your word. Remember,
I'm a bachelor; you smile, not so old, either. I have
a newly-discovered relative, who has just arrived in
this country from England; may I ask that you will
do me the honour of calling on her.
With great pleasure, sir; I will make a visit to
town to-morrow for the very purpose. What is
the name of your relative? Is she married or
single?
You are extremely kind, Miss Fitzhurst; Atherton
is her name; she is a splendid woman, is she not,
Pinckney?
She is, indeed, sir, replied Pinckney.
Yet I hesitated to ask you the question, rejoined
Langdale; for when you visited me yesterday, you
found her all alone, and staid but a few minutes, and
wentwhere? I pray you.
Directly thither, replied Pinckney, bowing to
Fanny, who blushed while a rosy tint flushed her
very forehead.
I expected as much, Miss Fitzhurst, said
Langdale
,
addressing the lady; this young friend of mine,
during a fever, the result of his wounds, talked wildly
in his sleep, and as I was watching by him I became
unconsciously the depository of certain of his
secrets.
Fanny blushed again, and after a moment's pause,
asked:
What connection is Miss Atherton of yours,
Mr. Langdale?
Something like a second or third cousin. We
have not yet traced the connection exactly; her
uncle is a gentleman of the old school, and devotedly
attached to her. You did not meet him, I believe,
Howard?
No, sir; he was, my impression is, absent in
England when I met Miss Atherton on the continent.
He is an American, and a southerner. I know their
connections south.
Well, said Langdale, with enthusiasm, she
is almost that rare birda perfect beauty. What a
full, flashing eye she haswhat a graceful form;
and mindhas she not mind, Howard?is she not
bewitching?
Yes; she is, indeed, said Pinckney, with a
peculiar
smile. Take care, Langdale.
I must, if I hope to keep my bachelor vow.
Why should you keep it? said Fanny, gaily.
It is a matter of town-wonder that you do not
marry, and here is a beautiful bird flown into your
very cage.
True, true; my time has come. What say you,
Howard, to my choice?
A most excellent one, Mr. Langdale, to get a
wife. Would she suit you?
Would she not? how old is she?
We must not speculate upon a lady's age,
Langdale
,
rejoined Pinckney.
Langdale staid to dinner; he was every now and
then, whatever was the topic of conversation, quoting
Miss Atherton, or alluding to her beauty, and the
prize he had found in her relationship. Pinckney
could not but smile while he watched him. He
listened
to his remarks with even more than his usual
interest.
The evening found Langdale in high spirits by the
side of Miss Atherton.
You have been absent long, said the lady,
throwing the lustre of her dark eye on him as he took
a seat beside her.
I have been to the country residence of Mr.
Fitzhurst, where my friend Pinckney has been
spending
some time. Miss Fitzhurst will call to see you
to-morrow. Pinckney used to tell me of an Italian
lady who had stolen his heart, and I suspect made
off with it without any return. I replied he was not
incurable, and I find I have been a prophet.
How so? do tell me?
Miss Fitzhurst has caught him completely; and,
if I have any sagcity, he has caught her. They'll
make a noble pair; saving your fair presence, coz,
I know no one, personally, or mentally, her
superior
.
Ay, is she so beautiful?
Yes, indeed, she is; I rallied Pinckney for
leaving
town so quickly yesterday, and with a profound
bow to the lady, he confessed the cause.
Indeed!
Yes, indeed! how you echo me. Don't you
think him a man to please a woman.
Perhaps to please a
very
young one, but he seems,
does he not? as Master Stephen has it in Every Man in
his Humour, to be given up to most gentlemanly
melancholy
.
He has strong energies, and they, are inactive
that's all. He would be much happier if he were
without fortune, and was struggling in the up-hill for
fame and wealth. Yes, he sometimes gets a fit of
this gentlemanly melancholy; but I don't believe the
Italian lady had much to do with it. He describes
her as a splendid woman, and no doubt she was; but
utterly worldly (according to my notions), and one
who would have made him happy for a month, and
miserable for the rest of his life. She, I suspect, was
older than himself. No! such a lady as Miss Fitzhurst
is the one for him. It was amusing to observe how
all regret of this fair Italian faded away from his
mind, turned to pitying contempt almost, as his
intimacy
with Miss Fitzhurst increased. In fact, I
suspect that the Italian had rather piqued his vanity
than wounded his heart; and from his personal
appearance
,
address, and fortune, I take it, his vanity
has not been used to many wounds. Pshaw! it was
all stuff; a youthful traveller's dream of some old
beauty of the old world, such as those of the theatre
all point, furbelow, florence, folly, flatter, and fury,
from which he awoke in the new world with a brain
made reasonable to meet a new and youthful beauty,
with feelings fresh as the rose-clad forest fountain of
her native land, the bubbles of which nought but the
bird's beak ever broke in the unbroken wilderness
he awoke here to realize the truth of love. I admire
PinckneyI love him; I know no young man I
respect
half so much. When you see Miss Fitzhurst,
you will agree with me that they are just suited to
each other. How romantically I have been holding
forth! Alas! for us bachelors; if they are to be married
I trust it will be soon, fair coz.
`To write, to sigh, and to converse
For years to play the fool,
Is to put passion out to nurse,
And send one's heart to school.'
Have you understood that they were soon to be
married? asked Miss Atherton, looking up from her
slipper, which she had been observing as Langdale
spoke.
I have not; but I doubtless suppose that they will
be soon. Her family certainly will be highly gratified
by the event. Ha, ha! Pinckney wished to make me
believe that there must be a long interval for the
heart to recover itselfa long dark night, as he
expressed
it, between the sitting of our first love and
rising of the seconda passionless period. Why, this
first love of his, if it was first love, went plump down
in the wide ocean, without creating the least stir on
its bosom, except, perhaps, the light rippling of vanity
and pique. It went down, as Shakespeare describes
the golden set of the sun, which argues a goodly day
to-morrow.
VOL. II.5
CHAPTER VI.
Gordon's
machinations against Peggy had so far
failed. On her arrival at Holly she told Miss
Rachellina
,
as distinctly as her tears and heavy sobs would
permit, of the death of her grandmother, and the
accusation
of Bobby.
The good lady expressed deep feeling for the
situation
of her unfortunate protg; she said:
It's alarming, child, to think of the many fearful
situations in which your cousin gets himself placed.
My brother has done everything for him that he
could; he was bailed by Sidney in a large sum for
shooting at Joseph Hitt with intent to kill, and it was
my family's influence which saved him from the
consequences
,
as they told Hitt it would be foolish for him
to pursue the business any farther, and he dropped it.
But, child, I know not what to say to this accusation of
counterfeiting. My brother is now in bed, where he
has been taking laudanum to ease the pain of his
gout. I cannot disturb him: Sidney is away, and
will be gone for some days. However, on to-morrow
I will speak to my brother, and let him decide what
can be done for Bobby. It is fearful to think of his
situation. But, child, you must take some of the
servants
with you, and assist Agnes with the body of
your grandmother; she can be buried to-morrow
evening; everything necessary shall be provided,
child; and you must come here and make this your
home. Do not cry so, child. Stay, child, stay; till I
go and give orders.
Mr. Fitzhurst was so tormented with the gout that
he had not feeling or patience to attend to anybody's
ills but his own, or maybe he thought it was best to
let Bobby remain in jail without bail, as a lesson to
him; for he knew not how to reconcile the frequent
accusations against the boy, with the idea of his
entire
innocence. The day after her death Granny
Gammon
was buried. A large concourse attended the
funeral, and among the number Miss Rachellina and
her neice. The old woman belonged to the Methodist
church, and it was decided by its members that she
should be buried in their grave-yard, which lay on
the other side of the village of Springdale. The jail
in which Bobby was confined stood about the centre
of Springdale, immediately opposite to the court-house,
as is the custom in many of the villages of the United
States. It was a rough, two-story stone building, with
thick walls, and very small, heavy, grated windows.
A wall was partly built around it, but its completion
was delayed in consequence of the present want of
funds, or some disagreement among the county
commissioners
.
Bobby was confined in a left-hand room
of the jail as you faced it, and his window through the
unfinished wall commanded a view of the street of
the village on that side by which the procession was
to pass. Bobby was standing by his grated window
intensely gazing forth, and Pompey had placed
himself
on a pile of stones beneath it, and with his hand
on one of the bars, was doing his utmost to comfort
the prisoner, when the funeral procession came
mournfully
winding along, passing close to the jail wall.
There, Pompey, look there, said Bobby, with a
bursting heart; that's my fault; just when they
accused
me of it, Granny died; she could'nt stand it.
She always said I'd be the death of her.
No, Mister Bobby, said Pompey, looking through
the thick grates with deep sympathy; it warn't your
fault at all; how often must I tell you that. It was in
the course of nature: and if it warnt in the course
of natur, it was Jack Gordon's fault; and he done
the whole of this; but who minds what a coloured
person says.
On beholding his Cousin Peggy in deep black,
walking
close to the hearse, and sobbing so loud that he
could hear her where he stood, he could gaze no
longer, but turning away, placed his hands to his ears,
and threw himself on the floor of his prison-house in
speechless despair.
After the funeral, Peggy was allowed to have an
interview
with her Cousin Bobby, in which, on her
telling
Bobby that she had made up her mind to marry
Gordon and save him, that individual's duplicity was
brought to light. Bobby insisted upon it, that
Gordon's
object was to deceive her as well as himself,
and obtained her promise that she would drop the idea
of trying to save him in that way, as it would ruin
them both. After this Peggy kept close to Holly,
unless when she went to see Bobby, at which times
she was accompanied by some one or other; and,
therefore, Gordon, though constantly on the watch,
had no opportunity of seeing her.
As Squire Norris observed, when he committed
Bobby, the county court was sitting, and he'd have
a quick trialit appeared that such was to be the
fact; for the day after his grandmother's funeral the
grand jury found a bill against him for passing
counterfeit
money. The day of trial soon arrived; but the
cause did not come on until late in the afternoon. As
Sidney was away, and Mr. Fitzhurst, senior, could
not attend, Pinckney, moved by his own impulses,
and requested by the family, had procured the best
counsel the city afforded, and anxious for Bobby's
fate, repaired to the court.
The prosecutor was a good-hearted, red-nosed
practitioner
,
who was decidedly opposed to the court's
sitting after dinner, which this court was in the habit
of doing. Feed by Gordon to assist in the
prosecution
,
but appearing merely as a volunteer to aid the
prosecutor in his arduous duties, Mr. Lupton took
his seat by the legal minister of the state. A large,
impatient crowd were collected round and in the
court, where they had been all day. There were many
persons, too, before the jail, keenly desirous of getting
a good look at the prisoner. The whole countryside
had been ringing with the awfulness of Bobby's
many enormities; and the gaping bumpkins were
there to gaze upon the youthful moral monstrosity,
who had such skill in counterfeiting, and who had
passed off so many hundred spurious bills on the
harmless country-people.
Yes, said one fellow, standing amidst a group
before the jail door awaiting the forthcoming of Bobby,
I expect he'll take the full termand it's right; a
man what can't boast of much larning like myself is
constantly taken in by these 'ere chaps what lives on
community. Just the last market day I took a two
dollar counterfeit bill, and swallowed up all my yearthly
profits that daysir, at the races I bet a chap a dollar,
an' won, an' it turned out counterfeit; an' cause I
tried to pass it, I got threatened.
Did you know it was counterfeit? asked one of
the party.
Know it, was the reply; how should I know
it, when I tell you I've got no larning, no how. Two
chaps said it was a counterfeit, I know, an' I just tried
to pass her to find out. Egad, I think this chap ought
5*
to be hung up till he ware dead, as a sample to the
country.
Them's my 'pinions, said another, while the last
speaker looked about him like a stump orator when
he thinks he has made a
hit
.
In the meantime, Bobby, who was the only prisoner
within the jail, except one who was confined in another
apartment on a charge of assault and battery, was
doing all he could to cheer his Cousin Peggy, who
had been admitted to his place of confinement with a
suit of new clothes, which she herself had rapidly and
with fearful anxieties made for him, that he might
appear
as respectable as possible on his trial. It was an
ominous suit of black, in respect to their grandmother.
Peggy held one of Bobby's hands in her's, while with
the other she was adjusting the collar of his jacket.
The tears were streaming down her cheeks, and the
deep black in which she was dressed, together with
the sorrow she had lately suffered, and the dark room
in which she stood, had made an alteration in her
appearance
that struck like a dagger to the heart of
Bobby. His appearance made a similar impression
upon her; he looked haggard in the extreme, but his
deportment was heroically firm for one of his years.
Cousin Peggy, he said, I am innocent of all
thisI am, as God's my judge. So sure as Granny's
dead and in her grave, so sure I am innocent of all
this. Aunty Agnes has been here to talk to me, an'
I'm trusting in God. Let what may come of it, it's
better for me, for I have not been living the life I
ought toI know itI know it. Don't be
down-hearted
,
Cousin Peggy, it's not a hanging matter.
O! Bobby, Bobby! but it's a disgrace, exclaimed
Peggy, throwing her arms around his neck; you
musn't think hard of me for saying so. I don't mean
to throw it up to you, I know you're not guilty. My,
my! I came here to comfort you, and you comfort
me. But we'll die before we see each other again,
Bobby, if they send you to that awful place. O! if
you only get through this, I'll love you all my life, an'
none but you, an' I'll never look at such a wretch as
Gordon again. Bobby listenjust say soand I'll
go out an' get Gordon to hurry away; I saw him as
I came here, an' he wanted to speak to me, but I
wouldn'tjust say so an' I'll see him and mar
No, Cousin Peggy, I would'nt say so to save my
life, said Bobbyan' I said that before.
At this instant the sheriff entered, and told Bobby
that it was time for him to appear in court. Escorted
by the officer, and with his Cousin Peggy walking by
his side and holding his hand firmly locked in her's,
Bobby left the jail. The first person whose eye
Bobby
caught, as he stepped from the jail door, was old
Pompey, who had obtained leave from his master to
attend the trial, and who appeared, by way of keeping
Bobby in countenance, in his full livery suit. The
sheriff was a kind-hearted man, and, knowing the
friendly offices which Bobby had performed for
Pompey, he was pleased to see the display of
gratitude
which the old negro had evinced during the boy's
confinement, and therefore made room for him as he
advanced to the side of Bobby.
Your humble, 'bedient servant, master sheriff, said
Pompey to the officer with profound awe, as he stepped
up. Master Bobby, he whispered in great agitation,
keep your heart up; you got a big heart, you ha'
indeed
.
You got old Pompey out of as tough a job
almost as thisand if the Lord of his 'finite mercy
would put a white skin on me now, I'd save youbut
what's the testimony of a coloured person?
Look at that, said one of the crowd to another;
folks say that black rascal went halves in that very
booth at the races where this money was passed. I
don't think the sheriff ought to allow that.
Allow that, said another person, who was no
other than Hardy the miller; I tell you, stranger, I
know Bobby Gammon, and I'd sooner take you for a
counterfeiter than I would him; an' for the matter of
that, before I would the old negro, either.
The stranger eyed the stout form of the miller, and
said no more, while Hardy stepped up to Peggy, and
assisted her across the street.
There, mother, that's what I always told you
Bob and Peg Blossom would come to, said Miss
Maddox to her mother, as she stood at her shop-door,
and congratulated herself on being a prophetess.
The prisoner was placed in the bar, near which the
prosecutor and Mr. Lupton had been some time seated
in deep consultation. The sheriff kindly placed a
chair by the prisoner's box, and bid Peggy be seated;
she did so, she looked round and beheld Gordon
gazing at her with mingled expression, in which she
thought there was a touch of regret that fixed her
attention
for a momentit was so unusual to his features.
When he caught her eye, he nodded his head slightly
sideways, as much as to bid her leave the court, as
she interpreted it, and he would join herbut she
turned her eye from him. In a few moments she
could not resist stealing a glance at him; his head
was turned towards the bench, and he stood with his
arms folded in a resolute manner. As Pompey was
known to most persons about the court-house, he had
contrived to get within the railing that kept the crowd
from intruding on the bar, where he stood partly
screened by a pillar, and endeavouring to pass
unobserved
,
but to get as near to Bobby as possible.
The bench was not very imposing in its appearance,
nor remarkable for its decisions, except, perhaps, for
the frequency with which they were reversed by the
supreme judicature of the state: nor was this to be
wondered at, when it was remembered that the judges
owed their appointments, which were made by the
governor and council, more to the political influence
which they had exercised in behalf of the party in
power, than to any reputation for legal lore.
All at once, like one whom a sudden thought had
aroused to his duty, the superior judge, whose dinner
had been substantial and vinous, raised himself up lazily
on his elbow from a laughing colloquy which he had
been holding with his right-hand man, and ordered
the prisoner to stand up, and listen to the indictment
against him. Resolutely Bobby arose, but he did
not elevate his person as much as he might have done
by standing on his longer leg, for he rested on the
shorter one. While the clerk was reading the
indictment
,
Peggy watched him with the intense desire to
understand the meaning of the various repetitions and
many counts in it, while Pompey internally came to
the conclusion, as he listened to what he could not
possibly comprehend, that the learning and big
dictionary
words in the paper was clear against master
Bobby.
When the clerk had read the indictment, and the
question was asked of the prisoner, What say you
guilty or not guilty, Bobby replied in a clear tone
Gentlemen and judges, I don't deny as how that
I bought a cow and calf from Jack Gordon, and that
I paid him, mayhap, with bad money; but as God is
my judge, I took it for good money, and I thought it
was good money when I passed it.
The eminent lawyer whom Pinckney had obtained
in the city to defend Bobby, had only arrived a few
minutes before the prisoner was brought into court;
the call of an extensive business had kept him at his
post in the city to the latest moment. No expectation
of the accumulation of professional honours had
brought him to Springdale; he came merely in the
way of his profession, and in the anticipation of a
large fee. When Bobby was arraigned he sat
within
the bar conversing with Pinckney, whom he had
often met at the table of Langdale, and who was
explaining
to him the case as distinctly as his own
limited knowledge of it would allow. Mr. Mason was
evidently interested in the sketch of the boy's
character
which Pinckney gave him, together with his
adventures with Thompson when he rescued Pompey,
and the shooting of Hitt; all which the narrator had
frequently heard spoken of at Holly.
And that's his cousin beside him? she is a
beautiful
girl; her grief is certainly deep and heartfelt;
he certainly is a remarkable boy. Ah, continued
Mason, whose quick eye comprehended matters at a
glance, that's the old negro whom he saved from
the lash of Thompson. I know Thompsona harsh
dog; the boy did the negro a favour worthy of his
gratitude. Mr. Pinckney, I wish I had known more
of this case beforeI thought it was one among the
thousand ordinary cases of conterfeitingmy
business
obscured my gallantry; I forgot how Miss
Fitzhurst
urged it upon me when I met her the other day
in the city. What a thing habit is: I believe in time
we might learn to dance to the rattling of a captive's
chains, and be merry at the music. Sir, when I first
commenced my profession I felt a nervous, deep
interest
in the fate of every criminal whom I beheld in
the bar; and now I can scarcely get excited in the
fate of my own client, unless something remarkable
turns up in the investigation, or a passion for victory
is aroused in me by the opposing counsel.
The whole court appeared impressed with the
manner in which Bobby expressed himself. The
judge ordered the plea of not guilty to be entered,
which was accordingly done, and the trial proceeded.
The prosecutor made no opening remarks himself,
but left that duty to Mr. Lupton, who held forth for
more than an hour in a tirade against counterfeiters in
general, and Bobby in particular, whose depravity he
pronounced unparalleled in the annals of crime. When
he concluded, Gordon was called to the stand.
Pinckney puzzled over the features, and
particularly
the form of Gordon, in strange perplexity, for he
could not remove the impression from his mind that
he had seen him before, but when, or where, he could
not possibly divine.
With characteristic swagger and indifference to
those around him, Gordon gave in his testimony. He
related the facts of the sale of the cow and calf, and
the payment of the note by Bobby, as they occurred.
He also, with great apparent frankness, mentioned what
had transpired at the cottage on the arrest of Bobby,
saying, that the old woman, when dying, had accused
him of misleading her grandchild, when the fact was,
that he could prove by Mr. Sidney Fitzhurst, if he
were in court, that when Bobby was taken up in the
city that he had called on Mr. Fitzhurst for the
purpose
of getting him to defend the boy.
Here Mr. Mason told Gordon to confine himself to
the case before the courtand Gordon said he had
nothing more to say further, except that when he left
the cabin the constable showed him a tin box,
containing
money such as Bobby had passed on him,
which was found between the logs by the door.
How do you know it was found there? inquired
Mr. Mason.
Because he put it thar himself, shouted Pompey,
springing to the side of Bobby as if moved by an
impulse
that he had been trying in vain to control, and
facing Gordon. The whole court were mute with
amazement. Because he put it thar himselfand,
gentlemen all, if God of his 'finite mercy, would just
for two minutes put a white skin on me and make me
a witness, I'd swear to it, and prove it, for I saw Jack
Gordon do it.
Endowed by a deep sense of gratitude with moral
firmness, the old negro kept his stand by Bobby, and
his eye on Gordon fearlessly. Gordon started.
Silence! exclaimed the judge. Sheriff, what
means this interruption?
Before the sheriff could get to the spot where
Pompey
stood to take him into custody, for county courts
have not as many officers in attendance as city ones,
Mr. Mason arose and observed
May it please the court, there is something in this
I would fain understand
I understand it, said Lupton, springing to his feet,
that boy
You must also understand, sir, that I am not to be
interrupted, said Mason, with a glance on Lupton
that quailed him to his seat. Will your Honours
suspend the cause for a few moments, while I speak
to this negro in private. I feel the interest of my
client demands it.
Why, Mr. Mason, if you wish it particularly,
said the judge, glancing around on the bar, as if he
would discover in their manner if there were any
error in the proceedings. Certainly a lawyer of
your prominent standing, sirMason bowed low.
By-the-by, the counsel who opened the cause
occupied
us so long, and then there has been so much
delay
that we can't progress much farther this evening
so the court may as well adjourn. The gentlemen of
the jury will take care not to hold any conversation
with any person touching the cause in course of trial.
Witnesses be punctual in your attendancecrier
adjourn
the court until to-morrow morning, ten o'clock.
Without waiting for the adjournment of the court,
Mr. Mason left the room, attended by the sheriff and
Pompey.
As Pompey passed out, the negroes in attendance
gazed at him with a mixture of admiration, awe, and
fear. I tell you what it are, Dave, whispered one
negro to another, Pompey Fitzhurst are an
astonishing
coloured person; he takes the shine
everywhere
.
Yes, if he had a white skin on 'um, he'd plead law
up to the handle.
Totally unconscious of the admiration he elicited,
but labouring under a high-wrought excitement,
Pompey
followed the sheriff and Mr. Mason into a private
apartment.
What's your name, my old man? said Mr. Mason
to Pompey, in a conciliatory tone.
Folks, master, calls me Pompey Fitzhurst, 'cause
I belong to the Fitzhurst family, and my father before
me; but my father's name was Pompey Johnson, an'
I was named after him.
Well, Pompey, tell me truly, what was the cause
of your interrupting the court?
'Cause, master, I couldn't help it, though I know a
coloured person can't give testimony; I couldn't help
it; for I diskivered and observed Jack Gordon with
my own eyes put that tin box thar before he went
into the house.
Who did you ever tell this to before?
Nobody, master; I held it intirely to myself. I
knew as how I couldn't be of any sarvice to Mister
Bobby, though he had done so much for me, an' I kept
it to myself, 'cause I knowed if I told it I'd get myself
into trouble, and it would'nt help nobody; but in the
VOL. II.6
court this day, when I seed Jack Gordon stand up
thar so bold, and swear away Mister Bobby to the
penitentiary, and poor Miss Peggy thar feeling so
much, and Mister Bobby feeling so much, and I feeling
so much, I couldn't stand it; and I spoke it, an' I
would ha' spoke it if I had to die for it, said Pompey,
folding his arms, while the dignity of truth was
stamped as firmly on his black brow as ever it was on
a white one.
I believe you, Pompey, said Mr. Mason. Thank
you, master, said Pompey, while the tear glistened in
his eye, and he turned his head away and brushed his
cheek. Master, he resumed, I just tell you the
whole on it, if you'll just listen to mean' if you'll
only get Mister Bobby out of this scrape, old Pompey
'll pray for you to the last day of his life to the good
God, who hearkens to the black man just the same as
to the white man.
Well, Pompey, tell me exactly everything about
it, and I won't despair of getting Bobby off.
Master, I'll just tell the whole truth. Mister
Bobby
and I agreed betwixt us, that we would 'stablish
a booth at the races. We put our money together,
and did it, for he was mighty saving to get some
things for his granny, who's dead since. Poor
creature
!
she died the very night they went to her cabin
to take Mister Bobby. I was out the door, but I
heard it; she laid Mister Bobby's falling off to Jack
Gordon, and she spoke an awful curse on him just as
she died. Gordon hates all of 'em. He wants
revenge
,
that's it. Miss Peggy would'nt have him; that's
it, Master Mason. But I'm not telling it strait. I had
to drive our family home from the races, an' I
couldn't tell how Mister Bobby was a coming on; so
after I puts away my carriage, and feeds my horses,
I thought I'd go down to Granny Gammon's, and see
Mister Bobby about our booth, an' inquire how his
Granny was; as word was about, and he had told
me at the races, as how she was ailing. Well I
went, and as I drawed near the house, I heard a
parcel of people coming, as though they were bent
there, too; so I did'nt know what to make of it, and
I bethought me, that maybe the Granny was dead.
Howsomever on I went, fast ahead; one fellow, it
was Gordon's voiceI could'nt see them, mind master,
for there ware no moon, and the starlight was
uncertain
like, but I know Jack Gordon's voice any
where, he called on me to stop. Just then, somehow,
I mistrusted something, and I went on to make
believe
I was going by the house, and when I got
beyond
it, and behind it like, till it stood atwixt them
and me, I turned quick round towards the door, and
hid in some elder bushes by an old shed near by the
house.
How came you to mistrust something when you
heard Jack Gordon's voice? inquired Mr. Mason.
Cause, master, Mister Bobby had told me that he
believed Jack Gordon wanted to do him some evil.
Well then, I hid in them elder bushes, and they comes
up, without making any noise, and all of 'em but one
goes in. One chap just stood holding the door open
like, and that let the light shine right out. I was as
near to 'em, master, as I are to that fire-place; I saw
plain; an' I saw Jack Gordon touch the man what
stood in the door, an' then I saw something white
shine in Jack Gordon's hand, and I diskivered and
obsarved him put it plump right between the logs of the
cabin by the door,an' when he knowed that the
other man seed him, he pushed right into the
house.
What did you do, then?
Then I staid there till they fetched Master Bobby
out, to take him afore Squire Norris: an' when they
fetched him out, a man, and he must ha' been the
same one what held open the door, and saw Gordon
put the box between the logs, went to the place an'
took out the tin box, an' he give it to somebody, and
told him to mind and hold it fast, for that he believed
there was counterfeit money in it; he said it shined,
and that made him find it. Then Gordon came out,
and wanted 'em to search the house; but they told him
they had enough to do for Master Bobby, and so
they dragged him off afore Squire Norris, and then
to jail; fur I followed behind em', and saw jist how
they acted. You see, Master Mason, I diskivered
Jack Gordon, and a parcel of other chaps, cutting
extras 'bout our booth all day, and spending money;
an' I thought things were going wrong then: cause
Master Bobby got in trouble once afore about such
money, an' I believe, with his Granny, what's dead
and gone, that it was Jack Gordon's doings.
Mr. Mason mused a moment, and then observed to
the sheriff.
Sheriff, I have often remarked, in the practice of
my profession, that uneducated persons, and
particularly
coloured people, give in their testimony with
striking accuracy. I suppose this observation
surprises
you?
I never thought of it before, replied the sheriff.
It is a fact, sir. The reason is, I suppose,
because
they make no parade of pertinent phrascology;
they do not distract their minds by thinking what
people will say of them. They tell what they saw
in whatever language rises to their lips, and the
unadorned
truth, in homely guise, comes home to
everybody
.
I venture to say, that if that jury were
allowed
to-morrow to hear this old fellow's tale, that
they would acquit Bobby without leaving the box.
I think so, rejoined the sheriff; for my part I
never thought him guilty. I have known him for
many years, and I believe that the strongest trait in
his character is sterling honesty.
You are right, I think. Where can I find this
constable that arrested Bobby. Is he vigilant and
faithful?
He is. I saw him in the court-house, just now.
Would you like to see him?
If you please.
The sheriff left the room, and in a few minutes
returned
with the constable.
You arrested Robert Gammon, I believe, sir, on
the charge of passing counterfeit money? said Mr.
Mason to the constable, whose name was Jessop.
I did, sir.
Describe the circumstances, if you please, sir?
Jessop accordingly narrated them with great
accuracy
.
Who was the man that discovered the box?
asked Mason.
I bethink me, said Jessop, after a pause of
deliberation
;
that he a kind o' clerks it for Squire
Benbow
,
in the city; I know I have seen him about
there.
Ha! Benbow's; yes in old town. Well, I'll give
you a letter to Ross, the old Hays of our city; you
know him?
Yes, sir; and old Hays, toothey're mighty men,
said Jessop, with an air of professional pride. I
know where Ross lives.
I'll give you a letter to himyou must start
forthwith
;
leave the village in a direction from the city so as
to be unsuspected. Ross will assist you. I'll give
directions
in the letter; the house of this witness,
where-ever
he lives, must be searched thoroughly. I hope
there'll be some tin boxes forthcoming.
6*
Mason wrote a hasty letter to Ross, sealed it
carefully
,
and inquiring the name of Jessop, wrote it
plainly in the corner of the direction, and made,
apparently
,
a hasty stroke with the pen beside it, as is
usual; but the mark had a cabalistic meaning,
implying
the trust-worthiness of the bearer.
CHAPTER VII.
After
the court adjourned, Pinckney waited some
time to see Mr. Mason, with the intention of showing
him some civilities; but as he was still engaged with
Pompey and the constable, and there was no
knowing
when he would get through, Pinckney returned
to Holly, which Mr. Bradley had now left.
With what a confiding, yet flattering heart, Fanny
met Pinckney. How coy the blush that melted into
confidence! how full the confidence that in a moment
grew shy, startled at itself, as if it would question the
fulness of its faith, and know if the awakened world
of love within, were, indeed, a reality, or merely a
dream! Her heart was of its joy afraid. Did
Pinckney, indeed, love her, as he said? how thrilling
the consciousness, that if words must not from the lips
of gentle maid tell all she felt, 'twas wellfor they
could not. At one time, while he sat conversing with
her, her coyness would all vanish, and when he had
gone, she would take herself to task for her want of
maidenly reserve; at another, her timidity would
overpower
her, and she would think, when he had left her
side, what a bashful creature she had been, and
resolve
to banish it, at least sufficiently to meet his eye,
and reply, without faltering, to his inquiry.
'Twas partly love, and partly fear,
And partly 'twas a bashful art.
But it was all evidence of the depth of her affection.
The beautiful illusions of life were around her. Her
heart was like the fountain that throws up its silvery
spray in the air, and hope was the sunbeam that gilded
it with the hues of the rainbow.
My dearest Fanny, said Pinckney; I have
some little business in town to nighthow I hate
leaving you.
It will be dark now before you can get to town,
Howardand have you no fear of another assault
upon you?
None in the world.
Well, I have.
Bless you! then I will go at once; my horse is
fleet, and I can reach the city before night. I value my
life now, and encircling her form gently, he pressed
a kiss upon her brow and hand, and left her. He
proceeded to his room, unlocked his trunk, and took
from it the letters, ring and miniature, which our
readers may remember had, on a former occasion,
awakened restless and bitter memories. The
bitterness
has gonegiven place to indifference, for as he
put them in his pocket of his riding coat, he said to
himself:
I should have returned them before I left Venice;
I must have those foolish letters of mine. What a
fascinating creature Fanny is. Her father received
my proposals with real pleasure, and Miss Rachellina,
what a pleased dignity and importance sat upon her
maiden brow! I wish Sid were back.
So speaking, Pinckney left his room, and passing
out, mounted his horse, which he had ordered to be
in readiness when he entered the house, he rode off,
kissing his hand to Fanny, who called out to him,
saying
:
O! Mr. Pinckney, if you see Mr. Langdale's
beauty, apologise to her, or rather to him, for my not
calling the day I promised him. Say father's
indisposition
prevented me.
He bowed in gallant obedience, spurred his horse
into a brisk canter, and with a heart full of the
witcheries
of Fanny Fitzhurst, gave himself up to happy
dreams of the future. As he approached the place
where he had been robbed, the shades of night were
gathering in, and he naturally felt an impulse of
watchfulness. Down the bridle-path which led to the
hills near which Sidney had caught his horse,
Pinckney
heard the rapid clatter of a horse's hoofs. His
attention was attracted; and while he still rode on at
the same rate, he prepared his pocket-pistol for an
emergency. Just as Pinckney reached the spot where
the bridle-path met the main road, the horseman at
full speed entered it. He reined back his horse as
he saw Pinckney, and held down his head; but
Pinckney
at a glance recognised him as the leading witness
against Bobby. It was Jack Gordon.
You ride fast, sir, said Pinckney, anxious to
discover
something of the character of the man, who had
interested him, not only on Bobby's account, but he
knew not why.
Me! yes; sometimes fast, sometimes slow, replied
Gordon, in a voice that was harsh and husky, in the
first words, but which he subdued, at the same time
he checked his horse, and again gave him the rein,
so as to keep pace with Pinckney.
How far do you ride? asked Pinckney.
Ride; I rideno, not to the city. I go about a mile
belowI have some business there with a friend, and
as I must be back to the court to-morrow, I'm making
the best of my time.
That's a very young man to be leagued with
counterfeiters. Is he not?
Young! he's cut his eye-teeth, sir. That negro
and him have colleagued together for years. Damn
me! that black rascal ought to be strung up neck and
heels. Did you ever hear of such a thing in a free
country as to let a slave speak that way of a white
man? I'll swear he's paid for it. I'd give a
thousand
dollars for him; I'd put his carcass in condition
for the crows. What Thompson was going to give
him would ha' been only a priming. They can't save
Bob Gammonhe's got to go.
You seem to have a stout heart in the cause, sir,
replied Pinckney. Have I not seen you before?
Gordon thrust his hand in his pocket, and reined
back his horse so quickly that the animal was thrown
on his haunches. This surprised Pinckney, and he
stopped his horse, and faced Gordon. Ha, ha! said
Gordon, with an attempt at facetiousness, and
apparently
changing his purpose; I have the luck of it.
Maybe you're like old Pompey, Mr. Pinckney; you
saw me do what never entered my head.
Pinckney's suspicions of Gordon's character were
aroused. He said sternly, but certainly impudently:
Maybe I have; and remember my testimony is good.
And without noticing him any further, Pinckney rode
on. Tremblingly Gordon's hand went again to his
pocket; there it remained, and he sat motionless on
his horse while Pinckney pursued his way.
Pinckney had not ridden a hundred yards from the
spot where he left Gordon, before he heard him start
again at the top of his speed. Gordon seemed to have
passed into the woods, for his horse's hoofs no longer
rattled in the road, and Pinckney thought he heard
the rustling of leaves and the breaking of sticks
under
his tread. Presently the tramp in the woods was
parallel with his own horse's, as he thought, and in a
few moments it seemed to die away ahead of him, as
if he was surpassed in speed. Just after the noise
ceased, he passed the very spot where he had been
assaulted, and his horseit was the one he rode at
that time, without any resistance on the part of the
rider, shyed to the other side of the road. 'Twas
lucky, perhaps, for Pinckney that it did so; for at the
instant the sharp report of a pistol was heard in the
bushes from which the animal shyed, and a bullet
cut the whisker that protruded from that rider's chin.
His horse took fright, and sprang uncontrollably on.
If Pinckney had not been an admirable horseman, the
suddenness of the start would have thrown him. He,
however, kept his seat; but it was impossible for him
at once to stop his horse, or even turn his head, which
he attempted, without reflection, to do, that he might
dash upon his waylayer, and shoot him down. The
horse seemed determined that Pinckney should do no
such thing, for he went nearly a mile before he would
yield entirely to the control of the rein. Pinckney's
suspicions naturally attached to Gordon, and he
arrived
at Langdale's pretty well satisfied in his own
mind that it was Gordon who had assaulted him
before. The more he thought of the affair the stronger
were his convictions that his suspicions were just, and
he determined to have Gordon arrested on his
appearance
in the court the next morning, when he
reflected it would be of no use, as he had no testimony
against him.
When Pinckney entered Langdale's it was some
time after dark. He found within Langdale seated
by Miss Atherton, in what he thought a whispering
conversation, while her uncle sat by a centre-table
busy with the evening paper. There was a confusion,
notwithing her great self-control, in Miss Atherton's
manner towards him; but it was so slight, that it
escaped every eye but Pinckney's, even the quick
eye of Langdale. Pinckney would not have detected
it had he not known her so intimately. He was
greeted cordially by Langdale, and presented to Mr.
Atherton, who was a handsome, worldly old bachelor.
Fanny, dearest, of all the dears! how is the fair
Fanny, Pinckney? asked Langdale, in his cheerfulest
tone.
Blooming and beautiful, I thank you, sir, replied
Pinckney, and full of sweet converse upon your
gallantry. Oh! Miss Fitzhurst charged me, bowing
to Miss Atherton and Langdale, to make apologies
for not calling on Miss Atherton the day she promised;
her father's indisposition prevented her. When he
has the gout badly he will have nobody by him but
his daughter. She will seize the first opportunity of
calling, Miss Atherton. Langdale, who so seldom
speaks highly of aught of womankind, has awakened
in her all her sex's curiosity. I might say envy, if
Miss Fitzhurst were capable of the passion.
Miss Atherton bowed graciously, and Langdale
said:
You have done me but justice. Is the fair Fanny
capable of the other passionjealousy? if she be, I'll
warn her to keep a certain friend of mine in rosy
bondage-bound at Holly. Not that Miss Fanny has
not every attraction; but where two magnets are of
equal power, the one that you are nearest to is sure to
attract you; and when it has attracted you, bowing
to Miss Atherton, of course you think its powers
unparalleled
.
You flatter that certain friend of yours, Langdale,
beyond all bounds, by even insinuation that Miss
Fitzhurst can have any interest in him: and if he
were in your situation nearest to the one magnet, I
have no doubt he would make your confession.
Ha, ha! what a sad situation: speaking of magnets,
what a sad situation he would be in, Miss Atherton,
who should be placed exactly between two such
magnets.
He would be in the situation of Mahomet's coffin,
said Miss Atherton.
VOL. II.7
Yes, Miss Atherton, replied Pinckney, laughing,
archly, he would be suspended between
heaven
and
hell
.
Your compliment is not equally attractive, Mr.
Pinckney, said Miss Atherton, loudly; for it is
evident that you would prefer one magnet, the upper
one, though the laws of gravitation might in some
cases aid the lower one.
Doubtless all the earthy powers and passions
would aid
that
one, but even in extremity, like a dying
man, I should look up with hope.
Langdale looked quickly at the two, and fell into
a musing attitude, while Miss Atherton said to her
uncle:
My dear uncle, not that I would drive you away
from agreeable company, but you promised to call
on Mr. Paulton; did you not, this evening?
True, said Langdale, and I promised to call
with him. So, Mr. Pinckney, I will make no apologies,
as I leave you in a
tte--tte
with Miss Atherton.
Pinckney bowed; Mr. Atherton made his apologies,
and with Langdale, departed.
When the door closed on Miss Atherton and
Pinckney
,
there was the silence of more than a minute,
which the lady broke, by saying:
A fine night, Howard. Have you just arrived?
A few moments since; and on a special message.
Pardon me one moment, Miss Atherton, and I will
fulfil it. So saying, Pinckney left the room, and
taking from the pocket of his overcoat which hung
in the hall, the miniature, letters, and rings, returned,
and resumed his seat.
What does this mean, Howard? asked Miss
Atherton, turning slightly pale as she observed the
packet.
It means what it seems, Miss Athertonthat I
have brought you the memorials of the past. I have
no longer any claims to them, and desire to restore
them to their rightful owner. I should have done it
before leaving Italy, but knew no one to whom I
could intrust them; and it was also my desire that
when I did so, that I should recover my own.
You seem determined that I shall not
misunderstand
you, Mr. Pinckney; and there is also great
directness in doing such an errand one's-self.
Howard, Howard, Howard! but give them to me
no matter. Your's are now in one of my trunks, among
some of my baggage which I have not had brought
here. You shall have them at the earliest
opportunity
.
If you please, Miss Atherton.
As she took the packet, she, with apparent
carelessness
,
glanced over the contents, and observed:
The locket is not here.
While Pinckney was explaining how he lost it, a
servant entered, and said that there was a person in
the hall, who requested that he might speak with
her.
A person to speak with me! why don't you show
him in, if he is a gentleman?
He is not a gentleman, ma'am.
Ah! some verbal message from the hotel: tell
him to come in. The hotel at which I stopped was
a very fine one, Mr. Pinckney.
As Pinckney assented, he threw his eye upon the
messenger, who was just entering the room, and was
surprised to see no other than the individual who, he
supposed, had attempted to murder himthe witness
against BobbyJack Gordon. He started with even
more surprise than Pinckney, and looked as if he
expected to be charged with something or other.
Before Gordon spoke, Pinckney arose, and said:
I must bid you good night, Miss Atherton.
Good night, Mr. Pinckney; I hope I shall have
the pleasure of seeing you often. Do bring Miss
Fitzhurst to see me.
Pinckney bowed low and left the room, resumed
his overcoat, and stepped forth into the streeet,
wondering
what Gordon could have to say to Miss
Atherton
.
The night was not a very bright one, but the
lamp at a corner, some twenty steps off, rendered
objects
quite distinct. As Pinckney advanced towards
the lamp, a man met him, who seemed to have been
stationary for a moment before, and asked politely
if Pinckney would tell him who lived in that house,
pointing to Langdale's.
Mr. Richard Langdale, replied Pinckney.
Thank you, sir, rejoined the inquirer, loitering
past.
Pinckney, after a moment's deliberation as to how
he should spend the evening, determined to go to the
theatre.
7*
CHAPTER VIII.
An
hour elapsed before Gordon left the residence
of Langdale. When he found himself in the street,
by the directest course he proceeded to that of
Benbow
,
who dwelt at least a mile off, in an obscure part
of the city. His quick eye detected a figure under
the shade of the lamp as he passed, and in his
suspicious
mind the wonder instantly occurred, what the
designs of the person were. He hurried on, and
began to fear that he was dogged; so, to avoid the
consequences, he called a hack, and, stepping in,
ordered the hackman to drive to a certain square,
which was some distance above Benbow's. There
he alighted, and cautiously hastened to Benbow's; but
fearing to give his accustomed signal at the front
entrance
,
he looked round to see if he was observed,
and then entered an alley beside the house, and then
the yard, when, at the back door, he made three raps,
gave a whistle, and, after some time, was admitted by
his coadjutor.
What brought you in at the back door? said
Benbow. I always suspect something when you
come in that way.
Maybe I have suspicions of the other way.
I called here to-night before, and you were not
in.
Come in now, then.
No; it's no use. I'm in a hurry, and must be
back to Springdale to-night. Benbow, you must be
out there early in the morning, before the court sits.
I have fixed it so that you will get a summons by
day. Let Lupton and me alone for that. He tells
me you will be a good witness to prove that this
Bob, who is on his trial, is in the habit of passing
counterfeit money.
I washed my hands of that business, I told you!
exclaimed Benbow, impatiently. I attend to nothing
but the regular business, and am getting afraid of
that.
In for a penny, in for a pound, Benbow, is as true
as preaching. That infernal black rascal, old
Fitzhurst's
coachman, saw me slip the tin box between
the logs. What a nigger says is no testimony, so
they can't hurt me; but Lupton swears that my
testimony
must be bolstered up to convict him. The
easiest and naturalest thing in the world, is to have
you summoned; you committed him before for a like
offence, and we want your testimony.
But I say you can't have it.
Can't have it; why, Benbow, you're cracked.
Don't you see it's the very thing, if we can send this
limping devil to the penitentiary, who'll suspect us?
He can't 'peach against us; and as he has nobody to
'peach against, they'll put it down to his
stubbornness
.
What do you want me to say?
Only that he was up before you for the same crime,
and that he was let off on account of his youth.
Don't you see it's the very thing?
Well, well; I've a misgiving in my mind that all
this out of the course will lead to the worst kind of
trouble.
You're always croakingthere's a rap at your
door'taint the signal, though.
No, 'tis not, said Benbow, alarmed; what shall
I do?
Why, let 'em in.
Come in, then, yourself.
No, I must be off.
Be off! I'm coming out to oblige youyou might
as well oblige me.
You're lilly-livered, Benbowgo it while you're
young; however, I'll go in with you. And in they
went together, to the front room, where Benbow held
his magisterial office, the door of which he opened, and
admitted Ross, the celebrated rogue-taker.
Ah, said Benbow, giving him a hearty shake of
the hand; come in.
The welcome personage was a tall, fine-looking
fellow
,
fashionably dressed, but still with an air of
vulgarism
about him. He wore a large pair of whiskers
in fine trim, and possessed a remarkably quick and
merry eye. There was a careless off-handedness
about him, which seemed to indicate that he took the
world easy, and had little to do with its cares, crimes,
or criminals. He was beyond the middle age, but
he wore his years like an abbot, and appeared
indifferent
veryto
things about him. He ungloved
his hand, and shook indexes frankly, both with
Benbow
and Jack.
Well, gentlemen, he exclaimed; how does the
world treat you?
Just so, so, said Benbow; money's scarce.
Oh! that's always the complaint, said Ross;
my friend Gordon here, I warrant me, won't agree
with younow, at least, just after the races, where I
am told he has been sucking them in all round. I
envy the life of a sportman, continued he, throwing
himself into a chair; the world has no cares for
them, and we constables nothing to do with them,
except when they bungle in a professional way, and then
they deserve punishment for bungling, if for nothing
else.
I agree with you there, replied Jack; if I
had'nt, I should'nt have chosen the trade myself
but it has its perplexities.
Yes, said Ross; it requires a man to be
everywhere
at once, sometimes. Now, you, I suppose,
who were this afternoon a witness at Springdale
against that counterfeiter, had to be in town to-night
to attend some meeting of your cronies, and pluck a
pigeon.
No; I was only a little tired of Springdale, and I
thought I'd ride in to-night for company, and be out
to-morrow time enough for court. Ross, tell me, is
there no law for punishing a negro who interrupts a
white man in open court while he is giving in his
testimony?
None particularly; he may be punished for
contempt
of court, like any other disturber of the peace
under the circumstances.
Contempt of court! yes; and there was a
contempt
of Jack Gordon that I would'nt take from a
white man, let alone a negro. Ross, I wish you
could manage so as to buy him for me.
What per cent. will you give on the price?
Fifty, down.
Ah! whose negro is he?
Old Fitzhurst's.
What do you consider him worth?
Worth! he is the old coachmanworth! nothing
but to me; and I'll give a thousand dollars for
him.
And then get yourself hung for killing him. No,
I'll have nothing to do with that business. Why,
Benbow, where's your bottle; have you nothing to offer
an old friend to drink? The weather has got
comparatively
mild again, but I'll stir these coals and take
something, as I expect Jessop here soon on a business
that will require the scent of a Vidocq.
Ah! what's in the wind? asked Benbow, as he
proceeded to place a decanter of brandy, with tumblers
and water, on the table.
Wait a while, all in good time; business is
business
,
and pleasure is pleasure. Benbow, you're the
very man whom I like to issue a warrant for me
when I wish to catch a rogue; there's virtue in them;
they always seem to lead me on the scent better than
any other magistrate's warrants that I know of.
Here's my service to you, and may you never have
as good a one issued against yourself.
Against me! said Benbow, replacing the decanter
as he was in the act of putting it to the glass; a joke,
a joke, Ross.
I know it is, and therefore am I joking. You look
as if I was not, nevertheless; a secret conscience
needs no accuser.
That's true, replied Benbow, replenishing his
glass; and, upon the principle of another proverb,
the virtue is not in my warrant, but in your skill.
I'll lay you odds on that, and Gordon here shall
be judge.
Done, said Benbow; a supper with liquor for
the three of us, or as many more as you choose, should
they happen to fall in.
Agreed! and here's the proof. Last week, you
remember, I arrested O'Rielly, the celebrated
horse-thief
.
I met him about ten miles from here, and
suddenly presenting old Smith's warrant at him, told
him I arrested him. He looked at the warrant, and
said, `Ross, it's no go.' That's a fact, said I, but
there's virtue in this warrant, and I showed him yours,
when he surrendered forthwith.
Likely enough! exclaimed Benbow; but 'twas
because Smith's term of office expired the day
before
.
You got his warrant, and so you got one
from me, and presented the wrong one at first. He
was always a blunderer.
Well, then, there was the most virtue in yours.
Don't you say so, Gordon?
It so strikes me, said Jack.
Pooh! what does Gordon know about law!
exclaimed
Benbow. His was no warrant at all, I tell
you. There was no more virtue in it, than if Gordon
was to fill up a warrant, or you were to pass
judgment
on a man. A warrant, gentlemen, is not a
warrant, unless it issues from the proper person,
from one, at the time of issuing it, in the full authority
of the magistracy.
Will you admit then, said Ross, walking
carelessly
to the door, and opening it, as if he meant to
look out for a moment, will you admitHalloo!
here's Jessop and Prettyman; come in (they
entered
accordingly); will you admit that a warrant from
Stansbury, who is in full authority of the magistracy,
to arrest you for counterfeiting, and search your
premises
,
is of any virtue?
Me! exclaimed the terrified Benbow.
I am sorry, Benbow, said Ross, in a serious
tone, but such are my instructions; you can't but
say that I have broken them to you like a gentleman,
and like a gentleman I will fulfil them; you know
me, and I know you; so we'll leave Jessop and
Gordon
here till we return, and we'll commence up stairs
first. So saying, Ross lit another candle which
stood by, and asked Prettyman to accompany him.
You can stay, if you please, Benbow; only give me
your keys, and it will prevent your trunks and doors
from being broken open.
Benbow, paralysed with guilt, covered his face
with his hands for a moment, and then, rising,
mechanically said: Do what you please with
me.
Benbow, be a man! said Gordon; you don't
fear, do you?
No, no; but I tell you, Gordonyes, I'll go
with youno, I'll sit here with Gordon; here's my
keys.
You had better go with Ross! exclaimed
Gordon
;
I must be off soon.
Yes, yes; I'll go.
Show the way, then, said Ross, lifting the
candle
.
Benbow led the way up stairs, followed by Ross
and Prettyman, and leaving Jessop and Gordon
below.
Jessop, said Gordon, who, by a strong effort
had compelled himself to keep his chair, what does
all this mean?
Mean! nothing, only that Benbow has some
enemies who want to spit their spite upon him.
Meanwhile Ross and Prettyman made the strictest
search up stairs, but without discovering anything
whatever tending to criminate Benbow. They
returned
to his office, ransacked that, the cellar, and
every other part of the house, with the same fruitless
results. The while Benbow's confidence increased.
At first he talked of his innocence; why should he be
a counterfeiter; and then, as their probability of
success
waxed fainter, he began to speak of his
magisterial
character, and the damages a court of
justice
would give him in its sustainment. While he
was thus expatiating they returned to his office,
where Ross replaced the candle on the table, and
helping himself to a glass of brandy and water,
said:
Benbow, you can't blame me,'tis all in the way
of business; you're a gentleman, I'm a gentleman,
and I've treated you accordingly. Take something
yourself. The warrant was sworn out by the sheriff
of the next county, who came here for the purpose.
Jessop knows that.
What, of Springdale county, where they are
trying
Bob Gammon? asked Gordon, who several
times during their absence had arisen to go, but who
was detained by the careless manner of Jessop, who
seemed indifferent to his going or staying. He was
also painfully anxious to know the result, and after a
moment's reflection it occurred to him, that Benbow's
suspicious fears had always prevented him from
keeping anything to criminate himself about his
house.
Yes, the same, replied Ross, carelessly; but
business is business, and now we are done with it.
So, let's have glasses round; and, Benbow, this is another
proof that there are no warrants like yours; so here's
to the virtue of your warrants.
Well! exclaimed Benbow, much relieved as he
quaffed a bumper, I hope, Ross, I may never issue
one against you. I must say you have acted like
a gentleman. I'll be even with them some of these
days.
Don't mind that, my dear fellow! exclaimed
Ross; you're out of custody; I'll take the
responsibility
of not taking you before Stansbury; just let the
matter drop. Good night to you, my friends. I must
now leave you. Sorry I am to leave such good
VOL. II.8
company, but the best of friends must part. I
always
make it my business to be at the theatre every
night before it closes, and it is now near ten
o'clock.
Ross shook hands with all round, and proceeded
to the theatre, whither we will follow him.
CHAPTER IX.
Pinckney
, as he went to the theatre, was arrested
by the glare of a fashionable jewelry-shop near by,
and it occurred to him to step in and select a present
for Fanny. The shopman busied himself to please his
customer. Pinckney remarked that he wanted a locket,
but that he did not like the fashion of those presented to
him, when the shopman said:
I have one, sir, though not for sale, which I
think is the handsomest thing of the kind I have ever
seen. It was brought here by a person to have the
hair taken out, and altered; and I wonder at his taste
in wishing any alterationsbut we must please our
customers.
As he spoke, he opened a drawer, and, to
Pinckney's
surprise, produced the very locket which had
been taken from him with his watch and
pocket-book
on the night of the robbery.
Ah! said Pinckney as he took it in his hand,
may I ask where you got this?
It was brought to me, sir, some time since, by a
jockey-like looking man, who gave directions to have
it altered and other hair inserted, as I have told you.
I have delayed altering it, I can scarcely tell why
but the man did not come for it when he said he would,
and I have not touched it.
Sir, said Pinckney, look at itcan you discover
any secret spring about it?
The jeweller took it, and after a close examination
owned he could not.
There, sir, said Pinckney touching a spring,
which flew open and disclosed a beautiful little
miniature
of a lady. This must convince you that I
know something of the locket. Coming in from
Mr. Fitzhurst's
Mr. Paul Fitzhurst's? asked the jeweller.
The same.
He is one of my best customers.
I was robbed of this among other articles. This
article I did not mention in the advertisement. I lost
a watch and pocket-book besides; be so kind as to
describe, as nearly as you can, the individual who
brought it to you.
He certainly was not a gentleman, replied the
jeweller; he was good looking, but, as I have said,
jockey-like. I took him for a gambler.
Would you know the man if you were to see
him?
I think I should, sir.
Do you think I could get a constable at this time
of night? inquired Pinckney.
No doubt of it, sir; the theatre is within a few
doors, you can get one there; and if you think you
can trace the individual I will gladly go with you and
identify him. I will go for one to the theatre. What
time do you shut up?
Not until ten, or half-after, sir; above is my
dwelling
,
sir: at any hour, though I should have retired,
you can have me rapped up. I had a vague suspicion at
the time the man came to have it altered that all was
not right. I could not see what honest motiveit
8*
could not be a matter of taste, certainlyinfluenced
him.
Pinckney bade him good evening, and entered the
theatre. Almost the first person he met was Colonel
Bentley. Pinckney took him aside, and told him the
circumstances.
Egad! exclaimed the Colonel; Ross is here,
and he will be the very man for you. I'll look for
him.
The colonel made inquiries about the theatre and
in the saloon, and learned there that Ross was always
in by ten or after. Pinckney waited very impatiently
until Ross came, when he was made acquainted with
him, and gave him the details of the robbery, remarking
that he suspected a certain person. But, sir, he
continued
,
I have heard of your acuteness; and, as I
presume
you know him, let's to the jeweller's, and see if
you can guess from his description.
As soon as Ross heard it, he asked
Had he a quick step?
Think he had.
Hat a little on one side?
I don't know thatyes, yes; I think so.
Did you observe that he showed where he has
lost a tooth in the left jaw when he laughs?
I did not.
Talks a good deal?
Yes.
I know the man, sir, turning to Pinckney; his
name is Gordon.
The individual whom I suspect, replied
Pinckney
.
I wish you could find him.
I can, sir; and this very night. Mr. Whitman
(to the jeweller), will you go with us?
Certainly, sir, replied Whitman, putting the
locket in his pocket, and telling his assistant to shut
up.
He's carousing now at Benbow's, the magistrate,
with Benbow, and Jessop the constable, said Ross.
The three entered a hack at the theatre door, and
in ten minutes were let out at Benbow's. They could
hear a merry conversation within, and Ross
sans
ceremonie
opened the door, and bade them enter.
Sitting cosily around the table enjoying their segars,
and with the brandy bottle nearly empty, they found
the worthies. Gordon pushed his chair
involuntarily
back, as if he meant to rise when he saw
Pinckney, but kept his seat.
Don't be disturbed, gentlemen; don't be disturbed,
said Ross, politely; pleasure is pleasure, but
business
is business. Squire, I am about to try the virtue
of one of your warrants again.
Mr. Gordon, I am sorry to disturb the festivities
of this convivial occasion among friends where I was
myself lately a joyous partaker; but, sir, I arrest you
for the robbery of Mr. Pinckney, the gentleman before
you.
Me! said Gordon, jumping fiercely up.
Mr. Gordon, allow me to remark, sir, like one
gentleman to another, that that is in bad taste
always take things coolly, sir'Tis what your lawyer
would advise you to do if he were sitting beside
you.
Let him prove it, said Gordon taking his seat
and the hint together, and looking at Pinckney with
malignant defiance.
Benbow, much against his inclination, resumed the
magisterial chair, and swore Pinckney and the jeweller.
The former gave a detailed account of the robbery,
and swore positively that the locket was his, and that
he was then robbed of it, but could not identify the
robber. He was followed by the jeweller, who gave
the account of Gordon's bringing it to him to be
altered: he swore further, positively to his identity.
Gordon drew his watch from his pocket as the
examination
proceeded, and his countenance was relieved,
apparently, of all care.
There, sir, said he to Pinckney, scornfully, as he
took from the inner seal of his watch-chain a locket
which could not be distinguished from the one
Pinckney
claimed. I suppose your oath is broad enough
to let you swear to that, too?
Let me look at it, said Pinckney.
No, not out of my hands, cried Gordon.
The reason, sir, said Pinckney, why I know
this locket, as he touched the spring and disclosed the
likeness of Miss Atherton, is because it has the
likeness
of a lady concealed in it whom I well know.
Ha! is that it? said Gordon; then examine that,
and tell me if it hain't the likeness of a gentleman that
you know better still.
Pinckney received the locket as Gordon offered it,
found it in every respect like his own, and, touching a
spring, disclosed his own likeness. It was one which,
in fact, he had given in Italy to Miss Atherton, when
he had received her's.
Where did you get this? exclaimed Pinckney, in
amazement.
Maybe from the lady who gave you that, ha! ha!
ha!what do you think of that, my busterwon't
you swear to it?
I would swear to it, undoubtedly, said Pinckney,
showing it to the magistrate; it is my own likeness,
and a good oneI had it painted myself by a
celebrated
Florentine artist when abroad, who took this
of a lady that I knew then, and now, at the same time.
What were you doing at that lady's to-night? he
asked of Gordon.
What were you doing there, and be-hanged to you?
replied Gordon. You're much of a gentleman, ain't
you, to be dragging a lady's name up here. The
tailoring about you is all of the gentleman that belongs
to you.
Sir, said Pinckney to Benbow, this individual
must have stolen this from Miss Atherton to-night
when I saw him there. I hope that you will place him
in the safest custody to-night. Miss Atherton lives at
Mr. Langdale's, and, disagreeable as it must be to a
lady to appear against any one, early to-morrow, as
early as you say, I will conduct her thither.
It won't do, my lark, said Gordon. I know
more about you than you think I do; I've had my eye
on you in other countries. Has that lady been here
a month?
Pinckney at first disdained to reply, but in a minute
he reflected how foolish it would be, and answered,
No! she has not.
Has she been here three weeks? interrogated
Gordon.
No!
You'll die a dog's death yet, my gentleman; yes,
a hanged dog's death. Here's the squire and Jessop
saw me have that locket six months agoI'll have
you in jail, my visiter to the `big house' before we
have parted; you're friendly to Peg Gammon too,
ain't ye?
Jessop, said Ross, did you see that in Gordon's
possession six months ago?
Let me look at it, said Jessop, and he took it in
his hand, and, after examining it, said, Yes, this
certainly
is the lockethe did not disclose the miniature
then, but now, when I close it and examine it, I don't
think I can possibly be mistaken.
Let me look at it, said Benbow, and after
examining
it also, he remarkedI never knew it held a
likeness, but I've seen this in Jack'sin Gordon's
possession six months ago, I'm certain.
Pinckney concluded that the three companions were
all rogues together, and whispered so to the jeweller,
who replied, that he knew nothing of Gordon or
Benbow
,
but that Jessop bore the highest character as an
honest officer, for he had spent a summer in
Springdale
,
and there learned it.
Pinckney took Ross to the far end of the room, and
asked him what he thought of it.
I don't know what to think of it, replied Ross
and when I don't know what to think, I don't say
much. That Jessop brought me a letter to-night, from
which I understand he is trustworthy and honest. I
have been at fault to-night most damnablyit is
perfect
hocus-pocus.I wish I was Vidocqthe greatest
man that ever lived, sirO! that we had him here.
Well, gentlemen! exclaimed Gordon, triumphantly,
there's one thing certain, that though you may set a
rogue to catch a rogue, there's none of you can catch
an honest man. I want this Mr. Pinckney held to
bail to answer for false imprisoning me. Here, fork
over those locketsI believe I'll take the two of them;
you need'nt (to the jeweller) make them alterations I
ordered.
I hope, sir, said Pinckney to Benbow, that you
will retain the lady's locketthe one which bears my
likeness, until she shall be seen upon the subject.
It's no go, said Gordon, filling himself a glass of
liquor. It's no go, my ruffled-shirted cock; I've been
in the law before. The lockets are mine, and
Benbow
,
who knows the law, knows it.
You'll certainly keep them, said Ross to the
squire.
Ahem! said Benbow, rustling in his chair. I
incline to think not. About this gentleman looking as
Mr. Pinckney, I know nothinghe may be, and he
may not be anythingwhat do you know of him?
Nothing, replied Ross, but that Colonel Bentley
introduced him to me as a gentleman who had been
robbedand I see that he is a gentleman.
Veryvery sorry, indeed, said Benbow,
stammering
,
that I can't see as you dono harm meant,
Mr. Pinckneybut with my own eyes I saw Gordon
have that locket six months ago, so did Jessop; one
he had then, even before this alleged robbery; the
other, the match to it, because he happened to have
after the robbery, and take to a jeweller to have
altered
,
that's no reason that he robbed Mr. Pinckney,
no more reason than that he robbed the lady; and
Mr. Pinckney is willing to swear that this is the lady's.
No! there may be more painters an' one, and lockets
may look as like as two peas. This is a case in which
I would not advise; but Mr. Gordon can do as he
pleases. I decide, however, that he has the right to
both the lockets, and decree possession accordingly.
Not only possession! exclaimed Gordon, but I
want this individual, pointing to Pinckney, held to
bail in the sum of ten thousand dollars for malicious
prosecutionI'll show him what the law is.
Ahem! well, said Benbow
Benbow, exclaimed Ross angrily, interrupting
him, let me see those lockets a moment, Gordon, he
said, curbing himself, and turning pleasantly to Gordon,
who handed them to him. Benbow, this gentleman
goes as he went; there shall be no virtue in any
process
of yours in relation to him to-night. Jack (to
Gordon), you'll have to bring your action of replevin
or trover against me for this jewelry, for you shall
not have it until you do.
Gordon gazed on the resolute countenance of
Ross, and, changing his tone, burst into a laugh,
saying
:
Ross, you're a case. We're friends, and friends
can take liberties; besides, you're an honest man,
and I am not afraid to trust you with them: as to
the matter of that, take themI make you a present
of 'em both. Now, don't say I never gave you
anything.
No, I won't, replied Ross; and in requital of
your gift, as one good turn deserves another, I will,
some of these days, present you with some jewelry
myself; for instance, a pair of
bracelets
. Good night
to you.
As Ross spoke, he opened the door through which
Pinckney and the jeweller passed, followed by the
baffled theif-catcher. They walked together some
steps in silence, which Ross broke by saying, in
evident
chagrin
And I'll keep my word. I never was so at fault
in my life. Accidents will happen: Napoleon was
not always successful, and even Vidocq has been as
foully foiled as this. Lord! how fate is bearing and
forbearing with that scoundrel. Some of these days
I'll astonish him even more than he has astonished
me. He's a good deal in liquor.
Who is this Gordon? asked Pinckney.
A sportsman, sir, as the phrase goes. Mr.
Pinckney
,
here are the lockets, sir, said Ross, as they got
opposite to the door of a restorateur, where the light
shone forth; they belong to you, sir, and they are
better in your custody than mine.
As Pinckney took the lockets, he slipped a bank
bill in Ross's hand, in requital for his trouble, and
bade him and the jeweller good night. He
proceeded
to Langdale's, where he lodged when in town,
and found that gentleman, with his guests and Mr.
Bradley, late as the hour was, at a game of whist.
Ah! Pinckney, welcome! exclaimed Langdale,
as they all arose from the card-table; I had a present
of delightful game made to me to-day, and I have
ordered the cook to wait until you came.
I am sorry that you did so, replied Pinckney,
for though I cannot resist the temptation of these
night suppers, I am persuaded they are prejudicial to
one's health.
As they proceeded to the supper room, Pinckney
whispered, unobserved, to Miss Atherton:Oblige
me by making an opportunity for me to say one word
to you before you retireI must leave in the
morning
early.
The lady threw a bright glance on him, and said,
in a tone of tendernessI will, Howard.
Fair coz, said Langdale to Miss Atherton,
bowing
across the table to her, as he took with her a
glass of wine, you make me proud of my dwelling.
How true that scrap of verse is:
`Had you ever a cousin, Tom?
Did your cousin happen to sing?
We have sisters all by the dozen, Tom,
But a cousin's a different thing.'
Coz, replied Miss Atherton, for I will call you
coz, too, after that, do you know that I think you
were meant for a knight of other days, instead of a
merchant? I quere whether you are as agreeable in
your counting-room as you are here.
O! sink the shop. No, indeed, I am not: I have
not at least the attractions there to tempt the effort.
But I would not change my vocation for either of the
professions; all the variation I ask, is a little of
political
bustle now and then. As for medicine, I don't
see how any man of the least sensibility could
practice
it; and as for the law, the counsel is so often the
criminal, that there is as little difference between
being at the bar and in the bar, in phraseology as in
fact. The merchant is the great controller of
commerce
,
and the world is indebted more to it for
civilization
than to aught else. It was the commercial
VOL. II.9
spirit which reclaimed this continent from the savages.
Somebody called England a nation of shopkeepers;
they should rather have said a nation of merchants.
No, as far as my vocation goes, I am not only
content
,
but proud.
The law, remarked Bradley, is the great
profession
of this country.
That and counterfeiting, rejoined Langdale.
We are, most of us, counterfeiters, one way or the
other, said Miss Atherton, smiling.
And few of us detectors, retorted Pinckney.
Upon my word, said Langdale, looking at
Pinckney and Miss Atherton, I should like to know
what were the continental relations between you two
abroad.
Like that of the mother country and her
colonies
,
said Pinckney.
Ah! rejoined Langdale; and which of you
threw off the yokesuch rosy bondage would endure
with me for ever.
Yet, said Miss Atherton, in a tone of badinage,
Mr Pinckney is a rebel.
Ha! said Langdale; tell me, Mr. Atherton,
what were the intimacies between this gentleman and
lady abroad?
That's more than I can tell, replied Mr.
Atherton
;
I see they are old acquaintances; but Clara's
tongue must have been pledged to silence, for I never
heard her speak of Mr. Pinckney, that I remember.
Oh! uncle, how can you say so! exclaimed Miss
Atherton. Don't you remember how I used to talk
of the gallant young Southerner, who resisted all my
powers?
Now, I remember me, replied Mr. Atherton; I
do; but, Clara, you had so many strings to your
bow, that I hardly think you can recount them
yourself
.
Come, uncle, that is unjust; you know it; I do
wish, nevertheless, I had the power of coquetryit
must be delightful to use that only weapon a woman
has. But you gentlemen wish to smoke, I know,
and I have received a letter from a friend to-day who
makes inquiries about Mr. Pinckney. If he has any
curiosity he may see it, and I'll send him back to
you in a minute.
So speaking, Miss Atherton rose, when Pinckney
offered her his arm, and they passed alone into the
withdrawing room.
Miss Atherton, said Pinckney, may I ask who
that man, Gordon, is?
Gordon! what Gordon?
The person I saw here this evening.
Really you have a deal of curiosityI am
an equestrian, as you know, and that person having
heard that I had the desire to exhibit my skill in that
way to the citizens here, came to boast of the qualities
of an animal he has, by way of effecting a sale
Where is the locket, if I may ask, which I gave
you in Florence?
Where is the one I gave you?
I am not asking, Miss Atherton, an idle
question
.
Howard, you may take me through the whole
catechism,I have it in my trunk?
Are you certain of that fact?
Now I remembermaybe I have lost itI know
I lost something which you gave me
Pinckney smiled.
Two things, then, which you gave me, Howard,
and the locket is one of them
At this moment the gentlemen entered the room,
and a few minutes afterwards Miss Atherton left them
to themselves.
In the morning, with the dawn, Pinckney was on
horse-back. He reached Holly to breakfast. In a
tte--tte
with Fanny he forgot Bobby's case, until
Pompey, who had been fidgetting in and out of the
room, reminded him of it. He instantly repaired to
the court and heard the crier at the door calling the
name of John Gordon; but no John Gordon answered.
He entered the court, and found the judge on the
bench, and the jury in the box, waiting the coming
of the witness. Bobby was seated near his lawyer
with Peggy beside him. At this moment Jessop, who
had just arrived from the city, entered the bar, and
held a hurried conversation with Mr. Mason, who
arose, and, addressing the court, said:
May it please your honours: I apprehend Gordon
will not be here. In consequence of the information
which I received from the black man whom I
examined
after the court adjourned yesterday, I
despatched
Mr. Jessop to the city last evening: what he
learned or discovered it is not for the purposes of
justice proper to be narrated publicly. Suffice it to
say, that I understood from him that he met Gordon,
the prosecuting witness, in town last night, and left
him at an eating-house at two o'clock this morning,
when Gordon told him that he should not be here
to-day
:
perhaps your honours had better have Jessop
sworn as to that fact.
Jessop was accordingly sworn. He stated that he
met Gordon at Benbow's, whither he himself was
despatched on business, and that he afterwards fell in
with him at an eating-house, and that, as he was
leaving it, Gordon called him back, and told him to
present his compliments to their honours, and say
that if he should not be here in time to-day they
need not wait for him, as he had business of his own,
which was of more consequence to him than the
State's.
Here the prosecuting attorney arose, much against
the wish of Mr. Lupton; and stated that he did not
think it was proper for him to press the case any further,
as from circumstances which had within a few
minutes come to his knowledge, and which he meant
to place before the grand-jury at their next sitting, he
was satisfied that the prisoner was entirely guiltless,
and a much injured person.
I knowed it! shouted old Pompey, who had
followed
Pinckney into court, and who could not
contain
himself; I knowed it, and now everybody
knows it.
Silence, exclaimed the judge. Sheriff, take that
man into custody, and put him in jail
Here Mr. Mason rose and said:
It is so seldom, may it please your honours, that
any debt is paid here, saving that which is set down
`in the bond,' that when the spontaneous one of
gratitude
breaks forth from an honest heart, and from one
of a race, too, on whom ours does not often impose
such claims, that I hope the acknowledgment of it
will not be demurred, and will be forgiven, though
it is not filed according to law. This boy once saved
his humble friend from unmerited punishment, and it
was the noble impulse of gratitude in the bosom of
the African which led us yesterday to the inquiry
which established the innocence of the youth. I
therefore move your honour that the African be
forgiven
his unintentional breach of decorum.
The court countermanded their order to the
sheriff
,
and the jury, after a short address from the judge,
instantly pronounced the prisoner Not Guilty!
Poor Peggy threw her arms round Bobby, and burst
into an ecstasy of tears; her sobs of joy were heard
throughout the court-house above the tumult of
approbation
which his acquittal occasioned. It is a curious
fact in human nature to know, that the sternest
censurers
of Bobby, as he was conducted from the jail the
9*
day before, were now the loudest in their approbation
of the verdict.
When Bobby, attended by Peggy and Pompey,
passed from the crowd, the old coachman observed:
Mister Bobby, the proceedings o' this day has
given me Pompey, as old master would say,
satisfaction
beyond measurebut there's one thing I didn't
like no how: that great lawyer from town, who
pleaded to keep me out of jailcan't he plead, though?
called me an African; now I is not an AfricanI is
an American born and bred, and old master can prove
ithe must ha' been thinking o' Nat Ramsey.
Mr. Mason dined at Holly that day, and was
eloquent
in his account of the trial, dwelling with
deserved
praise on the conduct of Pompey. When the
company had retired from the table Mr. Fitzhurst
remained
behind in his gouty chair, and ordered old
Pompey and all the servants to be called. When
they entered, Mr. Fitzhurst said to Pompey:
Pompey
,
I have been listening to Mr. Mason's and Mr.
Pinckney's account of Robert's trial to day. I
rejoice
to know that the lad is innocent, and I am
highly
gratified with the feelings which you exhibited.
It was certainly wrong in you to interrupt the court,
but the impulse under which you did it was the very
noblest of our nature. I respect and honour you.
You have always been a faithful servant, and I now
find you a noble-minded man, and I have sent for you
before my household to say, that I have got Mr.
Mason
to make out your manumission papers; here they
are. I have settled on you what will make you
comfortable
for life; besides which, I have given you a
spot of ground, and will build you a house on it.
Henceforth and hereafter you are a free man. Give
me your hand.
Master! exclaimed Pompey, I takes your hand
too proud, but I won't take your free papers. I
objects
to it; who'll tend the coach horses when I'm
tending that ground; who'll care for me; who'll take
care of the coach. It would break my heart to see
another coloured person in Pompey's livery on the
coach-box when I ought to be there myself; for I'll
like to know, master, now, who but old Pompey can
drive you over the ruts when you've got the gout, and
not hurt you. You've said that yourself before
to-day
when old mistress talked about another
coachman
.
You see at once, master, it won't do at all.
Well, well, Pompey, said Mr. Fitzhurst,
pretending
to feel a severe twinge of the gout to hide his
emotions; just as you choose, just as you choose. But
I say this to you, that I want you to understand that
henceforth you're your own master.
But, master, I wants you to understand that
you're my master, too. We played together when
we were boys; I waited on you when you grew up;
I've waited on you ever since; and I'll wait on you
till I die.
CHAPTER X.
Ross
felt anything but gratified at his unsuccessful
effort to affix the guilt of robbery on Gordon. If
there is one passion predominant in the heart of a
constable over another, 'tis the desire to be successful
in such operations. And it is very naturalsuch
success
is the means whereby they liveor rather, it is
the source of their most profitable emolument. Beside
the general
esprit de cur
common to his class, Ross,
from his great reputation for success in such matters,
felt peculiarly the dishonour of a failure. It was
touching him in his tenderest point. It was like
doubting the valour of a soldier, the eloquence of an
orator, the skill of a statesman, or the imagination of
a poet. He determined, come what might, without
fee or reward, for the sake of his own honour and
reputation, to follow him up, and fix the guilt upon him,
for guilty he felt satisfied he was.
Ross, besides his constabulary dignity, was the
keeper of a livery stable, and in that way, as Gordon
was fond of swapping and trading in horses, he
became acquainted somewhat with his character.
About eleven o'clock on the night after the
adventure
at Benbow's, Ross hurried from the theatre to his
domicil, and entirely changed his clothes, selecting,
from a number of suits, one which seemed made for
a country wagoner, in which, with great attention to
the character in which he was to appear, he arrayed
himself. From a number of wigs in a drawer he
selected a carroty, uncombed one, which he adjusted
so as entirely to hide his own hair. He then combed
back his whiskers, and, selecting a false pair of the
same colour with his wig, he fixed them carefully to
his face, having, before his glass, four candles lit, that
he might make no mistake. This accomplished, he
opened a box of paints, and with the skill of an artist
adapted his eyebrows to his wig and whiskers. He
then gave his cheeks a saffron hue, tied a coarse
striped neckcloth carelessly round his neck, and
drew on a foxy pair of thick-soled country boots.
Having done these things to his satisfaction, he took
a wagon whip from the corner of the room, and
placing the glass so that he could see his whole form
reflected, he scanned himself closely and
complacently
:
I have learned a great deal from Vidocq, said
he to himself; but now, were he in my place, he
would not hesitate to shave off his whiskers and do
the thing completely; but I think I'll do pretty well
without. To take off my whiskers would be paying
rather too dear for the whistle. I'll step into the
Eagle as I go along, and see if any of the fellows
recognise me.
Thus soliloquising, he left his house by the backway,
without suffering even any of his family to see him.
He walked in the gangling gate of a wagoner, to
whose tread the hard basement is disagreeable, though
it was night, and he could not be observed. He
seemed, when he assumed a character, to possess it
completely. In ten minutes he entered the Eagle,
which was an eating and drinking-house, where many
of his acquaintance resorted. There were some
dozen persons within, eating, drinking, and smoking.
Gaping around as though the establishment was new
to him, he asked:
I say, strangers, does any one of you know a
constable named Ross?
Yes, replied several persons.
What manner of a man may he be?
A tall, good looking man, with big whiskers and a
red cheek, and he dresses very neatly. Why?
replied
one of the party, who was himself a constable,
and a friend of Ross:
Because I wants him on particular business.
Ah! what's turned up
That's the pint I want to see Ross upon.
Well, I'm a constabletell me.
Yes, but you ain't Ross, though, stranger; I reckon
every lawyer what pleads ain't a Squire Mason.
I don't see how in the devil, said the constable,
Ross has got such a name. I'm told he went to
arrest a man for robbery last night; actually found
him in Benbow's, a magistrate, and couldn't come
it.
They say, said the assumed wagoner, that he
can scent out a rogue as a dog would a rabbit.
That may be, replied the constable, but from
what I heard of the business last night, he can't catch
him even when he has earthed him.
Can't! maybe he didn't want to catch him.
Then he ought to be earthed himself, retorted
the constable. A bird in the hand is worth two in
the bush.
You're right, stranger; but if Ross can't do my
business, who in the devil can?
Speak out; what's the matter?
Speak out then, stranger; there would be no use
in either the hand bird or the bush birdsthey'd be a
good ways beyond the reach of the school-boy's salt
upon their tails.
Business is business, retorted the constable, as
Ross says; and if you can't say what your business
is, you can't have it done.
That's a fact, replied the wagoner; is Ross as
high a man as I am?
Taller, but not so thick; black hair and whiskers,
with a touch of high living in his face: lately, since
he's got a namegot his name uphe's given too
much to high living and dandyism, and that
accounts
for the reason why he is not so successful as
formerlybut as I say he's got his name up, and now
he can lie abed.
Why don't you get your name up, then, and lie
abed too? it's bed-time.
Look here, my country friend; if you're for any
high lark, just say so, and I'll give you a bed in the
watch-house in no time.
Thank ye, stranger; I sleeps in my wagon; but I
wants to find Ross.
Go down to Rose Alley, then, and rap him up;
he lives next door to his livery stable.
I'm obliged to you, stranger; I knows the place
in Rose Alley, hey? I'll find him. So speaking, our
wagoner left the Eagle followed by the constable.
Look here, stranger, said that worthy, resting
himself carelessly against the lamp-post in front of the
door; tell us what's the matter?
I'd like to, for I think high of you. I told you
but there's a friend of mine concerned, and he charged
me by all means to tell it to nobody but Ross.
How do you know that I'm not Ross?
By the best of tokens; you're neither tall nor
good looking, nor you ain't no whiskers.
At this the constable turned on his heels and entered
the Eagle again, and our wagoner walked off.
I've learnt a good lesson from Bartlett, said Ross
to himself as he walked away; that puts me in
mindhang ithere I've forgot my pistols; I must
back and get 'em.
Quickly Ross hastened to secure the weapons. The
light suspended from the middle of his stable was yet
burning, and, gliding in the backway, he pocketed
his barkers, and departed. Satisfied with the
trial of his disguise at the Eagle, he proceeded
to fulfil his errand. He avoided the street in which
the Engle was situated, and, taking a direct route,
bent his steps to a less respectable portion of the city.
When he nearly reached the outskirts, he stopped for
a moment and eyed his locality. A broad street,
which soon broke into the open road which led to
Springdale, lay before him, while on his right was an
obscure alley, illuminated by the light of a single
lamp. At its mouth he stopped, and gazed steadily
down the avenue. No voice was heardno light was
seen. I have overstaid my hour, said Ross to
himself
;
I see no light from the window. I'll step down
the alley, at any rate; maybe it is not to be seen from
here.
Accordingly he walked down the alley, which was
without a side pavement, and when he had got about
midway, he looked up at a house which was
better
than its neighbours, but in which the inhabitants
seemed to have retired, as there was no light to be
seen about it. Loitering with a slackened step as he
drew near, Ross observed it with much care, and
passed on to the other end of the alley. Here he
paused a while, irresolute, and returned again. Still
there was no light. He reached the mouth of the
alley, determined to return home, when, in turning
round, he observed a light streaming from the window
of the house we have designated. Instantly he
advanced
towards it, and, after observing the situation of
the candle, which could be seen from the window, he
passed up an alley which divided the house from the
one next to it, and, opening the back door without
rapping, trod, with a loud, careless step, up stairs.
His foot had scarcely touched the first step of the
stairway, when a door was opened at its head above,
and a female voice, said:
Is that you, Jemmy?
Indeed it is; and I am glad to see you, replied
Ross. This is market night at the fish-market, and
I've been kept away, Debby.
Better late than never, said Debby, holding the
light to show our worthy the way.
Pretty big market to-night, said he, quickening
his pace; truck will be dog-cheap to-morrow.
I suspected as much, said the woman, as she
re-entered the room, into which Ross followed,
closing
the door after him.
The apartment in which Ross entered was
scrupulously
clean; but there was nothing in it but what
the necessaries of life required. A bed, a few chairs,
a trunk, with two or three cooking utensils, and an
unpainted pine cupboard, were all the furniture it
contained. The woman was about the middle age,
decent in her attire and demeanor, and evidently one
who had seen better days. She was the widow of a
former partner of Ross's, who had been killed by a
kick from a horse, and who had left her pennyless.
Ross, whose heart was not an unkind one, was in the
habit of assisting her when she could not get work
sufficient
for her maintenance. She was one of that
meritorious class of females, in whose behalf the late
venerable and philanthropic Mathew Carey, just
before
he died, so successfully exerted himself. She
supported herself by taking in sewing.
I thought, said Ross in a whisper, when I
missed the light, that I was too late.
VOL. II.10
No, said she, he came in but a minute ago,
while you, I expect, for I think I heard you go by
(Ross nodded assent), were at the other end of the
alley. He is very uncertain; and I began to think
he would not be here to-night at all. He treats the
poor thing shockingly; and if you could fix anything
on him that would send him to the penitentiary, you'd
serve him right. I know nothing about him, except
that I know him from having seen him one day at
your stable. He don't know me at all; for I was in
the room with you where you keep your accounts, and
I saw him by looking through the window that looks
from it into the stable. I'm glad I happened to hear
you mention his name when I was down there this
morningthey'll take you for my country-cousin
that I told her off. He has inquired before this who
you are. I never should have known you.
How shall I continue to see and overhear him?
asked Ross.
In the closet under the stairs I keep my wood,
replied the widow; and there is only a board
partition
between that and their room, in which there
are large cracks. I removed the wood away from
the largest, and you can see and overhear distinctly:
the door is unlocked, and I have left it ajar; so you
can easily slip down into the closet.
Good! replied Ross, laying his whip upon the
bed, and disencumbering himself of his boots. He
then told the woman to move a chair, so as to hide
the noise of turning the bolt. When he had turned
it, instead of opening the door slowly, which would in
all probability have made it creak, he drew it back
quickly, and prevented that effect. With a step
accustomed
to such purposes, he stole down stairs, and
entered the closet without making the least noise.
Through a broad crack he had nearly a full view of
the adjoining chamber, which bespoke more poverty
than the one above it, without any of its tidiness. A
rag of carpet covered a few feet of the floor
near the hearth, in which there were a few coals; a
bedstead with one leg broken, the place of which was
supplied by a bit of rough board nailed clumsily on,
stood in the corner, with a bed on it, scantily covered,
which, with three chairs, a rough table, and an old
trunk under the bed, composed the furniture. A
kettle and a broken skillet stood in the chimney
corner
.
Gordon sat before the hearth, with his left arm
leaning on the table, on which was a black bottle of
brandy, and a tumbler. He looked out of sorts, and
dispirited.
A woman, careless in her attire, but whose
countenance
and form exhibited the faded remains of what
once had been great beauty, busied herself about the
apartment, seemingly with no other purpose than to
notice, unobserved, her companion, for she drew out
the trunk, and replaced it without taking any article
from itthe while throwing hurried and anxious
glances on him.
Damn it! have done fussing so, said Gordon,
pettishly.
Oh, John! exclaimed the woman, in accents of the
deepest tenderness; I hav'nt seen you much lately,
and I am so sorry to see you troubled; and, as she
spoke, she went up to him and wept upon his
shoulder
,
but he rudely pushed her aside, remarking:
Damn it! why do you come with your tears to
me; be contented now; that hussey that I wanted
you to fix up here for, is not coming: I don't know
that I am ever coming again; so content yourself.
Where's the money I gave you to fit up here.
I have it, JohnI have it.
I don't see that you have spent any of it,
angrily
retorted Gordon, looking round.
No, no! none of it; here it is, said she, rising
from a little stool on which she had thrown herself,
and stepping to her trunk.
Why did you not get it changed, as I asked you?
I'll whale you to death some of these daysyou know
me.
John, I would do anything for youbut not that
not that; let me be honest, in God's name.
Terribly
have I suffered for one violation of the law to
please you; and John, passing this money, and being
convicted of it, would not punish me so much in the
disgrace, as in being separated from you. That's my
fear. No! let me live here, and drudge daily at the
wash-tub or the ironing-table, and hire out when I
canin that way I can support myself; only come
and see me, John, and let me see you oftener,yes,
and I will change the money for you, if it must be so;
but do not ask me to change it to bring another
woman here. John, if you knew my heart, and how
devotedly I love you, you would not so break it.
According to your account of what it stands, I
hardly think there can be any such thing as breaking
it; but that jig's up about that hussey in the country.
I'm a gone man; and if she don't look out, she'll be
a gone woman. Will you change the money?
Yes; but not for her.
Gordon raised his fist in the act of striking her,
when she said:
John, don't strike me; the woman up stairs will
hear you, and she's decent and orderly, and has
promised to get me something to do.
She hashas she! Well, what money have you
got? I don't mean what I gave you;what change
what good money?
Don't speak loud, John; she might overhear you.
I have a half of a dollar, which I got yesterday for
washing; will you have it?
Yes; I shall want it to night. I'm going out to
the tavern at the forks of the road not far short of
Springdale, and the pewter in these times is the best
thing there. The woman up stairs promised to get
work for you?
Yes; and she is quite a decent kind of a body.
She's a widow, and that man we heard go up stairs
is a country friend of her's. I don't know what her
husband was
A country cousin, hey? I expect he's pretty
much of a green horn. He treads like a fellow who
cares not who knows his comings and goings; I can't
tread that way myself of late; I've had dark
misgivings
.
I believe that the liquor I've taken lately has
unnerved meblast it! love your enemies! I'll take
another glass,and he proceeded to fill his cup
accordingly
.
John, don't drink any more; you always seem to
fear most when you have drank the most
Woman, afterwardsafterwards, but at the time
not; the boldest things I've done was then. Want
some?
No, John.
Who do you think I saw last night? If it wasn't
that I have so many fears upon other matters, I'd make
a speculation. Your old mistress.
Who? not Miss Clara?
Yes; she's Miss, or Mrs. somebody; and if it
wasn't for Tom Fenton, who I expect has peached,
I could frighten hush-money out of a certain quarter.
She'd give something for me to keep dark, I reckon.
John, what motive have you to injure her? I am
sure she was a friend of yours in great need; and she
has always been a great friend of mine.
Yes, I understand; very wellwe'll see; but,
by Jove, I know that which will cost her dear. I
suppose you call her a friend of mine in making me
marry you.
10*
Well, John, a friend of mine, then. What harm
can you do her, John?
That's my business.
Did she ask for me, John?
Yes. I told her you were dead.
Where does she live, John?
What! you want to go and see her, do you?
make a call, and prove me a liar?
John, why should you object to my seeing her?
If for no other reason, because I told her you
were dead.
John, do let me go and see her.
Not another word, if you don't want to be knocked
down. Saying which, Gordon filled himself another
glass of brandy, and turned away from the woman,
who, musingly, and with a sorrowful countenance,
gazed into the fire.
CHAPTER XI.
The
silence of Gordon and his wife, for she was
no other, was interrupted by a gentle tap of the widow
from above stairs at their door.
Who is that? exclaimed Gordon, putting his
hands on his breast.
Nobody, John, but Mrs. Baxter from up stairs
shall I let her in? let me put away the bottle first.
Well, you never told her you were my wife, did
you?
Never!
Well, let her in then. I should like to form my
own opinion of her.
Obedient to the order, Mrs. Gordon opened the door
and welcomed in Mrs. Baxter.
It is very late, said the widow, bustling to a chair
which Mrs. Gordon handed her; but this is market
night at the fish-market, and a country friend of mine
wants to make change for a ten dollar bill; have you
got two fives, sir? to Gordon.
The very thing, said Gordon; you're in luck;
ask your friend to walk down and take a friendly
glass with me. Catharine, that change I gave you
the other day. Catharine looked imploringly at
Gordon
,
who took no notice of her, while the widow
remarked
,
rising: Well, you're very kindI'll call
him; and she proceeded up stairs.
For God's sake, John, said his wife to him
when they were left alone; don't pass that money on
him.
For the devil's sake, and that's your own, keep
your tongue, or I'll knock you down. No, then,
he said, as the sudden thought struck him; I won't
pass it on him, you shall do it yourself.
The steps of Ross and Mrs. Baxter were now heard
descending the stairs, and as they entered the room the
widow observed that that, pointing to the disguised
constable, was her friend.
Aha! glad to see you, said Gordon; now is the
time for the country folks to make money. Let's
have a glass to our better acquaintance.
Agreed, said the wagoner. I objects to
liquor much while I'm working, but it comes very
natural to me when I'm from home.
It's good if kept in subjection, said Gordon,
handing
him the tumbler, and apologising for having but
the one; like fire, it's a good servant but bad master.
Have we met before? there's something in your voice
that strikes me, but I certainly can't say that I
remember
you.
Maylike we have metI'm not certainI think
I did see you in market one morning. Do you live
in these parts? My service to you, stranger, and
he swallowed his liquor.
No, no; not exactly. In a big city like this, men,
though, might live forever and never know each other.
How much money do you want changed?
Only a ten dollar bill. I've got word that a friend
of mine living up by Springdale wants to barter with
me for a farm, and I think I'll go there to-morrow
and see if we can't drive a bargain.
Aha! Springdale! are you much acquainted in
that neighbourhood?
No, not the least. I live in the other direction. I
sent out to him yesterday some money that I owed
him, and he sent word that to-morrow he would be
at Springdale.
I mistrust him a little.
What's his name? asked Gordon.
Battleboroughold Job Battleborough. Do you
know him?
No, I don'tI heard of such a man, though.
Catharine, give the gentleman the two fives there, on
the Merchant's Bank.
What's your note?
The Mechanics.
Ah! let's look at it; yes, a good noteit's well to
be careful now-a-days. Catharine, hand the money.
She hesitated, when Ross remarked, I see you
let your wife keep the money, and she hates to part
with it. Mayhaps she thinks that of mine is not
genuine.
I don't know what she thinks! exclaimed
Gordon
,
throwing an angry eye on his wife. I suppose
she ought to be willing to accommodate her
neighbours
;
she says that Mrs. Baxter has been very kind
to her.
I always like to be neighbourly, rejoined Mrs.
Baxter, looking at Mrs. Gordon, as she handed the
money to Ross, while the latter rose, and said:
I'm obliged to you, strangerwhenever I can do
as much for you I'll do it. Good night to you.
When do you go into the country? I'm going
myself, and should like to have company, said
Gordon
,
holding the light and observing the stranger
closely. The minuteness of the inspection caused Ross
to look steadily, but unabashed, in the eye of Gordon,
and to say:
I don't care when, for the matter of that; if I had
my horse here, I'd go to-night.
Where is your horse?
At thethe Eagle, I think they call it.
It's a fine night, replied Gordon. I hate
travelling
alone. What say you to another glass. Then
get your horse, and meet me here in half an hour.
I expect we can trust ourselves together, and keep off
bad company?
Agreed! agreed! They drank over the
proposition
,
and shook hands; Gordon staggering as they
did so, for he was intoxicated, when the wagoner, on
leaving the room, said to Mrs. Baxter, that he had
left his whip in her room and would get it. She
accordingly
went with him.
Give me a pen and ink, said Ross; I don't
want to make myself known to my man at the stable,
and I must take an order to him from myself. I shall
say to him that I left your humble servant at the
theatre. The thing works well, almost too well.
Why run the risk of his company out into the
country, when you know his character? said the
widow. Why not get some officers and take him?
No, he's baffled me once, and I'll show him that
I can play as deep a game as he can. I know the
man at the cross roads; I'll make a first rate police
report of it. He has, by his dress, entirely changed
himselfhe does it well, too.
Well, well; I can't but think you're doing wrong,
Mr. Ross, returned the widow, and I shall lose my
best friend in you.
Must do it, said Ross. How in the world
would I have ever gotten my nameif not for daring
in these matters.
The conversation in Gordon's room was as
interesting
as that above.
John, said his wife to him, you are not going
with that stranger?
I am, certainlywhyyou are always blasting
me with doubts.
Because, my dear John, he eyed you so very
closely when you were looking away from him. I
don't know why it is, but I think he means you some
wrong.
A woman's reason. How does he know but
what I mean him some wrong.
But, don't do itdon't do it, John; think that
here would be this woman to swear that he left the
house with youand about the money, too.
Hang the money! you gave it to him; and they
can't bring the guilty knowledge home to meand,
to put you at ease, nor you, either.
John, I did not hesitate because I thought of
myself
there
he comes down stairs; you must do as
you choosebut I wish you were more of yourself.
He observed you had been drinking.
He did, hey?well, that's the reason he takes me
to be honest; there' something in the fellow's tone
that I have heard beforeor it might have been only
the liquor. But I tell you, if you must know, this,
that I suspect the officers are after me, and if I am
seen in this half-rough country dress of mine with a
countrymen, who'll suspect me? It's a bold stroke
to be off clear to the hills. I believe I was dogged
the other night to a certain place. I could'nt trust
myself to come here till it was dark. Damn it! I've
been in a cellar all day. This woman up stairs has
never seen me before, and she don't know me in any
other dress. I thought that countryman was a
coming
in hereit seems he's gonedid you hear him
go out?
At this moment the door opened, and the widow
entered, saying she would keep them company if
they liked till her friend returned.
Ross proceeded directly to his livery stable,
rejoicing
in the success of his plan, for he had no doubt
that he should be enabled to hear something of the
counterfeiter from his contemplated operations. He
soon rapped his boy up, and gave him the order,
which, as the circumstance had turned up before, and
all turned out right, was instantly obeyed, and
without
being in the least suspected by his hostler, the great
admirer of Vidocq rode off upon apparently an
errand of reckless involvement of his personal
safety.
Before Ross returned to Gordon's the latter left the
house several times as if on the look out, and, on
hearing
the tread of a solitary horse in a brisk trot, he
entered, and announced his approach.
Where is your horse? asked Ross, entering the
room. I staid a bit, for I went to the market to
speak to my man who sells for me.
Up street, was the rejoinder; and, bidding the
women a hasty good night, they went off together.
Gordon, walking by the side of Ross, with his left
hand on his horse's neck, until they got to a shed
which stood upon a common, from which Gordon
led out his animal already caparisoned, and they
rode away.
In a miscellaneous, common-place conversation, in
which each tried to disguise his true character, and
which was not kept up as briskly as it had
commenced
,
owing to the rapid rattling of their horse's
hoofs, our new acquaintances proceeded onward.
The exercise of riding, and the freshness of the night
air, which was invigorating and wholesome, though
it sighed through the forest as if mourning for the
green glories of summer, soon sobered Gordon; and,
not having the most distant recollection of what had
occurred, a morbid suspicion was possessing his
VOL. II.11
mind, which was not only a part of his mental
constitution
,
but which was greatly increased by the
decaying excitement of his frequent potations.
Gordon broke a long silence, after they had
proceeded
some ten miles, by observing:
A damn good horse that of your's, strangeras
far as I can see he's well kept; you must be fond of
a nag.
Did you ever see a farmer that was not? I love
a horse next to my wife and childrendon't you?
Better, maybe, rejoined Gordon. I say,
stranger, here's a housea bit of a tavern, I
suppose
;
yes, there are wagonsand there's a light in
the bar-roomthey be in early to-morrowsuppose
we alight, and take something?
No, I believe not, replied Ross.
Well, you can do as you like; I can't stand this
night air without something. I've been taking too
much this day or two.
I'll wait for you; there, the bar-door is just opened,
so ther'll be not much rapping. Alighting with a
dogged step, Gordon trod heavily into the bar-room
and closed the door after him. In a moment
afterwards
he came out with a glass of brandy in one
hand and a light in the other, and said to Ross:
HereI never drink alone.
Ross accepted the glass, and, as he put it up to his
lips, Gordon exclaimed involuntarily:
By heavens! I know that horsehow came you
with him?
The assumed wagoner, or farmer, started, but
recovering
his self-possession, instantly replied: I
thought, stranger, that you were agoing to charge
me with stealing him; I bought him this morning
from a chap they call Rossa peace officer, I
believe.
I'm a judge of horse flesh, said Gordon after a
pause, which did not suffer Ross to be entirely at his
ease, and I thought I had seen the animal before.
Will you smoke?
No, I thank you.
I'll be with you, then, in a moment, observed
Gordon, and he entered the tavern and returned with
a segar, when he mounted his horse, and they rode on
to the cross roads. A brisk ride soon took them to it.
The regular road to Springdale was here crossed by
another, which led through the valley at the foot of
the hills, and formed a part of that which our readers
may remember was called the old road, and which
our early acquaintances, Pompey and Bobby, trod the
night of Mr. Elwood's husking match. The tavern
which stood at its junction was not remarkable for
its respectability, though it was well known if not
much frequented. The keeper of the establishment
did not bear the best character.
Gordon alighted at the door, and thundered away
with the butt-end of his whip for some time before
there appeared any indications of inhabitancy, saving
the fierce yelping of a cur, mingled with the growl of
a large house-dog. At last a gruff voice asked from
a window up stairs
Who's there?
Tell him, stranger, said Gordon to Ross, for I
expect he knows you better than me.
Travellers, shouted Ross.
Got no accommodations, my friendsit's now hard
unto the morning; you'd better ride on.
Can't do it, said Gordon, and after a
considerable
parley the door was sullenly opened, and our
companions entered. The host, after consulting with
his wife, who occupied together a bed-room adjoining
the bar, which also served for a parlour, said that he
could give them beds in a room back of their's, but
they'd have to take them as they were. This was
assented
to by the travellers. Ross asked to be shown
to it, when Gordon said he would look after his beast,
and went out accordingly, remarking:
I'll soon be backI'm sleepy.
Ross lifted a light which the landlord offered him,
on the promise that he himself would attend to his
beast, and entered his bed-room. Gordon took a light
from a remaining candlestick, and, placing it in a
dark lantern, bade the landlord show the way, which
the publican did. As the latter went before, Gordon
stepped without noise to the window of the room in
which Ross was, and looked through at him intensely.
He observed his companion place his hand in one of
the beds which trembled, and look inspectingly around.
His false whiskers had gotten away so as to exhibit
his natural ones, and his wig was somewhat in the
same predicament.
Ross, muttered Gordon through his clenched
teeth. Yes, it's Ross; he's feeling to see if the
nest's warmthe bird's off. My brave bully of a
constable, you're nearer your last home than I am.
Damn this liquorit will ruin me yet.
Stepping away from the window, Gordon entered
the stable after the tavern-keeper, and said, Hall,
where's Tom?
He did'nt think all was fair, replied Hall, in a
whisper, and he left his bed through the back door
while I was opening the front one for you.
Do you know that man in there, Hall?
No; I did'nt notice him particularly; a friend,
ain't he? you brought him.
It's Ross, the constable.
Damnation, is it?
Yes; his time's near over. Let's shoot him
through the window.
No; no such things in my house. What, if some
of these market folks should hear the crack of the
pistol?
I don't care who hears it. He's on my track after
me like a bloodhoundand he carries it off as if
there was nothing but fun in it. It takes two to play
that game. No man's life is safe with such a dare
devil as that after him. Where's Tom?
Up in the loft, I expect.
Tom, said Gordon, ascending the ladder, and
speaking in an eager whisper. Tom, I say.
Come to me, if you want mesome one may be
below, whispered a voice, lower and more eager
than Gordon's.
Gordon obeyed the request, and, passing along,
felt amidst the hay for Tom's hand, and found it
grasping a pistol.
That's rightyou're ready: there's treason
somewhere
,
Tom.
And on my trail, said Tom, gritting his teeth.
How did you hear it?
From Benbow's account of Ross searching his
housefrom their being after you. It's that matter
of your own at Springdale with that cripple and the
gal that's did the thing. I waited here to-night for
the boys to come with my share of the notes, and I'm
off to Canada or some other diggings. The devil's
delight is kicked up.
I'll go with you! exclaimed Gordon, if you assist
me to revenge myself on Ross: he's in Hall's now.
In Hall's now? whispered Fenton, springing up,
then we're done for. I lay my life he's in this very
barnruin, ruin.
No, he suspects nothing; he's disguised as a
farmer.
Disguised as a farmerhere, and suspects
nothing
,
muttered Tom.
11*
He's after me, thenand only me.
Do your own revenge then, Jack.
Ah! speak low; but he's been after you before
to-day.
Yes, the pair of us. He ought to have his throat
cut.
And we ought to do it; low, speak low. Bully
Ben and Pounder, you say, will be here to-night.
They ought to be here nowhush. Hall will
leave a sign out to let them know things are wrong
there to-nightand they'll come round the back way
here. Bully will make a sign of a cat's mewing.
Tom had scarcely whispered the remark when the
sign was made and returned by his scratching against
the wall.
In a few moments the counterfeiters were huddled
together in the straw, and were made acquainted by
Gordon with the facts familiar to our readers.
Besides
Gordon and Fenton, there were met Bully Ben,
Pounder, and Hall.
Hall objected sternly to any violence in his house.
All this trouble was brought in the camp from
you, Gordon, he said, and that Benbow business.
All from me! said Gordon,all from Ross.
I must leave you, said Hall, he'll suspect
something; you all know what he is.
I know what he is, muttered Bully Ben through
his teeth. He had me, against all law, beat nearly
to death, to make me confesswhen I had neither
judge nor jury. And when I sued him afterwards,
he got off by denying itthough I swore plumply to
it. I was handled worse 'an a nigger, and I'm for
revengerevenge. Let's take him to the cave.
Agreed, said Gordon; the cave. Hall shall
entice him in the front roomno, I'll go in, and while
he's in bed, you must make a rush on him. These
plans were all matured so as to have Tom at the
window to shoot him if he attempted to escape
through it, while Pounder, Bully Ben, and Gordon,
were to make him captive in the room. Gordon then
entered the house with a careless whistle, and found
him seated by the table, reading:
You take it coolly, my new friend, after such a
hard ride, said Gordon, throwing himself on his bed,
carelessly.
Always do, replied Ross.
What may be the matter that you're reading?
inquired Gordon.
I picked up the book after you left, stranger'tis
called the adventures of Burrows, the counterfeiter.
Ha! a great scoundrel.
That's as men think, my friend, replied Ross,
just as men think. The lawyers cheat their clients
the brokers the banksthe banks the peopleand
the counterfeiters all. But counterfeiting is a
commoner
trade than you thinkmany a fair cheeked
girl is but a counterfeit, and sails like a pirate, and
counterfeiters are land pirates, under false colours.
How many men do you think wear false whiskers
and false hair?
You for one, said Gordon, wondering why his
comrades did not enter, and mad at their delay.
Certainly, Gordon, my friend, resumed Ross,
without testifying the least surprise, and both of us
false clothesbusiness is business.
But you're done for, hang you!
No, that's going too fast, Gordon; never count
your chickens before they're hatchedyou're, maybe,
my prisoner.
Not exactly; here, through the window, Tom!
exclaimed Gordon, and as he spoke he sprang to his
feet, while Bully Ben and Pounder rushed in. Ross
made no attempt to escape or to draw his weapons.
His entire coolness astonished the gang into
inactivity
.
Bully Ben held a pistol in his hand, but
made no attempt to use it.
Done like men, gentlemen! exclaimed Ross;
done like menand, let me add without complaint,
gentlemen, who scorn to attack a foe with odds.
You attacked me with odds, cried Bully Ben,
when you had me thrashed in that style.
But it was in the way of business, Ben; and I
gave you a hint afterwards that saved youconfess
the fact.
You said you did, retorted Ben, but I don't
believe
you had the proof against me.
Clearconclusive; but it's wrong in you,
gentlemen
,
to quarrel with me; you seem to think me a
natural enemynot so: I never arrest a man unless
I am satisfied that I can convict himand not always
then. There's policy in warand now, as we're at
peace, there's no policy.
Ha, ha! well, you
are
a buster! exclaimed
Pounder.
Precisely, replied Ross, we're all busters, as
you call them, if we are great men in our lineboys,
you're busters, tooBully Ben's a buster, and as to
Gordon here, he's a buster, equal to the biggest of
you.
But what makes you pursue me in such a way,
like a hell-hound? asked Gordon.
A great mistake, Jack, retorted Ross; didn't
we part fair friends that night at Benbow's? had we
not social glasses this very night? How know you
that I've anything against you? No, you have a
greater enemy than I ever was to you.
Who's that? asked Jack.
Liquor, Jackliquor! said Ross, emphatically.
That's the fact! shouted Bully Ben and Pounder,
while Tom, who had entered the room, struck with
the appearance of things within, and forgetting his
duty at his post, remarked:
That was into Gordon.
Gentlemen, continued Ross, speaking of liquor,
let's have some. Gordon, how did you know
me?
By your whiskers, Rossby your whiskers: your
false ones slipped aside.
Damn them! said Ross, tossing them from his
head with a vexation that astonished the counterfeiters,
and made them look at him with their first expression
of features.
Here, Hall, he continued, bring in the liquor;
boys I was different game from what you thought; I have
nothing against you, but against my whiskers I have
a quarrel. Hall, let's have your shaving apparatus
hereI'd take them off if they sat as closely to my
head as my scalp.
Gordon and his companions called out to Hall to
humour the joke, and preparations were made
accordingly
.
Ross fixed his table and arrayed the lights as
if he were seated in his own bed-room. He
commended
Hall for the neatness of his shaving-cup, and
said he liked the habit of burning spirits of wine in
heating the water, and, as he spoke, he ignited.
But bring the liquor, said he.
It was accordingly brought, and they all helped
themselvesGordon particularlyto a copious
libation
.
Boysor rather gentlemen, excuse the
familiarity
,
observed Ross, pausing from the operation of
lathering his most ample whiskers, as I expect you
always mean to continue in your present honourable
profession, may you live the full measure that the
law allows, and die as it points out. I'll give you
three pieces of advice, which I have learned in my
observations. Firstly; as the preachers would say,
never take an accomplice where you can do the deed
withoutaccomplices entertain often suspicions of
each other, and in that way we constables come to
find you out. A fellow is always wanting to know
where his accomplice is, fearful of being blown.
Secondly; the moment you are arrested hold your
tongues, and make no confessions or admissionsI
know many a man so ruined. Thirdly; always send for
a keen lawyer, and pay him well: And fourthly, and
lastly; always keep on the best possible terms with
the gentlemen of my profession. We often do each
other great servicessecret services that the world is
not aware of, and we respect each other
accordingly
.
In fact, our professions mutually sustain each
other.
Fact! shouted Gordon, tossing himself on his
bed.
At this moment there was heard without the rapid
trampling of horses.
We're betrayed, shouted Bully Ben, aiming his
pistol at the head of Ross and firing, but wide of his
mark. It would not have taken effect, perhaps,
though aimed directly at the body of the constable,
for that quick-witted character, before the trigger was
pulled, jerked the bed-clothes round him. Bully Ben
presenting his shoulder towards the window jumped
through it, sash and all, followed by Pounder and Tom
Fenton. Gordon jumped up, and staggered towards
the window to follow their example, but was thrust
back by Ross, and fell on the bed in a state of drunken
insensibility.
What's all the rumpus, Hall? said Ross, stepping
to the door, and calling out to the landlord, who was
letting in the horsemen.
Nothing, replied Hall, stepping up to him and
replying in a whisper, but a parcel of chaps who
are larking it from Springdale.
It's not the first lark that's nearly cost a man his
life. It's morning, ain't it?
Yes, it's breaking.
While Gordon was prostrated in drunkenness, Ross
proceeded to tie him, while the counterfeiter muttered
to himself: Catharine, mind me nowwe'll fix him,
Tomdie dogshang liquor.
After accomplishing his purpose, Ross resumed his
seat before the looking-glass, and finished shaving
himself with great deliberation, making this internal
reflection, as he looked at Gordon:
Damn him! I thought well of him until I saw his
treatment to the woman. He can go it with a rush.
I suppose I must take him to Springdale jail, as that's
the nearestnot very safe, though. What's that my
business; all I've got to do is to cage the bird. The
other fellows are clean gone, except Tom Fenton
he's got, what they say I have, the bump of
adhesiveness
.
He'll haunt about here till he's nabbed. I've
that bump, by-the-by, myself, or I never should have
held on so long to my whiskers. Then surveying
himself in the glass, he continued: I don't know
but what I look more like a gentleman without
'em.
Ordering his breakfast in the room where Gordon
lay, Ross had a knife and fork placed for his prisoner,
and awoke him. Gordon glanced wildly round, while
the full force of his situation broke over his bewildered
faculties, and he exclaimed:
No, no; give me brandybrandy!
Proceeding to get it himself, Ross handed it to him
with the remark:
I told you, Jack, it was your worst enemy.
Gordon gulped it down without a word, and, in a
half of an hour afterwards, Ross had him seated in a
wagon, which he drove himself, and conveyed him
safely to the Springdale jail.
VOL. II.12
CHAPTER XII.
From
motives of humanity, when Ross returned
to the city, which was immediately on his securing
Gordon in jail, he called to see Mrs. Gordon, and break
to her her husband's fate, and contribute his mite to
the relief of her distress.
The afflicted woman had been out till past
dinner-time
,
roaming the streets in the hope of getting some
employment to obtain a meal, and with a vague
anticipation
that she might see or hear something of her
former mistress, and thereby gain an opportunity,
after extorting a promise from her not to do Gordon
any injury, to inform her of his threats; for her
gratitude
to Miss Atherton was ever abiding in his
memory
,
and like a fountain ever flowing. Her efforts
had been vain in tracing her mistress, or obtaining
food. She could not bear the idea of begging, and
she returned to her wretched home to endure as she
might the gnawings of hunger.
While she sat on her little stool, with her face
buried
in her hands, thinking sad thoughts, Ross, who
had rapped twice unheard by her, entered the room.
Its gloomy appearance, and the more than gloomy
appearance of the woman, struck even his feelings,
used as they were to scenes of wretchedness and
sorrow
.
She arose, and respectfully offered him a chair.
He took it, and telling her who he was, and what he
was, informed her of Gordon's imprisonment in the
Springdale jail to await his trial.
Then you were here last night? said she.
I was; and I saw enough of you to respect you.
Gordon, if you can, you should forget. I tell you
plainly, there is no chance for him; if he escapes an
indictment for counterfeiting and another for perjury
against a boy, I think they'll fix on him the robbery
of Mr. Pinckney.
Mr. Pinckney! what Mr. Pinckney?
A gentleman who is a friend of Mr. Langdale,
one of our richest merchants.
Do you know, sir, where Gordon was, besides at
Mr. Benbow's?
Certainly; and I don't see what he was doing there
unless to beg off from Mr. Pinckney, but he was at
Mr. Langdale's. Jessop tracked him.
Mr. Langdale's! where is Mr. Langdale's?
In Washington Square, number . Maybe you'll
find there the lady that you and he were talking of
your old mistress.
Catharine looked at Ross in bewilderment, but
spoke not.
I wish I had those ten dollars to return to you;
but if I must go to prison, can't you put me where
John is.
I've no authority to take you to prison, and
wouldn't exercise it if I had, said Ross. I did
my duty in arresting Gordon, and I shall be well paid
for it. I'consider that I owe you ten dollars, and here
they are.
No, no; let me work for you, and repay you in
that way.
Certainly, you shall, said Ross; here, take the
money, and I'll send you round some work, or call
with my wife and see you about it.
Expressing her gratitude more by manner than
words, Catharine took five dollars, refusing to take
more, and Ross left her.
Fixing her scanty dress with as much skill as
possible
,
Catharine proceeded directly to Mr. Langdale's,
and, entering the area, asked the servant for Miss
Atherton.
Tell her Catharine Gordon, said Catharine, and
she'll see me, looking over her dress.
Hesitating for a moment, the servant went and soon
returned, telling Catharine to follow her. She was
conducted to a splendily furnished bed-room, where
Miss Atherton sat in a voluptuous dishabille.
Shut the door after you, said Miss Atherton,
quietly to the servant who lingered on the threshold.
Catharine is that you? she said, advancing with
emotion, and taking the hand of her former maiden;
I'm glad to see youI heard you were deadbut
sorry you have so much altered. You are in distress.
Deep, deep! exclaimed the servant-maid,
shaking
all over with emotion; in body and in soul, in
heart, in health, in hoperuined and undone
forever
.
Merciful father! what can I do for you? will
money relieve you?
It's strange, Miss Clara, but something seems to
bind me in my darkest hour to you. Gordon told
you I was dead?
He did, said Miss Atherton. Sit down and tell
me what has happened to you? After he left you,
you followed him.
I did; but first excuse me, Miss Clara: you know
the character of Gordonhe is now in jail, at a
place called Springdale, for counterfeiting and other
crimesexcuse mebut can he in any way do you
any injury?
Me an injurywhy, Catharine?
Because, last night when in his cups hebut you
promise me to tell it to no one to his harm
Certainly not; I'll only use what you tell me in
self-defence.
Miss Clara, I owe you so much that I am bound
to tell you what he said: he threatened you, and said
if he was not so much taken up with his own risk
that he could get hush-money out of somebody, whom
I thought he meant you.
Me!where did you say Gordon was? confined
at Springdale, was it not? about twenty or
twenty-five
miles from here. Did he ever tell you any way
in which he could injure me?
Never, replied Catharine; I have only been
with him a few months; he left me behind in the old
country. At times he would speak against you; but
I don't think he liked you after you made him marry
me.
Likelythat's it. Now tell me about yourself,
Catharine.
I've not much to say, Miss Clara. After John
married me, and we quit service with you, he threw
off restraint, and became much wilder. We got very
poor, my child died, and he took me to London,
where, in a few months, after trying to make me an
outcast, he abandoned me, and came to this country.
I followed after him in the next ship, and after a
world of trouble, and search, and sorrowspending
all the little money I had, and working for my daily
bread, and roaming from city to city, and sometimes
giving up in despair,by accident I met him one day
in the market in this place. He was mounted on a
horse, and had several men who seemed like jockies
talking to him. He always would gamble. I went
up to him, and called him aside to speak to him. He
looked surprised and angry at first, and the next
minute told me to say my say out before company.
12*
He then turned from me to his friends, and said,
nodding
his head at me, that there was game. I could
not bear itI burst into tears, and walked away.
He followed me at some distance, and damned me
for leaving home; but I begged and prayed with him
so at last that he took me to a miserable room from
the house where I was livingwherebut I won't
speak of his treatment to me. He has been getting
worse and worse; more dissipated and more, until
he is now in prisonand the poor thing wept
bitterly.
My God, woman, why did you live with him
why did you not annihilate him! exclaimed Miss
Atherton, stamping her foot on the floor.
O! Miss Clara, if you had loved as I have, the
ground he trod upon, though it were the desert,
would be more to you than paradise without him
the darkest night brighter than the brightest day
poverty, misery, and the world's scorn with him,
better than the world's wealth without.
I traced those feelings in you, or you never should
have married him. I pity you from my soul. How
dare any man to outrage so a woman's feelings
feelings such as yours were! Give up all notion of
him, and let him die a blasted convict.
I can'tI can't! exclaimed Catharine. You
can't make the heart young again; the roots of the
knotted oak can never be tendrils againthey can
never be transplantedin the bosom of the earth
where they grew up in their strength they must be left
or withereven to expose them is withering.
You speak truly of some hearts, I believe, said
Miss Atherton, with a brow which bore the stamp of
passion and power, but not of all. I respect your
womanly affection, but I trust, for the happiness of
my sex, that such is to be found oftener in romance
than in reality. Catharine, you must feel no false
delicacy with meI have abundant wealth, and will
assist you; were I in your situation and you in mine,
remembering the past, I would both ask and expect
it of you. So speaking, Miss Atherton handed her
several gold pieces. You must get whatever you
wantclothes, and whatever else, and tell me. Let
none of this go to fee some pettifogging lawyer who
won't know the first principles of the case. If there
is any hope for John, I will see that he has able
counsel. Come and see me to-morrowbe punctual,
Catharine; no foolish errand to Springdale to see him
and let him couzen or beat your money from you; he
is better as he is: if he has not money he will get no
drink but what is good for himand abstinence from
intoxication may reform him.
Here the servant entered with a card in her hand,
which she gave to Miss Atherton, which the lady
looked at peculiarly, and said:
Tell Miss Fitzhurst that I will be down in a
moment
;
and say to my maid I do not want her.
Catharine, she continued to Gordon's wife, you
shall fix my dress for me; it will not be the first time,
and may not be the last.
My fingers are all thumbs now, Miss Clara,
said Catharine, smiling at the memory of brighter
days; but I'll trythe washing-tub and
floor-scouring
have unfitted me for such a duty. How I
used to love it. You used to be easier fixed than
other ladies, and never found fault.
I am not as patient as I used to be; but no matter
some of these days maybe you will be with me
again, and we'll make these men behave better. No,
Catharine, these plain pearl ear-rings, they become
blacknow, that solitary ring. Call and see me
to-morrow
,
Catharine, or this afternoonor to night, if
you feel like it, and if I am not engaged we'll talk
over other times. Be of good cheerthese men,
Catharine, have a maxim, my girl, that faint heart
never won fair lady, and we women must have,
for our maxim, this: that faint lady never won or
kept false manso there shall be no heart in our
maxim at all. Good bye.
Good bye, Miss Clara; God forever bless you,
said Catharine, descending the steps behind her former
mistress, and dwelling upon the splendour of her
peerless
beauty.
The ladies met like two who had been anxious to
see each other, from what they had heard mutually
of the other's personal and mental attractions. Miss
Atherton was some years the elder, and the
impression
of intellectual superiority and great womanly
tact and observation sat upon her brow. Perhaps
Fanny's first impression of her new acquaintance was
that she was a thought too worldly in her manner;
but it passed away from her mind in five minutes.
Miss Atherton thought she saw in Fanny something
of what she herself had been, or might have been but
for the pastsomething, but she felt their characters
were different naturally. Though her brow was
sunny as the marble when the sunlight falls upon it,
yet a cloud crossed her heart when Fanny, in making
the apology of her father's sickness for her delay in
calling, added:
Mr. Pinckney was to have escorted me, Miss
Atherton; but some involvement of his affairs from
the low price of cotton compelled him to go to Mr.
Mason's, the lawyer; so I determined, as I came in
expressly to see you, that I would not be deprived,
by any further untoward circumstances from making
your acquaintance.
I hope your father is better? inquired Miss
Atherton
.
Much better. Several pleasant occurrences of
late have relieved him; and Fanny spoke of Bobby's
trial and Pompey's conduct, saying how much it had
gratified her father.
I hope Mr. Pinckney's loss is not great? inquired
Miss Atherton.
I don't know exactly its extent, rejoined Fanny,
who, not knowing why, could not refrain from
blushing.
Caught, thought Miss Atherton to herself; she'll
have him if he were pennyless; she's proud, and
would be proud to show her disinterested love.
Pinckney has not told her of ourselvespride again.
This thought of the instant passed through her
mind, when she asked Fanny if she had ever heard of
Gordon, the counterfeiter. In reply to which inquiry,
Fanny gave an account of his conduct to Peggy and
Bobby, and of his desire to marry the former. After
a very long call, Fanny took her leave, pressing Miss
Atherton to call and see her soon, and explaining that
they were not spending the winter in the city in
consequence
of her father's gout.
I promise you, replied Miss Atherton, that the
first fair dayday like thisthat occurs, the day after
to-morrow, if it's that day, I will ride out and see
you. I am determined, if you will allow me, to know
you well. They shook hands and parted.
A beautiful woman, thought Miss Atherton as
she viewed her own fair proportions in the glass;
beautifuland my good friend Howard has caught
her heart. Can he have lost his fortuneno, I don't
believewould I be very sorry? I ought to be. It
will require a woman of more determination of
character
to make a distinguished man of Pinckney than
my visiter. Can't I get him back? he treats me with
so much the air of an escaped bird that won't be
caught again. I must to Springdale; I must know
something about this Gordon. I suspect, andI
wonder if Howard had any particular feeling other
than the call of business which kept him away.
Her reverie was interrupted by the announcement
of Pinckney's name. He entered, and looked black
when on inquiry he learned that Miss Fitzhurst had
called and left. He staid but a few moments, and
took his leave.
He tries my woman's temper to the uttermost,
soliloquised Miss Atherton, when the door closed on
himto the uttermostwhy he was once the
creature
of my smiles.
Fanny expressed herself to Pinckney in the most
unbounded terms of admiration of Miss Atherton.
Howard, she said, laughing, you'll make me
jealous if you go there much.
Ah! I fear Fanny that I not only shall not go
there, but shall be absent from you for two or three
weeks. My affairs, I believe, will compel me to go
to New York. I am in hopes that my visit will make
all right. That Mr. Mason is certainly a splendid
man; it is a treat to talk with him and Langdale. I
wish often, Fanny, that I had studied one of the
professions
;
in this country there seems to be something
in the very atmosphere which requires a man to be
employed. But we must go to Europe in the Spring,
and I will there prove to you that I have not flattered
you, and show them what flowers grow in America;
but your city has already shown them that.
And Miss Atherton,
Yes; but her's is a beauty to please a boyone
who has not seen the world.
O! no, not always so, Howard; think how Mr.
Langdale speaks of her. I shouldn't wonder if they
made a match.
Ah! would you not? I hope that Sidney will
return
before I go. My dearest Fanny, the pain of
separation, but for so short a time, will make me feel
more desolate than when I stood upon the shores of
Europe an utter stranger.
In a few days Pinckney left Holly for New York.
His parting with Fanny had that pleased anxiousness
which we may suppose two lovers to feel who, by
separate pathways that join ere long, have parted for a
moment, each to pluck a flower, which they meant to
present in exchange when they met again as a token
of their everlasting love, and that thereafter they
should part no more.
CHAPTER XIII.
Miss Atherton
kept her promise, and made an
early return of Fanny's call. As the ride was a
long one, she spent the day and night at Holly, and
they had a long
tte--tte
together. How soon under
such circumstances an intimacy ripens.
Saddened by Pinckney's absence, and gaining no
comfort from her visits to Sarah, who was sadder,
and dared not impart her feelings in sympathy, Fanny
sought the excitement of the city to relieve the
lone-liness
which, in spite of her efforts, pressed upon her
heart. She made her home with Miss Atherton at
Langdale's. She found in the gay circle of fashion
that Miss Atherton was all the talkthe envy of the
belles, and the toast of the beaux. The admiration
she excited seemed so common to her that nothing
in her manner indicated her consciousness of it.
And Langdale, with his intellect and manner, and
full appreciations of beauty and address in woman,
how he delighted to seat himself upon the sofa between
them and spend the joyous hours! He knew so well
the art of pleasingand he had known so much of
the sorrows and selfishness of existence, that
whatever
could lend a charm to it he garnered with a
miser's care to enjoy with a poet's sensibility. He
scanned the beauties, from their silken slippers to
their slightest curl or ribbon, with that feeling of
delicate perception that made the minutest touch in
the poetry of life a minister to his enjoyment. How
quietly, yet shrewdly, he would comment upon any
little trait of character he had seen exhibited in
society, and with a tact that gave it the interest of
a novel: or if literature was the theme, who that
heard men could fancy him the keen man of the
world, who knew the interest table so well, and had
turned it to such good account amidst day-books, and
ledgers,draymen and hogsheads; yet the truth is,
that it was this contrast that gave such a zest to his
enjoyment of the society of his inmates; and how
quickly he anticipated any little want in his
household
which would or might contribute to their
gratification
;
the fanciful bird-cage and its glittering
inmate
,
if it struck his eye in the street, was so
unostentatiously
,
if attainable, conveyed to his home. The
richness of the hot-house, the varieties of the exotics,
some beautiful specimen of statuary, some rare
fossil
,
some glorious painting, if met with, he made his
own, to contribute if but to a moment's pleasure.
And amidst it all the cares of business clouded his
brow not an instant, or gave to his thought and
presence
of mind the least abstraction. If some
merchant-friend
dined with him, whose soul was wrapped
up in sordid traffic, Langdale continued the
conversation
,
not only to make him pleased with himself,
but amusing to his inmates, and when he left, with
what a quiet good humour he would trace some trait
of his character, or tell some tale of him on change,
but without the least malicescandal he despised.
Miss Atherton, who had seen the world thoroughly
and in its highest circles, would often wonder to
herself
over his powers of pleasing, while Fanny, in
listening
to him, would forget for the moment even
Pinckney.
One day, when Fanny and Miss Atherton were
VOL. II.13
together in the latter's chamberit was one of those
gloomy days of autumn when the fire looks so pleasant
within and everything so unpleasant withouton such
a day, while Fanny was busied with a bit of
fancywork
,
Miss Atherton was busy in rummaging in her
trunks among a number of letters and trinkets, when
looking up, she said:
Fanny, what a dull dayit's enough to give one
the horrors to look out; yet everything within,
nevertheless
,
is not unjoyous. It's a day that makes one
look back; don't you think so? I always call them
your confidential days.
That's a good term, replied Fanny; 'tis
strange, indeed, how our feelings change with the
weather. I can't say that I have been moping all
the morning, but I have a kind of pleasing
thoughtfulness
upon me. From your pile of letters, and your
being a single lady, I can judge what kind of
reminiscences
you are calling up.
As to that, maybe you are mistakenbut here
I have a whole trunk full of lettersfrom belles and
beauxfriends and foes; from foolish old lords and
gay young gentlemeneven down to a servant maid,
Are you fond of poetry?
Very, indeed.
I suppose every young gentleman who rhymes
thinks he writes poetry. Here's a scrap from a
certain
gentleman to a certain friend of mine, upon the
gentleman's understanding that the lady was engaged
It is called:
DESPONDENCY.
I'm
sad: there is a pall of gloom
Above me in the sunny sky,
As if the spirits of the tomb,
With their dark train, were sweeping by.
I feel like him, whom tyrant's chain
Bound to the dead in days of old,
I feel my pulse in heart and brain
In the world's contact growing cold.
I'm sad: for thy sweet dreams to-night,
Fair spirit of my song and soul,
Not hither will they take their flight
Or spread around me their control:
Another has thy plighted vow,
And soon the yielded hand he'll take,
And press the kiss upon thy brow,
And thou for him will then forsake
The worldand he for aye will be
The world, and the world's law to thee.
I'm sad: for had we met before
Ere yet that plighted vow was spoken,
I might havebut no more, no more
I bear within the bitter token.
I might have loved thee with a love
Which even in despair is true,
Which day by day should seek to prove
Daily the deeper debt were due.
I might have loved thee as he loved
Who gave the world for smile like thine,
And marked its changes all unmoved
If I had clasped thy hand in mine.
I might have loved thee, and thy smile
Had flung a blessing on my brow
As deep as in the darkening wile
That dwells upon my spirit now.
I might have loved thee, might I do
As much as though I now might woo.
There, don't you think that gentleman loved and
meant to love, though hopelessly! exclaimed Mrs.
Atherton, laughing, and laying the MS. on the table
beside her.
It sounds in that fashion, replied Fanny; and I
like what seems to be the intenseness of his feelings.
Feelings! now, Fanny, do you think that any one
ever sat down to write poetry who felt at the time.
So the writers of it say, replied Fanny; and
I can fancy nothing more natural. We see a friend
to unburden our hearts; and why not, when we have
no friend, to make our pen oneas somebody talks of
a lover breathing his mistress's name to the flowers.
Oh! you are thinking of Hudibras! exclaimed
Miss Atherton:
`I'll carve your name on barks of trees
With true love knots and flourishes.'
Fanny blushed, and Miss Atherton continued:
listen to this: here's an extract from the same writer,
but in humble prose:
`Whom could I love but thee! In the world I've
left behind mea wide continent through which I
travelledI saw none who for a moment attracted my
attention. Here, in this bright land, where beauty
assumes its loveliest forms, and borrows all the graces
of poetry and the artsthe cultivation of centuriesstill
I passed on indifferent to the living though not to the
dead, until I saw theethen whom could I love but
thee? and from that hour, of whom else have I thought?
why do I linger here when friends are calling me to
my distant home, sunny as this, but that thou art all
the world to me, and I have no home but in thy smile!
Last night when I saw you with the gay flatterers
around you, to whom you listened seemingly with so
pleased an ear, whose ear did I seek if not thine
and was it not deaf to me? why sometimes then have
you smiled on me? was it with the Syren's wish to
beckon through flowery paths to destruction? yet but
smile if you only act it, let me but be near you
`Let me but breathe
The blessed air that's breathed by thee,
And whether on its wings it bear
Healing or death, 'tis one to me.'
In the name of mercy! exclaimed Fanny,
smiling, as Miss Atherton stopped, what became of
that swain forlorn.
What became ofhim! he's still in flesh, I presume
still in fleshmen have died and worms have eaten
them, et cetera. Don't you think a school-boy, upon
the instant, could finish the quotation? `but not for
love.' Listen to this:
`Hope has been called a flatterera sycophant;
yet she is the only sycophant and flatterer who
forsakes
not the wretched, but whose smile grows
warmer as their wretchedness increases. To all the
living she is a bosom friend, and she forsakes not
even the dead, for she haunts the grave of the departed,
and visits the sleepless pillow of the bereaved with the
promise that the severed shall meet again. And O!
after such a promise how sweetly slumber visits the
eyelids of that lonely one. Then why am I so
forsaken
that she comes not to me? In vain I court her
smile, and solicit her to promise me, when you frown
upon me, one impulse of cheerful existence for the
future. But no! she acts towards me as your slave,
and you forbid her to visit me with even a whisper
that is gladdening. Oh! beloved '
13*
Read the name out, interrupted Fanny; read
the name out, O! beloved
Clara
.
Could you think, exclaimed Miss Atherton, that
so hopeless a youth would dare to practise the
profanity
of using such a beloved one's Christian name?
No! were it you, he'd have to say `O! beloved Miss
Fitzhurst.' If hope had been your slave, as he
represents
,
and you had told her to smile upon him, then
it might be `O! beloved Fanny.' Our sex seldom
rise to the dignity of the solitary surname, such as
Csar, Washington, Napoleon, except in mythology;
for instance, Hopeshe's a female and flirt, and yet
we always call her plain Hope.
The sex is known by the character without the
designation, said Fanny, laughing. I wonder if
ever she flittered into this gentleman's presence again!
Do let me see a scrap of his hand-writingthey say
it shows the character, and I fancy his must be
excessively
tremulousthat scrap of rhmye, if it has not the
name.
Yes, it is a tremulous hand, replied Miss
Atherton
,
handing to Fanny the MS. of the lines on `
Despondency'
with a careless hand, but a peculiar smile.
Astonishing! exclaimed Fanny; how much the
hand-writing is like that of Howard, of Mr. Pinckney.
And his initials! said she, in a faltering tone,
dropping
the paper from her hand. Deceived, and so
cruelly.
Miss Fitzhurst, how agitated you are! exclaimed
Miss Atherton, in a tone of apparent alarm. I
regret
exceedingly that the discovery of this secret, or, I
should rather say, this mere fact, should so much agitate
you. I did not fancy that Mr. Pinckney was other
to you than an acquaintance; and you must do me
the justice to say, under what I presume are existing
circumstances, that it was your joke upon his
hand-writing
,
and your expressed wish to see it, that caused
me to show it; beside, hand writings, now I reflect,
may be alike, and this you are not certain, are you,
this is Mr. Pinckney's?
You know it isbut no matterit is immaterial,
said Fanny, making an effort to resume her work.
Read on.
Not for worlds! exclaimed Miss Atherton: not
for worlds! I assure you, Miss Fitzhurst, that there
is nothing in my feelings and relations towards Mr.
Pickney which does not leave him free as air.
Whatever rights of explanation there are arising
from this unfortunate little incident, they rest
entirely
between you and Mr. Pinckney. Indeed, if
I had, for a moment, fancied the possibility of
anything unpleasant to your feelings occurring in
this careless examination of my trunk, I would have
locked it up forever, and have thrown the key into
Lethe. I repeat, therefore, that there is nothing in
my feelings or relations towards Mr. Pinckney which
does not leave him perfectly free to act; and if you
feel yourself so placed towards himit never crossed
my brain for a moment as to need of him an
explanation
,
I beg and pray of you that you will mention the
precise manner in which you discovered his
communication
to myself. Among those many packages
which you see there spread out, which, as I told you,
are from a variety of persons, from lords to
waitingmaids
,
it was by the merest accident I chanced to
light upon a stray letter of his; one of the extracts
was not hisand I forgot that he was not now in
Europe. These little effusions have no effect upon
myself; I look at them as the offerings of a gallant,
gay, young gentleman, who was then fresh from the
poets, and who would not write so wildly now, though
he might be truly and devotedly in love. I though
you looked at them in that light yourself, for you may
remember we laughed heartily over themnot that
they are not remarkably well written, but from their
excessive professions of hopeless attachment. I hope
you thoroughly comprehend my feelings in this matter,
Miss Fitzhurst?
Thoroughly, said Fanny, thoroughly.
Indeed, Fanny, I hardly know how to advise
you. I had heard that Mr. Pinckney was attentive
to you; so I have heard that Mr. Bradley was. Mr.
Pinckney I had heard so often here and in other places
given away, that I continued to hold him a gallant
devoted to our sex at large. Indeed, I do not know
how to advise you.
To whom else have they given him? asked
Fanny, trying to force a smile.
To whom? such things so escape my memory. Ah!
I have heard Colonel Bentley say, by-the-by, a friend
of your family's, Fanny, that he thought at one time,
to use his expression, that our Lothario was smitten
with Miss Grattan; so you see how utterly ignorant I
was that the discovery of his hand-writing in
badinage
to anybody could give you a moment's
uneasiness
.
I dare avow, now, that Mr. Pinckney, in his
interviews
with you, never mentioned that he knew me
abroad but casuallydid he?
He did notbut
Hear me, one moment, Fanny. No one has ever
heard me speak of him in any way but as a Lovelace.
Your brother, intimate as they are, I do not believe
ever heard him mention my name, except as one that
he had met and admired. Not even in his letters from
abroad, where he was, with the same pen and ink in
his hand with which he wrote to him, puzzling his
brain to concoct these
billet-doux
to me. Pardon me
but I think I can guess a little at what may have been
understood by you as regard to his feelings towards
you, but you never heard him mention me but as a
casual acquaintance.
No, never. Don't let's talk in this wayit's
nothing, said Fanny, deeply blushing.
Well, resumed Miss Atherton, to show you the
light in which I view these little communications, I
have never mentioned to a soul that he ever showed
me any attentions abroad whatever. In truth, it
would be excessively unpleasant to me to have my
name brought into the matter in any way. Should it
be, let me not be thought too urgent in requesting
in repeating the requestthat you will fully explain
my innocent and unconscious agency.
It's wearing late, said Fanny, rising; it is time
for us to prepare for dinner; and she arose from her
seat, when Miss Atherton took her hand, and,
impressing
a kiss upon her brow, walked with her to
her chamber door.
Poor Fanny! compressing her lips together, she
leaned against her bed in speechless agony for several
minutes, when, by a strong resolution of her will, she
made her toilet, and entered the withdrawing room
a moment after Miss Atherton, where she found Mr.
Langdale standing by her side, while she was
preparing
to play on a most tasteful harp which that
gentleman had just purchased.
Are you unwell, Miss Fitzhurst, said Langdale
to her, on observing her pale brow.
No, sir; not at all.
A little sorrowful only, said he; then come, coz,
play for Miss Fitzhurst Moore's beautiful song`O
soon return.'
No; let me sing you a song of your friend, Mr.
Pinckney, which was written abroad, and was popular
with the Americans there. I like the tune, if I don't
believe entirely in the hopelessness of the sentiment.
So speaking, she sang the following lines, to which
Langdale listened attentively, attracted as he was, not
only by the gracefulness of her form, which her
attitude
at the harp so finely developed, but by the
softness
of her tones, and the distinctness of her
enunciation
;
in which last particular she did not prove
herself
a follower of fashion.
O! BLAME HER NOT.
O! blame her nother love was deep;
And if her heart was lightly won,
Her memory will the vigil keep,
And let her's be the only one.
In vain would we control the heart
The farthest river seeks the sea,
And thus, though they be far apart,
Her fancy is no longer free.
If heedless in the mazy dance,
And careless of the flatterer's tone,
Remember, that indifferent glance
Is but the wish to be alone.
There
is no
cure within the crowd,
It but renews the deep regret;
For there, when the false-hearted vowed,
She promised never to forget.
And though but one that promise heard,
And though that promise he forgot,
The faithful maiden keeps her word
O! blame her notO! blame her not.
There, sir! exclaimed Miss Atherton, rising, and
bowing to Langdale's compliments, I have
christened
your harp for you with your friend's song; it
is a beautiful instrument of most delightful tone. I
must say of all the gentlemen I have met in two
continents, that a certain coz of mine knows best
how to charm his guests. Won't you endorse that,
Fanny?
With my whole heart, said Fanny. Mr.
Langdale
,
can you tell me when the mail goes
eastward
?
Ah! said Langdale, I may quote your friend
and my friend's song to you, and apply it to you
both
`Thus, though they be far apart,
Her fancy is no longer free.'
This afternoon, Miss Fitzhurst, at five o'clockthe
mail closes at half-after-four. Do you know, Miss
Fitzhurst, that this song of our friend's, of which my
fair coz seems to have exclusive possession, reminds
me of a suspicion which has often crossed my
mind?
What is that, Mr. Langdale? asked Fanny.
Why, that our friend, Pinckney, and this coz of
mine, know more about each other in relation to
themselves than we wot of. I have thought it often,
have not you?
Why should I? said Fanny, turning pale.
I cannot give any conclusive reason, replied
Langdale, but my surmises are strong. He makes
me jealous, I assure you. You know your power
therefore, from a selfish motive, I beseech you keep
him closer to your side when he returns.
Miss Atherton struck the keys of the harp, as if she
were unconscious of what was said, and, dinner being
announced, they each took an arm of Langdale, and
proceeded to the dining-room.
Fanny in vain endeavoured to make a show of
dining. As soon as she could she withdrew to her
chamber, and, after gazing vacantly into the street
for some time, she took pen and paper, and,
addressing
Pinckney, wrote as follows:
Miss Fitzhurst's compliments to Mr. Pinckney,
with the return of the presents and letters she has
received
from Mr. Pinckney. She hopes by the next
mail to receive her's. Miss Fitzhurst would remark,
that if, hereafter, either business or pleasure should
bring Mr. Pinckney to , that she considers
that no courtesies heretofore existing between them
will require his appearance at Holly. On the
contrary
should Miss Fitzhurst and Mr. Pinckney
ever meet, it must be on the footing of entire
strangers.
Making up a package of his letters and presents,
and enclosing them in the above, Fanny called her
servant, and, giving him the means to pay the
postage
,
ordered him to take it immediately to the
post-office
.
This done, she locked her door, and,
throwing
herself on her bed, gave loose to her bitter
feelings
.
Miss Atherton was standing at the front door as
the servant descended the steps, where Langdale had
just left her, and, observing the letter in his hand, she
asked:
Ay, John, is that for me?
No, Miss, he replied, holding up the letter so
that Miss Atherton could read the direction; it is a
letter that Miss Fitzhurst has ordered me to put into
the post-office.
You had better make haste then, John, or you
will be too late for the mail; and the menial
hastened
on his errand.
VOL. II.14
CHAPTER XIV.
When
Gordon was committed to jail, he summoned
all the energies that guilt and inebriety had left him
to escape the consequences of his crimes. He
inquired
of the jailor the morning after his commitment
if Mr. Bronson was in the village; and learned from
him that that worthy had been absent from Springdale
some time, and had not yet returned. Daily he made
the fruitless inquiry, and almost momently he was
casting his eyes round the walls of his prison devising
some mode of escape; but his appalled heart throbbed
thick with the consciousness that without assistance,
strongly ironed as he was, that even that jail, so inferior
in strength to the city jail, would hold him until justice
consigned him to the penitentiary.
He wondered if to that unguarded prison window
Bully Ben or Pounder, or Tom Fenton, would not
come in some deep dark midnight to save him.
No, no! he would soliloquize; they have not
the heart; and if they had, they lay the break upon
meand here they will leave me to my fate. Damn
them! if they were here and I were free they might
watch awhile for my coming. Thus, in speaking
his feelings towards them, forgetting that he was
portraying very naturally what their's were to himself.
Then he thought of his abused wife, and tried to
devise some means of making her acquainted with his
situation; believing, notwithstanding his brutal
conduct
towards her, that she might be induced to
convey
him secretly some instrument whereby he might
effect his liberation.
After Bobby's deliverance, the man who had
committed
the assault and battery, the only other prisoner
then in jail, had been released; and in his gloomy and
silent solitude, Gordon felt it would be relief if he could
hear the clanking of any other fetters in unison with
his own. As he lay upon his miserable mattrass, the
intense solitude which sometimes would reign over
the quiet village would press upon his brain like the
weight of mountains, and he would impulsively toss
up his hands as if to remove it. The least sound that
came to his ears was welcomed, for it relieved his
mind in his efforts to divine what occasioned it.
The solitary mouse that stole across his
prison-floor
he tried to allure nearer to him with crumbs of
bread thrown as noiselessly to it as the feathery fall
of the snow; and when the motion of his hand would
start the little pilferer back again, he would groan
in the anguish of his guilt, and fancy even the tiny
animal knew the depravity of his heart, and shunned
him because he was friendless.
His nerves were utterly unstrung by his long course
of dissipation, and he would fancy in the midst of
day that darkness encompassed him, and ten thousand
fiends were heaping living coals of red-hot fire upon
his heart. O! how the poor wretch begged, and
begged in vainfor it was against the regulations of
the prisonfor a little brandy, to give him nerve. At
other times, in the midst of the night, he would fancy
it broad daybut a strange, unnatural day, in which
the sunbeams whirled and whisked about him like
witches in a dance. Sometimes they would assume
the shape of spirits in airand it seemed wonderful
to him how their features, in smallest miniature, not
bigger than a pin's point, could be so distinct. While
he wondered how they would swell and bloat, and
become loathsome and reptile-like, and come and crawl
upon him, and thrust their forked tongues in his face,
and belch forth breaths of fire, or of putrid rottenness.
They seemed to creep into the soles of his feet, and
into each finger, and steal into his veins and revel in
his blood, until they gathered at last in one great knot
about his heart, and fed upon itwhile the hair of his
head became living serpents, and stung his eyes out.
At other times he would fancy that a fair spirit of
light descended from heaven into his room; a visitant
of mercy, who bade him confess, repent, and go free;
and when he had confessed all his crimes, she would
turn into a denouncing angel, an accuser before the
High Judge, and she would pour forth the vials of
wrath upon his head, and he saw the mountains reeling
and rolling towards him, yet they would not cover
him, and could that feeble hand hold them from hiding
him! the feeble hand of Granny Gammon! O! how
distinctly she wore that death-in-life look that
countenance
when she cursed him.
Again he would fancy that little dogs with club feet
danced round his couch; they were so comical that
he laughed till his bones ached. There was one little
black fellow, with a stiff, pompous, curled-up tail, that
led him through the hills, and by Aunt Agnes, and
by Holly, and took him to the tree where he met Peggy
the night of her grandmother's death. Instead of
being angry with him she was all delight, all joy, all
willingness, and she had a little bird in her hand that
sang so sweetly. While he played with the bird, she
plucked flowersyet it seemed strange to him how
he could tell their colours so distinctly by the starlight,
but he couldand she made them into garlands, and
in graceful dalliance wound them round his waist; in
humility and in token of respectful attention and love,
she kneeled and bound them round his ankles: she
begged and implored him not to be angry with her
when he drew back his foot to spurn her from him, but
a sudden pain prostrated him to earth, and lo! she
had bound him in fetters. Then the little black dog,
with the curly tail, kept getting larger and larger, and
at last he got a livery suit on him, and turned out to
be old Pompey, while the bird proved to be Bobby,
who whistled for joy.
Then Ross, the constable, and he took a ride, and
he stopped to drink, but Ross would not, and after he
had drank, Ross proposed a race, to see which could
ride to the devil fastest, and he agreed; and they
dashed on up hill and down dale through Springdale,
and away past the cross roads. They mounted at
last a steep precipice, and they were spurring side
and side, neck and neck, when Ross gave Gordon's
horse a cut with a babbon's tail which his whip turned
into, which made his steed spring ahead clear over
the precipice into the bottomless pit of brimstone.
Ross peeped over, and laughed at him till the woods
echoed.
Then his wife came, and she looked so kindly on
him. She leaned over the precipice, and stretched
out her hand to save him. Their fingers touched.
O! what a glow of joy thrilled through him: but just
as she was about to pluck him as a brand from the
burning, Ross threw a rope made of counterfeit notes
round her, and drew her back, while the fiends clapped
their hands for joy, and laughed till the hills and
valleys echoed with their malignity.
Then Ross called to him, and told him that if he
had one single cent wherewith to pay toll of good
money, that he should come forth, scott free; and
Gordon thought he turned his pockets inside out in
search of the half-dollar that his wife gave him, but
he had spent it in buying liquor and treating at the
14*
tavern where he and Ross stopped, and the
counterfeit
notes fell thick and fast around him. At last out
came Ross's ten-dollar note, but a current of cool air
whisked it away off, while the counterfeit ones
tumbled
the faster from his pocket, and, igniting
immediately
,
gave him such intense agony as to cause him
to leap madly about, at which the fiends laughed
louder than ever, while his wife and Ross disappeared
Then he thought, after a weary travel, he stopped
by a shady fountain embowered in trees, and then
threw himself down, and soon sunk into a sweet sleep.
Awaking feverish and all athirst, he reached over for
a draught, and the limpid stream turned to molten
lava, and poured down his throat and burned his heart
out, and he heard Ross call out in a tone of derision:
I told you, Jack, it was your worst enemy.
He found himself still in the bottomless pit, with little
devils skipping round him perfectly crazy with
delight
.
All at once they seemed to leave him at the
approach
of a small, gentlemanly-looking little man,
dressed in black. Gordon took him at first for a
clergyman, but he proved to be Satan himself.
Strange, but as he advanced to Gordon the bank
notes under him seemed to moulder and grow cooler,
and a fiendish glow of satisfaction ran through the
prisoner's veins. He announced himself by taking
off his hat. Gordon observed that his eye was a
merry
one, and though it certainly had a touch of
deviltry
in itit was merry deviltry, and not very
malignant
.
His nose was too large rather, and too much
hooked, and he was bald, with a little rein of hair
above his ears, and a big tuft on his forehead like the
forelock of time. His hair was originally black, but,
having been so long amid the flames, it had got tinged
with a crispy red here and there like the first gray
hairs in the head of a gentleman growing elderly.
Gordon felt proud, he knew not why.
Sir, said this personage, with great apparent
cordiality and kindness, not unmingled with respect,
you give yourself unnecessary uneasiness: most of
those poor devils that were dancing about you have
forfeited their souls forever, and yet you see they
are quite merry. The cause of your trouble is, that
you are in a state of purgatory; you have not
committed
murder yet; sell me the fee-simple of your soul,
and you shall go back and dwell on earth, and be as
old as Mesthuselah. There, said he, offering him
notes to countless amounts, are the means to
gratify
all your wants! As Satan offered them,
Gordon
thought that Peggy, Bobby, his wife, and even
Pompey, with tearful eyes, besought him not to take
thembut he stretched out his hand. Then the
shade of his mother appeared to him, and, in tones of
unutterable we, prayed him to touch not.
But you have always disobeyed your mother,
said the tempter; why should you mind her now?
Then the voice of Granny Gammon called out to him
that she would take back her curse if he would
forbear
.
Forbear! why should you forbear? cried out
Satan; it will give you revenge on all your
enemies.
Give me the money, cried Gordon, I'll seal the
bond with my heart's blood.
With tears and wailing, his mother and the rest
disappeared
,
while Satan plunged a flaming pen into his
breast, and drawing it out, dripping with blood, bade
him seal the bond. He did so, and throughout all the
regions round them was a yell of delight. Gordon
felt proud. He thought he said to them in the
language
of the player whom he had seen enacting
Byron's ManfredBack, ye baffled fiends and he
laughed himself so loudly that he was startled at the
echoes of his own tones.
Then he thought he trod the earth again in the
hot fulfilment of his revenge. How his soul revelled
in its purposes! how he thought he would scourge
Pompeyand he made the motion of a blow with his
arm; how he would gloat over Peggy, who should
cringe at his feet, while Bobby stood impotently by.
He thought he stopped at Springdale, and ordered
a dinner and wines, while the landlord, and even the
Fitzhursts' and Pinckney, fawned around him. With
what an air he ordered his billLo! when he pulled
out the bank notes for which he had sold himself to
pay it, Ross arrested him for passing counterfeit
money, and he was thrown into Springdale jail.
There his wife came to see him, when, maddened with
her because she had not brought him the means of
escape, he dashed her brains out against the wall.
In an instant he was transported back again into
the bottomless pit. O! what a thrill of horror ran
through his heart as a hollow voice called out:
You are mine forever and forever.
He started up from his prison floor. He felt the
walls to convince himself of his locality. He grasped
his limbs all over and every feature of his face to
satisfy himself that he was still in the flesh. He
struck his manacled hands against his brow till the
blood gushed from his nostrils, and as he felt it
trickling
forth he threw himself back on his dungeon floor,
and thanked God fervently that he was still on earth,
though a prisoner and guilty.
CHAPTER XV.
One
morning, when Gordon had just recovered
from one of those terrible visitations which almost
amounted to madness, at an unusual hour, for it was
not yet time for his midday meal, the wards of his
prison doors were undrawn, and the jailor conducted
into his presence no other person than Mr. Bronson.
That worthy stepped back as he gazed on the
haggard
face of Gordon, on which the light from the
solitary window fell with strong and contrasting force.
He could hardly recognise in his altered features the
reckless sportsman, who was in the habit of lounging
about his store.
Gordon nodded his head to Bronson in token of
recognition
,
and, turning to the jailor, askedFor
God's sake, put lighter fetters on me than theseand
give me a little brandy, just a dropor some opium
laudanum.
Gordon! exclaimed the jailor in an angry tone,
you are the most agravatingest feller I ever had to
deal with. You want me turned out of my sitivation
as jailor to this 'ere establishment, don't you? I've
told you fifty times afore that the sheriff says to me
you know, Mr. Bronson, that our sheriff is a man of
mettle and stern, an' he always keeps his wordPike,
says he to me, put the heaviest fetters in the jal on
that Gordon, and grant him no indulgences whatever
saving what the rules allow; if he escapes you loose
your place.
Why should he feel that way towards me?
asked Gordon.
That's the question you must ask yourself,
replied
the jailor. Our sheriff is a first rate
gentlement
;
but he's notionalvery notional, indeed; and
once he gets a notion into his head there's no getting
it out. To Bobby Gammon, from the first, he gave
all kinds of indulgencies. Why, he used to make me
let that black feller Pompey in here to see him. My
notions are, that every man what has the keys turned
on him for a particular offence should be treated
alike.
Why should he dislike me? said Gordon again.
I never electioneered against him; I would have
voted for him had I been here.
If you had made him sheriff it would ha' been the
same thing, returned the jailor. Now I'm for having
stand-by rules, but he told how this thing would turn
out from the first; he said that Bob would get offat
least that he wasn't guilty. He thinks hard of you on
that account; an' after I locked you up the first night,
and went over to the tavern, I finds Ross and him
together
.
Ross wanted to bet him a ten dollar hat that
you'd break out. The sheriff said he never bet
upon the discharge of his duties, but he said he did'nt
think you would, and he turned to me and told me to
mark what Ross said; and I've got to mark it or
loose my sitivationan' I've a wife and family.
Well, said Gordon, it's hardhardO! God.
It's harder for me, retorted the jailor. You
say you can't sleep at nights; and I know you don't
much, from the way I hear your fetters rattling; but,
man, don't you think that keeps me awake, too?
Don't it make me think that you're trying to break
jail? and don't I think of the loss of my sitivation, and
the sufferings of my wife and family, if such should
be? Here I have thirty dollars a month, and
houserent
free in the best built and strongest place in the
town. The biggest storm that ever bursted couldn't
fase this ere establishmentyou might as well just
keep yourself quiet a little more o' nights. I tell you,
man, you can't get out of this jail; and hang it, what's
the use of your groaning and grunting so through the
night. If you want a doctor, say so. You're not the
first man that I've turned the key on in this very room
Bobby Gammon was locked up here.
Was he? said Gordon, starting.
Fact, sir, replied the jailor, and turning to
Bronson
,
he continued: Would you believe it now,
Mr. Bronson, that this here feller, just 'cause he's in
here for passing counterfeit money and one or two
other thingsthough they're not down in the
commitment
would
you believe that sometimes at night
he hollows and yells as if ten thousand devils had got
hold on him? No longer an' last night I had a great
mind to come down here at midnight with a cowhide,
and flake him 'til he couldn't say boo to a goose. I
takes it very unkind on him, indeed, a breaking o' my
natral rest in this wayparticulary considering that
Mrs. Pike is, as you know she is, siran' I don't
know at what time I may have to be off for Doctor
McVittee. He's frightened my wife several times, so
that I thought he would hurry on the interesting
eventand maybe play the devil with matters and
things. Besides, that everybody in Springdale
for they can hear him plainly all through the village
these still nightsthinks he does it out of deviltryto
defy them, an' disturb 'em of their natral rest, too.
There's only one person as I've heard of that defends
him at all, and that's Bobby.
What did he say? eagerly inquired Gordon.
Why, replied the jailor, with a knowing grin, he
puts it down to your conscience. He says he was
passing the jail one night from a little quilting frolic
at Bill Hardy's mother, an' they heard you, and felt
so for you, that his Cousin Peggy stopped her ears
with her hands and cried. Now, you know it's all
gammon, Gordon, continued the jailor, looking at
him as if he perfectly understood him, all gammon,
for last night I myself with my own ears heard you
laugh the most devilishest, cunningest laugh that ever
I heard tell ofmy wife was certain that you were
laughing that'ere way cause you were breaking jail
and was jist on the pint of making off. Then you see
I had to get up an' look round, an' the loss of my
sitivation crossed my mind, and my wife's sitivation
and I dreamed all night damned unlucky dreams. I
tell you, if you don't quit it you'll catch the worst
flogging you ever heard of. Here you are, nothing
to do upon yarth but sleep all day and cut up your
deviltries all night. Why don't you keep awake in
the day-time and sleep at night. I just advise you
for your own good to quit. I tell you, man, if the
sheriff would only tell me once to give you a taste of
my brown Bettyyou know I'm used to the business
there would'nt be a single man in Springdale that
heard you, who would take you to be at your
deviltries
then. I tell you, man, it's outragus, an' I leave it
to Mr. Bronson here if it ain't, to disturb a whole,
large, respectable place like this in spite an' me, and
considering the sitivation of my wife.
Gordon gazed half vacantly on the wall, but said
not a word.
Well, say your say, said the jailor to Bronson
and Gordon.
Can't you let us have a little talk alone, Mr.
Pike? asked Gordon. You know, sir, that I may
want to say some things to himhe's a kind-hearted
manconcerning my defence, and what lawyer to
VOL. II.15
employ, which in your responsible situation as jailor
it would not be proper for me to say before you.
The jailor shook his head doubtfully.
My respected and respectable friend, said
Bronson
,
insinuatingly, to Pike, perhaps you had better
let us have a little private talk. You remember
when that counterfeiter was here before, I gave him
some ghostly consolation. This unfortunate man
for any man may be unfortunatetemptation is an
awful snaremay wish to communicate something
to me of his spiritual state, besides messages to send
to his distant friends.
Then, said the jailor, I must lock you up
together.
Must you! said Bronson, starting, and looking
round the black and charcoal scribbled walls, you
didn't lock me up before.
Orders, strict this time, Mr. Bronson; must be
obeyed.
Well, well, said Bronson; but, Pike, my
respected
and respectable friend, don't stay long.
Never fear, Mr. Bronson, said Pike, laughing;
never fearthere's no authority to keep you here
an' I never acts but by authority. So saying, the
jailor withdrew, deliberatively locking the doors after
him.
Not until the last key was turned in the outer
passage
door was silence broken between the two, when
Bronson asked:
Gordon, what did you want with me?
When did you get here? asked Gordon.
Late last night; I saw Pike this morning just as
I was going to my store, and he said you kept
pestering
him to come and tell me that you wanted to
see me.
Yes, yes, said Gordon.
Well; what for? inquired Bronson, impatiently.
Mr. Bronson, I want you to go my bail.
Go your bail, Mr. Gordon!
Call me Jack, call me Jacklike you used to.
Jack, thenthere's no bailthey won't allow
bail. Under present existing circumstances if they
would allow bail they'd put it up so high as to swamp
the biggest estate in the state; and as for taking me,
they wouldn't do it.
But will you trywill you try? asked Gordon,
half angrily, half imploringly.
Mr. Gordon, said Bronson, after some
hesitation
,
I don't know that you have any particular
claims on me.
Gordon looked at Bronson, searchingly, and said:
Don't know! Yes, you do know, Mr. Bronson.
What are they? enquired Bronson, in a
tremulous
tone, approaching nearer the speaker, yet
assuming indifference; what are they? speak low.
Mr. Bronson, we often bought goods of you at a
thousand times their value.
We! what we? You chose to give me my
pricesyou had your money's worth.
Money's worth! that may bebut you knew the
money, replied Gordon, quickly.
Knew the money! to be sure I knew the money;
it was good money, wasn't it? Have a care,
Gordon
,
don't make me a witness against you, said
Bronson in a friendly tone. I may be called upon,
as you have been frequently at my store. I know
nothing against youmake no confession.
After a moment's pause, and a steady look at
Bronson
,
Gordon asked:
Where's Benbow?
Benbow! exclaimed Bronson, with a triumphant
smile; He's offno one knows where. I
understand
,
sir, that since my absence from Springdale
business took me away southardI have been
absent
some timein that time, sir, I understand that
a gang of counterfeiters have been discovered, and
that it was asserted that Squire Benbow was one
of them. I knew him very slightly; but I can't
believe it.
You knew him well, Mr. Bronson.
Mr. Gordon, I shall not quarrel with you as to
what constitutes an intimate acquaintance, retorted
Bronson.
Gordon's face fell. He shook impulsively his
fetters
,
as if he would renew his courage, and then
remarked
:
Mr. Bronson, you knew all about us.
Knew all about you! echoed Bronson; what's
the use of speaking so loud. Do you want to
compel
me to be a witness? I assure you, Mr. Gordon,
I know nothing of you but what is good, and unless
you inform me otherwise yourself, I have not said
that I would not testify to the fact. Have you
anything
against me, Mr. Gordon? speak it out, sir,
said he, sinking his voice.
Mr. Bronson, you knew about us, reiterated
Gordon.
I am not certain that I did, sir; on the contrary,
replied Bronson, which is to your advantage; but
suppose I did, it was not for me, a Christian man,
who believes in mercy, and who practices itit was
not for me upon suspicion, very slight suspicionI
don't say even that I suspectedit was not for me to
have the fearful penalties of the law inflicted upon a
fellow-beinga frail, human creature like myself.
I'm hereI'm here! exclaimed Jack Gordon,
in a desperate tone, and the rest are all scattered;
but I'm a desperate man. I can tell tales, you know
I can tell tales.
Tales! exclaimed Bronson, but in a much lower
voice; not so loud, my respected friend: what tales
can you tell? Who'd believe your tales! he
exclaimed
,
in a more assured tone. You are here an
accused man; I don't know whether you will be
convicted
or not. I trust not; but who would believe
your tales. It would make a man more popular if
you were to tell them against him, as it did that
unfortunate
youth, Robert Gammon, who has grown
bolder than ever since his acquittal. I wonder you
don't appear against him. But you see immediately,
Mr. Gordon, that tales are nothing. There's, in all
respect, I say it, sir, no shifting of responsibility in
these matters. Tales have advanced that Robert
Gammon in this community in a manner that's
perfectly
astonishing. Sir, I believe they would elect
him to office, were he eligible. Tales! what could
they do against a man like me, Mr. Gordon. I am a
member of the church under grace, a leading
member
,
sir; a character unimpeached; have given
greatly to the poor; and never missed from the
service
,
unless kept back by sickness, or something
unavoidable
;
have sustained this character for years:
when I go to purchase goods, bear the highest
testimonials
the
highesthave unlimited credit. Tales,
indeed! I want to be your friend, Mr. Gordon. I
trust in mercy; and for your own sake, you will not
compel me to be your foe.
Will you at any rate help me? said Gordon, in
a tone that proved he had not much chance of
operating upon his fears.
That was spoken rightly, my respected and
respectable friend, Mr. Gordon! exclaimed Bronson,
rubbing his hands, and adjusting his wigthat was
in the correct tone. The rumours against you, sir, I
never have believed; I always held you to be an honest
man, sir, and on all proper occasions I have said so. I
shall say so again, sir, on all proper occasions. You
must not be down-hearted, my friend; I will help you
15*
yes, I will; and though you should be convicted, Mr.
Gordon, and sentenced to the penitentiarydon't let
any angry feelings of the moment induce younor
threats nor promisesto say a word against your
true friendssuch you shall find me to be, sir. I
assure you, sir, that Robert Gammon's popularity is
astonishing. But as I was about to remark, even
though they should send you to the penitentiary,
remember
the governor has the power of pardoning
ha! don't you seeand some men that you and I
know of, have influence. Who, I ask you, was the
very last man in this prisonay, in this room?
Strong. What was he here for? counterfeiting.
Was he not convicted? But did his friends despair?
Who, I ask you, Mr. Gordon, got up the petition for
his pardon, and rode this county night and day for
signers, and got him off. They had scarcely got his
head shaved, sir, before he was off. Mr. Gordon,
that individual always sticks to his friends.
You promise me, then, to do what you can for
me? said Gordon.
I do, sir, replied Bronson; be discreet, say
nothing to criminate yourself or others; for your
friends that are scattered may be caught. Now I
must leave youI'll have some clothes sent to you by
our charitable society; at least, I'll get a friend to
propose
it and I'll carry it through; I'd speak to the
sheriff, but we are not on the best termsso give me
your handGod bless you! Why don't that fellow
Pike come; does he mean to keep me here forever.
There's such a thing as false imprisonment I'll learn
him, and I believe it may be done by a jailer as well
as by anybody else. Pike, I say, he continued,
kicking and shouting at the door. Pike, O! Pike.
Slowly the steps of Pike were heard echoing along
the passage, and then the unlocking of the doors
succeeded
,
and the gaoler stood in their presence. Hope
I didn't keep you waiting much, Mr. Bronson, said
Pike, with a grin; but I stepped to the 'pothecaries
for something for my wife, and left the keys in her
charge. I've just got back.
Friend Pike, whenever I can do a service to an
unfortunate fellow-creature, I do itI think it is the
duty of all of us. If Mrs. Pike wants any baby's
clothes cheap, and of the latest pattern, ask her to
call over. We shan't quarrel about the time of
payment
.
Good-bye, Mr. Gordon, be of good cheer.
The Lord is everywhere, as much with you in this
prison as he is in the sanctuary.
So speaking, Bronson withdrew, and, hastening out
of the jail, left Pike to lock his solitary charge up at
his leisure.
After glancing round the room to see that all was
right, and peering into the corner and at Gordon's
manacles and himself, Pike requested him, as he
valued the comfort of his bodily condition so long as
he remained in that jail, to cut up no more capers
with his fetters, and not to laugh so loud when he felt
disposed to merriment in the middle of the night, but
just to take a quiet laugh to himself, and to reflect
upon Mrs. Pike's present hinteresting sitivation.
After making this admonition, the affectionate Mr.
Pike securely locked up his charge, and forthwith
repaired
to the presence of Mrs. Pike, to enjoy himself
in the bosom of domestic felicity, which, it appeareth,
may be found even in a jail.
CHAPTER XVI.
Proceeding
to his store, and giving a hasty order
to his clerk concerning certain goods which he
expected
to arrive from the city, Bronson, with hasty
strides, left the village and hastened to Elwood's.
Yes, he soliloquised, this Gordon knows what he
has heard his comrades say, and something himself
besides; but, I thank God, there's nothing they can
bring home to me. If this fellow had a character,
and his comrades had ditto, they might do itbut
that was a lucky thought of mine about Robert
Gammon
,
the little rascal; but as it is, suppose I did sell
them goods at a high priceI've the right to put my
own price on my own merchandize. They can't
prove any passing on me; no, no, I took care of that;
but I did pass it, though, and if I did, who can prove
the intention the `
quo animo
,' as Squire Lupton says.
Yet it's gathering round me; it's gathering round me.
My prospects are darkeningthe respectable here
don't receive me as they use tono, Bronson, they
don't. I have made my mind up to it; I must, and
will have that girl; Elwood dares not refuse mehe
would if he dare; but I hold him with a grasp of iron.
Sarah was not half so civil in her reception as she
used to benot half so civil the last time I saw her.
I shall have no more dilly-dally in the matter with
her; she must, and shall marry me, and Elwood shall
see to it. It was lucky, luckyI thank God I saw
himhey, Bronson? very lucky.
Thus communing with himself, and turning the
same thought over and over in his mind, Bronson
reached Elwood's door almost unconsciously. He
found Elwood in, who received him with forced
cordiality
,
and invited him to a seat.
No! no! exclaimed Bronson, impatiently; I
wish to speak privately. I suppose your neice is
well?
Tolerable. She has been quite unwell.
Is she here?
Yes, in the house; won't you see her? asked
Elwood
.
No! not now. Come, walk out with me, said
Bronson.
Can't we speak here? asked Elwood, seemingly
averse to leaving the house.
No, I tell youno! Will you walk out with me?
Don't be in such a heat, expostulated Elwood,
and taking his hat from the floor at his feet, where
he was in the habit of placing it when he took it off,
Elwood followed Bronson to a secluded spot behind
the barn, some three hundred yards or more from the
house. As they walked along each was so occupied
with his own thoughts as to make no effort to keep
up a conversation. Bronson walked with dogged
determination
;
and Elwood, as if he feared an interview
which he had not the courage to deny. When they
reached the spot, Bronson broke silence, by saying,
firmly.
Elwood, you promised me long ago your neice.
I returned last nightalmost the first words I heard
from my clerk were that she was attached to that
infernalthe Lord forgive meto that aristocrat,
young Fitzhurst. We must he married to-night.
To night! ejaculated Elwood.
To night, or you must take the consequences.
The consequencesthe consequences! muttered
Elwood to himself, and then he said aloud: I've
told you. Bronson, that she should and would have
you. I had talks with her since you have been away,
and she is not so averse to it. It's a liea damned
lie, about Sidney Fitzhurst and her being engaged.
Such a thought never crossed my brain; and I've
seen them together. It's a lie.
Sir, I tell you its the truth; Peg Gammon and
Bob say so, and they got it from that hag Agnes.
This remark did not produce the effect upon
Elwood
which Bronson intendedfor his face
brightened
,
and he said:
The girl's of age, and if she will have him how
can I prevent it?
Will have him! prevent! ejaculated Bronson,
literally gnashing his teeth. Do you know your
fate?do you know the hemp is spun for you?
Stung, if not startled by the remark, Elwood
rejoined
with courage unexpected by his companion:
An alliance with that family would prevent the
consequences of any alleged cr deed done so long
ago, and of doubtful proof.
Doubtful proof! I like that. What I saw with
my own eyesdoubtful proof!that's something new
under the sun. You'll find out whether the proof is
doubtful or not.
Bronson, said Elwood, I've been thinking much
over this matter since you have been away.
So have I, ejaculated Bronson.
Hear me, hear me! said Elwood. Your
manner
this morning has determined me to speak out
plainly
,
because the crisis has come. God knows you have
hush-money enough; you've a mortgage on my place
for which I never got a cent; I have lent you money
repeatedly which you have never paid me; and not
content with all that, you would have me compel my
neice to marry.
Yes, sir, that's the wordcompel! exclaimed
Bronson, who, nevertheless, was evidently surprised
at the tone of his companion; for though sycophantic
enough where he was compelled to be, Bronson
preferred
the bullying style when it suited his purposes
as well. You must do ityou're mine, body and
soul. I'll deal plainly with you since you're so plain.
She's your heir; her property you have used; a
lawsuit
if she were to marry another might deprive me
of this ground! exclaimed he, in a rage, stamping
his foot upon itof this ground, which is and shall
continue mine. Why should you escape the
consequences
of crimes which have given others to the
gallows. You think you must go scot free, hey?
This ground and all you're worth, had I came out upon
you, would have gone to fee your lawyersevery
cent to fee your lawyersand my testimony would
have hung you as high as Haman, notwithstanding
Aye! and it can do it! Change your tone, or it will
do it. The prospect of this aristocratic marriage
makes you blind as a post to the risk you've placed
your neck in.
I'm not certain of the risk, said Elwood, but in
a tone that began to falter.
Run it, then! exclaimed Bronson, taking
advantage
of it. Run it; many a man has run it before.
Did I not give you myself the life of Eugene Aram to
read; see how long he trod the earth with impunity.
Look at that generala general, sir, high in authority,
in British authority, who whipped a soldier to death.
I shall add another to the catalogue of such trials.
But the proofthe proof was strong against
them, rejoined Elwood, and their acts were
premeditated
;
mine were notGod knows mine were
not.
But how'll the jury know it! exclaimed
Bronson
,
exultingly. Not from my testimony, I assure
youI could save you now if you were on trialI
could hang you now if you were on trial. You're a
man proverbially cruel to your slavesthat's the point
to start fromI appear before the grand-juryI say
that I am a religious manthat all the world knows,
of unimpeached and unimpeachable character; I
state that a feeling of mercy towards one I hoped
would become a useful member of society prevented
my making the proposed development beforebut he
is not, I continue, a useful member of societyreports
say that his unkindness as a master increases. My
conscience, therefore, compels the development. I
circumstantially narrate how twelve years ago, this
very month, I was passing through your woods to the
mill.
You need not speak so loud, said Elwood,
glaring round, but fascinated by the desire to hear
what Bronson could prove, though he had heard him
recount it more than once before.
I was passing through your woods to the mill, it
was an early autumnI think I have observed,
gentlemen
of the jury. Bronson continued, speaking as if he
were giving testimony, to produce the greater effect
upon his listener, and I have been led to observe our
autumn from this murderI think I have observed
that they are earlier now than formerly. As I was
saying, passing through the woods of the prisoner at
the bar in a hollow about a quarter of a mile behind
his house, I saw him, the prisoner, with one of his
slaves, named Jessee; I knew him well, a weakly, gentle
creature.
He was not weakly or gentle neither, by G!
ejaculated Elwood.
Hear my testimony, continued Bronson, taking
advantage of the other's emotion, and emphasizing
what he said with his first right-hand finger in his left
hand, while Elwood seated himself on a log for a
moment and jumped up again. Hear my testimony,
in my opinion, and I knew him well, gentlemen of the
juryI am speaking as if I were under oatha
weakly, gentle creature, loading his cart with
firewood
.
He, the prisoner, ordered Jessee, poor fellow!
to lift an immense log in the cartit was an ox-cart,
gentlemen, and the log was so large that it would take
three of you to lift it; here Elwood looked up as if
he were making a mute appeal from the falsehood.
Yes, gentlemen, I feel satisfied it would take three
of you to lift itJessee could scarcely move ithis
master, the prisoner, leaped from the cart, and
commenced
whipping him most unmercifully with the
horse-whip.
I never struck him but one blow, exclaimed
Elwood, and you said, yourself, at the very time I
gave the mortgage, that you believed it was done in
sudden passion without any design to kill.
First impressions are almost always roving,
continued
Bronson, coolly; my testimony, as I now
remember
the shocking event, will make out a case
against you of murder in the first degreea wilful,
deliberate, and most cruel murder on a harmless and
unoffending slave. After, gentlemen of the jury, the
prisoner had beaten him as I state, he ordered him
again to lift the log: he couldn't move itagain he
was beaten.
Why didn't they hear him at the house, cried out
Elwood in a frenzy.
His master telling him, all the while he was striking
him, continued Bronson, that if he dared to utter one
word, he would kill him on the spot. When, gentlemen
of the jury, the prisoner at the bar grew wearied with
beating Jessee, he ordered him again to lift the log.
How the poor slave exerted himselfbut in vain.
VOL. II.16
I'll kill you, then,' cried out Elwood, `you're not
worth your salt;' and, so saying, he struck him to the
earth with a billet of wood; and beat him till he was
stone-dead. I could see all this through the trees, as
I was advancing towards the prisoner, while he was
so determined in his purpose that he never even looked
round, as I discovered. After the prisoner was
satisfied
that his unfortunate and unoffending slave was
dead, he dragged him by the feet to a hole a short
distance off, formed by the roots of a tree which had
been blown down by a whirlwind, and covering the
body carefully with leaves and sticks, he drove his
cart home.
I never hit him but one blow in the world,
exclaimed
Elwood, wiping the cold drops from his
forehead
,
and that was in a passion, with a stone. You,
yourself, helped me to cover him up, for you come
up at the momentand God knows that I have
suffered
enough in mind for it, and how much did I pay
you then, and since, to say nothing about it: it has
kept me a poor man.
I have a memory most distinct for some things;
some things I cannot remember. What will be the
further testimony in this case, corroborative of mine?
That some boysthis accounts from not opposing
persons gunning on your placethat some boys, in
hunting in your woods, discovered the skeleton of
Jessee. A coroner's inquest was held over itit was
pronounced by Dr. McVittee, to be the remains of an
African; such was the verdict of the jury of inquest,
also that the skull was fractured. They concluded
by giving it as their opinion, that the bones were the
remains of an African, who had been murdered by
some person or persons unknown.
Elwood sighed heavily.
Furthermore, continued Bronson; another point
which you never thought of, sir, and in which you
overlooked yourself. You advertised Jessee as a
runaway.
'Twas by your advice, said Elwood,
Such will not be my testimonyyou advertised
Jessee as a runaway, and you described the clothes
he had on at the time. The buttons were peculiar,
you stated, of his jacket; they were taken from an
old regimental coat of the revolution and had an
eagle on them. Among the bones of Jessee, in
corroboration
,
it will be shown that buttons were found,
and on their being brightened, they turned out to be
continental buttonsha! you forget these little things
in all such cases fix the facts in the jury's mind, and
fasten upon the prisoner the verdict ofGuilty.
I will see heryou shall have her if I can
content
her! exclaimed Elwood, in agony; utterly
appalled
at the array of facts and falsehoods, which
Bronson was so able, and expressed himself so
determined
to bring against him.
Then we are friends, said Bronson, taking his
hand, as we have ever been, with but this little
interruption
,
which arose on your part. I will not call
on her this morning. Go, forthwithyou are in the
right peace of mind to extort the definite promise
let the marriage take place to-morrow at farthest.
I'll see her this afternoon. Nownow's the time
so speaking, and leaving Elwood transfixed to the
spot, Bronson drew his hat over his brow, and
taking a pathway through the woods hastened to the
village.
The facts of the killing of Jessee were simply these:
Elwood was a man of uncontrollable passions. He
was in the woods with his ox-cart, accompanied by
Jessee, whom he ordered to lift a certain log into the
cart. Jessee, who was a stubborn, self-willed negro,
did not choose to exert the strength which he was
capable of, to lift, at which his master damned him.
Jessee answered him back impudently, and without a
moment's reflection he lifted a stone and felled him to
the earth a corpse. Bronson was passing through
the woods gunningit was at a day before interest
had taught him the policy of joining the church; he
was a needy adventurer, and he availed himself
without
scruple of Elwood's fears. For the sum of a
thousand dollars he promised to say nothing of the
matter, and assisted Elwood in hiding the body. It
was afterwards discovered, as he has asserted. By
his guilty knowledge, he held a control over Elwood,
which grew at last to be absolute.
He had obtained large sums of money from him at
different times, and had got him to mortgage his
property
for a small sum to a third person, once when he
had not ready cash, which mortgage Bronson had
paid, thereby obtaining an assignment of it to himself.
Elwood never had had the courage to offer to
forclose
it. The thought that there was a possibility of
allying himself through his neice, to the Fitzhursts,
had never entered his mind, and on its being alluded
to by Bronson, who had strong suspicions to that
effect, he summoned up the short-lived resistance
which we have recorded.
Elwood repaired instantly to his house, and to the
chamber of Sarah. Utterly unnerved by the threats
of Bronson, he revealed to her the facts of the case,
and the perjury which Bronson was determined to
commit, to make him a victim, if she would not
consent
to be his wife. Throwing himself on his knees
before her, he implored her to save him by marrying
Bronson on the morrow.
Horrified at the disclosure, and at the fiendish guilt
of the man who was willing to commit perjury for
revenge, and consign her relative to the gibbet, unless
she would wed him, she could only say; I will,
when she fell from her chair as lifeless as the body
of Jessee under the deadly blow of her suppliant.
16*
CHAPTER XVII.
We
must now transport our readers to New York.
On the steps of the Astor house, of a bright morning,
Pinckney was seen looking upon the park. Already
more than one fair cynosure of that brilliant city had
dwelt with an admiring eye upon the young southerner,
whose graceful form and handsome countenance
attracted
the notice of all who chanced to glance at
him; and there were few, particularly of the gentle
sex, who passed by unobservant of his gallant
bearing
.
Taking the arm of his friend, Matemon, from
Charleston, he said:
Let's go to the post-office.
With pleasure, replied Matemon. Pinckney,
you're a lucky fellow; your cotton which you thought
was going off at so great a sacrifice has sold at the
highest profit; your coffers are overflowing, and
your are about to wed one who will not only add to
your abundance, but whose mind, beauty, and heart,
are worthy of all praise.
Yes, replied Pinckney, I do believe in the last
report; at least I have secured a prize that is beyond
the caprices of fortune.
You're a lucky fellow, indeed! exclaimed
Matemon
.
I envy you.
Arrived at the post office, Pinckney received Fanny's
package, with a letter from Langdale, which last he
put hastily in his pocket, and, stepping aside from his
friend, with a lover's impatience he opened what he
thought the love-freighted mission with a heart all
joy.
He could not at first believe the evidences of his
sences, as he perused Fanny's laconic note. Twice
and thrice he read it ere the full conviction impressed
itself upon his startled senses.
Nerving himself with self-possession, Pinckney took
the arm of Matemon, who, as they retrod their steps,
said:
What news from Holly? that must have been a
love-letter, Pinckney?
Why do you think so?
Because you stepped aside to read it. The lover
is like the miserhe counts and recounts his treasure
privately.
Ah! you are mistaken; this time it was no
love-letter
.
Matemon, I have some letters to writeI
cannot
make those calls with you as I promised.
Apologise
for me, will you?
You will disappoint those ladies, Pinckney. You
had better go, rejoined Matemon.
Thank you, no. I have a letter which must be
answered by return of post. I'll see you at dinner.
So speaking, the friend departed. With a curling lip
and a firm step, which concealed a whirlwind of
emotions
,
in which at the moment wounded pride
predominated
,
the proud southerner proceeded to his
apartment
.
Arrived there, he ordered his servant to deny
him, no matter who called, and strode the room for
an hour without knowing that a minute had elapsed.
Deep, dark, and misanthropical were his feelings
over which, like a sunburst that flashes and vanishes,
better thoughts came to be crushed in the moment of
their birth.
No! he exclaimed as such an emotion crossed
him. No! there can be no mistake in the origin
of this communication. It is as mercenary as
Mammon
itselfas mercenary as hell. This bright dreamer
of abiding affection; this fair creature of eighteen;
this lady lapped in fortune's favours; realization of
romantic
loveshe who would have clung to me, as she
avowed, though poverty and famine clung to her, has
thought better of it. My fortune's gone, she thinks,
and she goes too. By heaven, I would not have
believed
it! but for this conclusive testimony, though a
cloud of angels had borne evidence to the fact. Fool,
fool! thrice fooled! O! what a dream of happiness
has melted from my anticipation. This delicate
flower had the serpent in itnot taken to my bosom
yet, thoughnot taken to my bosomyet for better
and for worse. Well, though they thinkthey must
have done itit could not have been of her own
heart;but what is the heart worth that so yields
though they think I have lost my pelf, they shall find
I have not lost my pride.
Agained Pinckney perused Fanny's note, and,
seating
himself at the table, he hastily wrote the
following
reply:
Mr. Pinckney's compliments to Miss Fitzhurst,
with the acknowledgment of the return of `the
presents and letters she had received from Mr.
Pinckney
.'
Mr. P. returns Miss Fitzhurst's, and asks no
acknowledgment of their reception. While Mr.
Pinckney congratulates himself that his supposed loss
of fortune has shown him the mercenary notices of
those whom he supposed above all such influences,
and with whom he was on the eve of forming so close
an alliance, he regrets poignantly that the facts will
go far to destroy his belief in any human being's
disinterestedness
.
In justice to himself, Mr. Pinckney
must say that such motives as he has alluded to were
as alien to his heart as he supposed them alien to Miss
Fitzhurst's. Mr. Pinckney re-echoes Miss Fitzhurst's
remark, that should Mr. P. and Miss Fitzhurst ever
meet it must be on the footing of entire strangers.
Mr. P's only regret is, that their original dissimilarity
of character had not kept them strangers.
Fanny herself did not make up her package half
so quick as Pinckney, or order her servant to take it
to the post-office, with half the determination with
which he despatched his on a similar errand.
Again he strode his room, with something almost
of fierceness in his eye, like one who has retaliated
upon an enemy. Strange this balked love is! and
how in the human heart the flower it most nurtured,
will, under some overwhelming influence, seemingly
turn to the deadly Upas.
Then he reflected how he should revenge himself
further, and almost made up his mind that he would
instantaneously return to , and offer himself to
Miss Atherton. Such revenge is often takenif that
can be called revenge, which is the certain proof that
the unwedded is the beloved one.
This reflection brought to mind Langdale's
attentions
to Miss Atherton, and it occurred to him to
peruse the letter which he had received from his
friend. He did so, and was somewhat surprised at
its contents, which ran thus:
My Dear Pinckney
:
I mean to make this bulletin short: the agony is
over with me; my resolutions have suffered a
complete
Waterloo defeat. I am caught at last. I have
determined to become Benedict the married man.
Like him, I mean to laugh at all those who laugh at
me. Congratulate me, my friendMiss Atherton
has consented to draw closer, and make indissoluble
the bonds of relationship already existing between us.
Your letter of the day before yesterday informed
me that you would be here next Monday; on the
following
Wednesday, I propose to lead my fair cousin
to the altar, and I expect you to do me the honor of
officiating as my groomsman. When we bachelors
are caught, we speed the hours to make up for lost
time. As you see, I shall be married before you, and
I wont tell you what a happy man I am, for fear that
your remembrances of our former conversations
might make you smile; yet I might do so, for we
could then both smile with and at each other.
My fair cousin sends her warmest regards. The
mistress of your heart I have not seen for some days;
I heard yesterday that she was somewhat indisposed.
You hear, doubtless, of each minute as she counts it.
But I tell you this, that love and friendship may both
combine their power to hasten your speed to our city,
and to the greetings of
Your friend,
Richard Langdale
.
Fanny indisposed, said Pinckney, with a return
of tenderness; what can be the matter with her.
Could her friends have forced her to make that
communication
to me? No! let me dismiss her from
my mind; but I will go to this bridal; should she be
there she shall seeaye, and feel how entirely as
strangers we meet. The talk it will make! I thought
Langdale was coming to this. I wonder if she loves
him; not a whit, I fear. She's a splendid creature.
I should say that I am victimised all round the
compass
,but
I'll to the bridalas groomsman. When
shall I be a groom? Neverby God, I hope never!
Pinckney rung for his servant, and desired him to
learn when the conveyance departed for Langdale's
city; and at the very moment he made his last
remark
of never being a groom, if his heart had spoken
as loudly as his lips, it would have developed the fact
that he wanted a good excuse to be near Fanny, if
only to show her, he said to himself, feeling
self-detected
by the emotion, how entirely as a stranger I
shall act towards her.
Here his servant entered, and announced the fact
that in half an hour the steamboat would start.
Pinckney ordered him immediately to get his
baggage
in readiness, and to proceed with it to the boat
but he scarcely had issued the order ere he
countermanded
it.
She'll be certain that I want an explanation, he
said to himself, if I go. What if she does, she'll
soon be mistaken; she'll find that I am to be
Langdale's
groomsman. I goI go. Indisposedshe
may not be in the city at all. What can trouble. I
don't care what troubles her; I'll go.
And with this misanthropical reflection he hurried
his servant off with his baggage, wrote a hasty note
to Mateman, requesting him to follow, and leaping
into a hack desired the driver to hurry, for fear he
might be left behind.
CHAPTER XVIII.
And
the sacrificeSarah Grattan had consented
to that self-sacrifice to which the immolation of the
Hindoo woman on the funeral pile of her dead lord
is as an hour's suffering to a life-long torture. She
lived to save her uncle; but for that she would have
died ere she could have consented to be the wife of
Bronson. O! what a life of unmitigated
wretchedness
such a woman leads linked to such a man!
Hourly she blushes at his manner, appearance, and
character, when in society. Hourly, when alone
with him, how she shrinks from that wanton
disregard
to her feelings, that downright brutality, which
even his moments of fondness exhibits; and if she
becomes a mother, what must her emotions be, bound
as she is by the strong tie of holy nature to her child,
to see reflected in his features and conduct the
character
of such a father! Yet, alas! how many
women
do we see daily in society who are such
sufferers
!
victims to parental authority at the shrine of
wealth! Martyrs who, with an upheld hope, endure
to the last, and tell not even unto a mother what they
endure! The pallid cheek, the wan temple, the
drooping eye, speak the fact for them to an observer,
while ninety-nine out of a hundred remark; 'tis
a pity Mrs. So-and-So has such delicate health.
What a fine house she has, everything that heart can
wish. At that very time, too, to add to and heighten
the gloom of her loveless home, maybe with a Christian's
faith, she is praying for strength to overcome some
blighted affection from which she was torn to be
made a living sacrifice.
Sarah's uncle had scarcely left her apartment,
after extorting her promise to marry Bronson on the
morrow, when Aunt Agnes entered. She was in fact
met on the steps by Elwood, who had rushed down
stairs to call the servants to the assistance of his
neice. He jerked his hat over his eyes, told Agnes
that Sarah had fainted, and implored her to hasten
to her room.
It was with great difficulty that she succeeded in
restoring her charge to consciousness; when she had
done so, she insisted upon knowing from Sarah what
had troubled her.
My dear auntyI am sicksick; I would I were
dead. God forgive me for saying so, said Sarah,
reverently throwing her wan eyes upwards.
My child, said Agnes, it is the sorrow of the
heart that ails youI know it all. Your uncle has
told you Bronson's threat, and you have promised to
marry him.
Merciful Father, Aunt Agnes! exclaimed Sarah,
starting from her pillow, you will not betray my
uncle. Maybe I can learn to liketo like
Child, child! said Agnes, interrupting her, and
taking her hand, speak notfrom your kindness
and affection to those who do not deserve it at your
handsspeak not a falsehood. My beloved child! I
would willingly lay down this aged body in the grave
to serve you. How shall I do it; I was in the clump
of trees by the barnI overheard their whole
conversation
.
Bronson is a more evil man than your
uncle. I expected this result; I would have stepped
VOL. II.17
forth to them, and threatened them both with the
law, but I feared they might make way with you, and
compel you, where you had no friends, to this marriage,
which must not be.
Here Aunt Agnes recounted circumstantially to
Sarah the interview between her uncle and Bronson,
which, from the clump of trees near by, in which she
had stopped to rest herself on a visit to Sarah, she
had distinctly overheard. Sarah buried her head in
her pillow, and wept when Aunt Agnes told what
passed between them with regard to herself and
Sidney.
Tell me, child, said Aunt Agnes, when she had
concluded her narrativeI speak franklyis there
any affection existing between Sidney Fitzhurst and
yourself.
Not that I know of, faltered Sarah.
Not that you know of, said Aunt Agnes,
reproachfully
;
do you not know that you love him,
child?
Aunt Agnes, Aunt Agnes! what avails either the
question or the answer?what avails it?
Child, does he not love you? Do you not know
it?
Know itno, no! I thought he liked me once,
butbut
But what, speak to me, child; I feel for you as
much as the mother that bare you could feel, were
she by your side.
He is to marry Miss Moreland.
And must it be, said Agnes, half in soliloquy,
even my fate to see those who were born for each
other separated, and by such cruel circumstances
Where is Sidney, child?
He went on a visit with Miss Moreland to see
her friendsmay be to Philadelphiaprevious, I
suppose
,
to their marriage.
I am surprised at thissurprised! exclaimed
Aunt Agnes; I had other thoughts; but, child, you
must not be made a sacrifice to this Bronson.
Dear, Aunt Agnes, say no more about it. I would
not be made a sacrifice, but to save my uncleI
have none to care for me but you; those whom I
thought cared for me are indifferent to me; my
life must be short and miserable, at least it is not in the
power of mortal now to make it otherwise. O! my
dear Aunt Agnes, pray for me, ask the great God of
his mercy to give me strength to bear my bitter
destiny.
Child, the ways of God are just, though
inscrutable
to us. My poor, poor, Sarah, she continued,
parting the hair from the pale brow of the sufferer;
when I have held you in these arms a little infant;
how many scenes of happiness have I painted for you;
how full of sunshine I made your pathway of life, and
does it end in thisit must not be; my faith is, that
the righteous even here shall escape the snare of the
sinner; but, child, I must leave youI will be back
to-night.
Aunt Agnes, said Sarah, with firmness, do
nothing in your love for me to injure my uncle. I
have nothing to live for: a few weeks ago I thought
the world all brightness before mebut now I have
nothing to live for. My frail frame cannot hold out
this struggle longlet me save my uncle and die. I
am most miserable. The pang here, said she,
putting her hand on her heart, my marriage with
Mr. Bronson can neither increase nor cure. May be
I shall feel some relief in marrying him, from the
conviction
that I have saved my uncle.
Aunt Agnes gazed on her charge with melancholy
earnestness, and, repeating that she would be back by
night, she left the chamber and the house.
With a step, to which the energy of her purposes
gave an elasticity and firmness beyond her years,
Aunt Agnes hastened to Springdale, and to the store
of Bronson. She found that individual in, behind his
counter, dealing flattery on a bumpkin customer by
wholesale, for the purpose of getting a retail profit of
a sixpence out of him in the sale of a bit of ribbon
for his sweetheart. Bronson knew that his customer
was to be married, and his own approaching nuptials
made him eloquent in praise of the articles which
were intended for the bride.
Bronson's clerk was not in, and Aunt Agnes took
a seat, and observed Bronson with a searching eye
until the customer was served and had departed; she
then, in reply to his question of what she would have,
asked:
Mr. Bronson, are you to marry Sarah?
Sarah! re-echoed Bronson, rubbing his hands,
and taking the old woman's visit for one of
congratulation
,
with the intention of coaxing a present out of
him, he continued: I think, Mistress Agnes, that
you might have saidit would have been more
respectful
Miss
Grattan. Yes, it's my intention to
make her Mrs. Bronson. These are horrible times
not times for a man to get marriedprofits all swamped
in lossesbut her uncle insisted upon itand, I
suppose
ha!
ha! you were young once, Mistress
Agnesyou understand these matters. I suppose
the truth was she prompted him.
She prompted him! said Agnes, scarcely able
to control her indignation, but what, Mr. Bronson,
if she did not prompt him?
That, Mistress Agnes, I shall not readily believe.
What did you come here for, old woman? replied
Bronson, regarding her sternly.
To appeal to you as a man; and to tell you that
your marriage with Sarah would be the death of
her.
The death of her! ladies don't die so easily, old
woman. You're hereI see ityou're here from
that young aristocrat, Sidney Fitzhurstthat
sabbath-breaker
and race-ground lounger. He, nor no power
on earth or elsewherethe Lord forgive me, I mean
out of heavencan prevent my marrying her. So,
go back and tell him it won't do. Fine feathers make
fine birds, but fine birds don't always have the best
nests. Ha! ha! tell him that, old woman. I have
seen Elwoodhe has seen his neiceshe fixed upon
to-morrow morning nine o'clock. I should have set
the evening, and had a brilliant party of itbut her
coyness preferred private marriage.
A private marriage! exclaimed Aunt Agnes,
rising to her feet; I'll bear it no longeryou foul
disgrace to humanity, do you know that I know the
whole plot between you and Elwood to sacrifice my
Sarah. You think, or you pretend to think, that you
can give him to the gibbet for the slaying of Jessee.
I believe that I can marry you, not privately, but
publicly, to the penitentiary.
Me! exclaimed Bronson, in great terror.
Mistress
AgnesI don't understand you, my dear
Madam
you
jest.
There is no jest about in it, sir. I overheard the
whole conversation behind the barn between you
and Mr. Elwood: the threats you used to make him
compel Sarah Grattan to marry you. The whole of
itevery word. If he is a murderer, you are the
secreter of a murderer; for money, extorted money.
More than that; my house is by the old milllonely,
but in that lonely place there has been transactions
with counterfeiters, if I mistake not. I have come
to play the game with you, which you played with
17*
Mr. Elwood. My silence is purchased upon the
promise
that you see Sarah Grattan no more.
Take a seat, my good madam, take a seat, said
Bronson, in desperate alarm.
No; I have other duties to perform, and this one
is first and peremptory. Make the promise, or I go
instantaneously before a squire, and make oath to all
I know.
What do you know? what do you know? said
Bronson. Let's walk down through the village to
the common. I'll lock my door and go with you.
Unnecessary trouble, Mr. Bronson; I would not
trust my life there with you. Do you promise that,
to-morrow you will not go near Sarah Grattan, nor
speak to her of marriage again? Man, I am not to
be trifled with, and have other business.
IImy dear madam, I will; but stop a
moment
.
See that you keep your promise, then, said
Agnes
.
I shall not stop another moment.
So speaking, Aunt Agnes left Bronson to his own
reflections; and before he could get round his
counter
to gaze after her, with the uncertainty of a guilty
mind as to what his purpose was, she had
disappeared
behind a corner dwelling, on her way to
Holly.
Fanny had but a few hours before received
Pinckney's
communication. She was stung to the quick,
to think that Pinckney attributed her dismissal of
him to his imputed loss of fortune; while the
conviction
that she had acted too hastily, and the reproaches
of her own wounded affections, were daily growing
stronger from the hour she hurried off her servant to
the post-office from Langdale's.
What, said she, in this frame of mind, what
had his writing to Miss Atherton, a long time ago,
when he was so young, to do with his affection for
me? It had nothing to do with his heart, or his
characternothing to do with the love I bear him,
which I cannotI cannot conquer. Petted, and
petted all my lifeto what wretchedness it has
brought me. And then to think that he should
attribute my conduct to his loss of fortune. He had
nothing else to attribute it tonothing else. I am
degraded
in his estimationfor ever degraded. What
slaves this self-will makes of us. Here's father, and
aunt too, asking me so many torturing questions
about Howardabout Mr. Pinckneyit's Howard
no longer. I wish I could let him knowthough we
should never meet again on earthI wish I could let
him know that his loss of fortune had nothing to do
with it. How meanly he must think of me; and
what else can he think.
Pompey interrupted the sad reflections of his young
mistress, by announcing to her that Aunt Agnes had
called to see her.
Bring her up into my chamber, Pompey, said
Fanny, rising from a low stool, on which she had
been seated, and mechanically adjusting her hair
and dress.
Child, said Aunt Agnes, entering the room, and
taking Fanny's hand; you look pale, too; what
has come over you girls?
Pale! do I? said Fanny, starting; I'm very well
no, I'm not very well. Aunty, I have been
thinking
of Jane Lovell's story, and it makes me sad.
What should make you think of that, child?
I know not. We can't account for our thoughts
always, replied Fanny.
Your lover's away; that's it, child, rejoined
Agnes. And now I'll give you a piece of advice:
avoid the first impulse of wounded feeling, which may
lead you to mistrust either the affection or the
conduct
of your lover or your husband. It may estrange
you from each other before you know it. And, dear,
act always with confidence and frankness towards
those, and, especially, towards
him
you love. The
little deceptionsharmless coquetry, as it is called
which women sometimes practice towards their
lovers, has made many a love story a sad one.
Aunty, exclaimed Fanny, in a surprised tone,
why do you particularly give me such advice?
Because, child, I have observed your character,
and think it necessary.
Not the last part. I wish my dearest, dearest
brother
would come home, replied Fanny; I can sit on
his knee, and tell him everythingall my troubles.
It was he that I wished to see, said Aunt
Agnes
,
when will he be here?
We expect him every moment: he has been
detained
longer than he anticipated. That puts me in
mind of a letter that I should attend toreally I have
neglected his requests. Aunty, you stay. O! how
is Sarah?
Sad, child; sad: why don't you call and see
her?
I have been sad myself: and I thought, as I had
been in town sometime, that Sarah should call and
see me first. It was foolish in me, but
Well, child, it was foolish, as you saycall and
see her to-morrow, and I will see you both there. It
is getting dark, and I must go.
No, aunty; stay all night.
I cannot, my dear, I promised Sarah to be back.
To-morrow, remember, my child.
I will. Do, aunty, send Pompey to me.
So speaking, Fanny shook hands with the old
woman
,
and she withdrew.
Pompey made his appearance; and, writing a
hasty note to Sarah, she enclosed within it a letter,
and bade Pompey mount a horse, instantly, and bear
it to Mr. Elwood's.
CHAPTER XIX.
Aunt
Agnes stopped more than half an hour below
stairs, after she left Fanny, talking with Peggy
Gammon
,
who, with her Cousin Bobby, had been since
the death of their grandmother inmates of Holly.
When she left Peggy the night had set in, which
was nothing to her who had traversed the spot and
neighbourhood so often, and furthermore it was a
bright evening. With her mind absorbed in interest
for Sarah she took her way to Elwood's. She had
not advanced more than a quarter of a mile when
she was overtaken by Bobby, who, as fast as his
lameness would admit, come hastening breathless to
her side.
Good-night, Aunt Agnes, said Bobby, as he
limped up to her. Cousin Peggy sent me after you
to be company home for you.
Bobby, that was not necessary; I have walked
these woods at all times. My boy, go back again;
with your lameness it must fatigue you.
Indeed, it don't, said Bobby, quickly. Aunty,
what did you tell me that for; I have been gunning
through the woods all the afternoon, and I don't feel
tired at all.
Bobby, I spoke in good feeling towards you, my
boy. I'm always fond of company. Did you get
much game?
Yes, aunty, considerableeight quails and two
rabbits, and only missed two shotsyes, an' I saw a
big bird, he, he! that I like to ha' shot one dayand
he don't like me nor Cousin Peggy neither.
Who's that Robert; no mischief, I hope?
No, aunty; it was only Mr. Bronson, who told
granny once about my laughing in meeting. I saw
him skulking round Mr. Elwood's just about dark.
He's brooding some deviltry, I'll bet.
Skulking about Mr. Elwood's! Did you speak to
him?
O, yes! we spoke together, an' he soft-soaped
me considerable; an' advised me to go home 'cause
the night dewshe, he, he! might harm me.
What else did he say?
I overheard him tell Tom, who was just going
home from wood-chopping, to tell his master that he
wanted to see him there. I stopped behind a tree to
fix my gun, an' he thought I had gone ahead.
I wonder, said Aunt Agnes, when Sidney
Fitzhurst
will be home.
Home! he's just come as I left thereI just had
time to shake hands with him, and hurry after you,
aunty.
Then, child! exclaimed Agnes, we will turn
back.
She accordingly returned, speaking not a word to
Bobby except an occasional yes, or no, in answer to
him, which were more than once misplaced.
Without any ceremony Aunt Agnes entered the
room where Sidney sat with his sister on his knee,
and his father and aunt beside him, welcoming him
home.
Mr. Sidney! exclaimed Agnes, with deep
emotion
,
do you feel an interest in Sarah Grattan.
Startled by her manner, Sidney looked earnestly
at her, and replied:
Yes, Aunt Agnesthe deepest interest.
Then fly and save her! There is a plot between
Elwood, her uncle, and Bronson, to compel her to
marry Bronson.
Impossible! exclaimed Sidney, gently, but
quickly
removing Fanny from his knee, and springing to his
feet.
Far, far, from impossible! exclaimed Agnes,
Sarah thinks you feel no interest in herand to save
her uncle from the consequence of disclosures which
Bronson can make, and from perjuries which he will
dare, she has been forced to consent to marry
Bronson
.
Young man, if you love her, fly
now
to Elwood's
and save her.
Love her! screamed Miss Rachellina; think
of our family.
Son! ejaculated Mr. Fitzhurstbut it was of
no availSidney sprung to the door, seized his hat,
and in a minute more was speeding to Elwood's as
fast as steed could bear him.
Bobby's remark was true. Bronson was indeed
after some deviltry. When Agnes left his store he
awaited most impatiently the return of his clerk, to
whom he stated that business would probably prevent
his returning that day, and if any one enquired for
him, to say that he had gone to the city. He
accordingly
left his store, and went directly to Elwood's,
but, instead of entering the house, he lurked about in
the confines of the woods until he saw Tom, whom
he ordered, as Bobby stated, to tell his master that he
wanted to see him.
It was sometime before Elwood joined Bronson;
his guilty fears, after an internal resistance, at last
predominated, and he sought him in the woods.
Ah, my friend! said Bronson, with great
effected
cordiality, advancing to meet Elwood, I sent for
you on this matter of which we discoursed this
morning
to
have a little private talk with you. Despatch
is the wordyour neice has consented, hey?
Yes, replied Elwood, to-morrow.
I knew she would. You have a great influence
over her, and you ought to havebut despatch is the
word. Now, while she's just thinking of itnow,
we'll send Tom for Squire Norris, and have the
matter
ended at once. I've business that will take me
away to-morrow, and I wish to make all square and
right before I go.
Elwood stammered out something about his neice
not being well; but Bronson replied she might be
worse to-morrow, and that he had made up his mind
to marry her that night. Elwood then reluctantly
led the way to the house. Bronson stopped suddenly,
and asked:
Is that old woman, Agnes, there?
No, said Elwood.
Ay, that's rightshe is an old hagand must
be kept away; we must see to that.
On arriving at the house Elwood went to Sarah's
chamber, and communicated to her his interview with
Bronson, and implored her to yield to his wishes.
Stupified, Sarah could say nothing. Taking the
silence for the consent, Elwood told her that he would
send for the squire who could perform, according to
law, the ceremony as well as a clergyman. He then
withdrew, and despatched Tom to the village for the
magistrate, after which he joined Bronson, who acted
the amiable with all his might, but whose restless
impatience would not let him sit still a moment.
When her uncle left her, Sarah sat motionless, and
as if unconscious of her own existence. On her
maid's entering with Fanny's letter, which Pompey
had brought, she started up, and glared at her
wildly
,
and then laughed hysterically, as she received it.
Sarah tore open the note: Fanny asked her to
VOL. II.18
come and see her, and stated that the enclosed she
had received from her brother the day before, with
the request that it should be handed to Sarah
immediately
.
Fanny further said, that by some neglect
or other in the post-office, the letter in which that
was enclosed had been detained some time, and that
it was only by accident she got it by her aunt's seeing
it among the list of advertised letters.
A flash of unutterable joy broke over Sarah's
features as she opened and glanced over Sidney's
letter. It was a declaration of the most ardent and
devoted attachment, expressed with all the fervor of
his noble and manly heart. He said that,
contrasting
her with the fashionable worldlings around him,
he felt impelled to write to her, and say what she had
no doubt seen, in his manner, when they were together,
that he loved her with his whole soul. He trusted
she was not entirely indifferent to him; and he
begged
her, if she was not, to write to him instantly and
cure the disquietude of mind which he could not but
feel in the loss of her society. He said she was the
only woman he had ever loved, and all he asked,
was to devote his life to her.
Wildly Sarah pressed the letter to her lips, while
tears of love and joy and pride fell thick and fast
upon it. She read it again and again; and, when
night closed around her, she placed it in her bosom,
and forgot all else but that it was there, and that he
who wrote it was still closer.
These emotions, which so few are capable of
feeling
in their intensity, were interrupted by the entrance
of a servant, who said that her uncle wished her to
come down stairs. Without hesitating a moment
Sarah complied.
As she entered the room where her uncle and
Bronson sat together, timidity, which was her greatest
characteristic, seemed entirely to have left her.
There was a dignity in her manner, and a something
in her eye, that startled both of them.
Bronson rose with the evident intention of offering
her his hand, but Sarah folded her arms, and,
looking
towards Elwood, said:
Well, uncle?
Niece, said Elwood, without the capability of
lifting his eye from the carpet, I have sent for you
that we might all speak together of your marriage
with our friend here.
That, uncle, can never be!
Never be! ejaculated Elwood, glancing at
Bronson
,
who eyed him like a beast of prey.
Never be, uncle! When no one's happiness but
my own, as I thought, was to be involved in this
connexion
,
I yielded for your sake, but with the
conviction
that I could not long survive it. I was willing
to die to save you from the cupidity of this man. I
will give him whatever title I may have to any
property
to be silent, but my handnever.
I see it! ejaculated Bronson, almost choked with
rage; that Pompey has brought some message from
that fellow Fitzhurst.
Is that true, niece?
Uncle, you have a right to an answer: it is
true.
I knew it, by God! shouted Bronson, in the agony
of his rage, forgetful of his violation of the
commandment
.
Has he made love to you, Sarah? A blush of
the deepest crimson mantled, for a moment, the pale
cheek and brow of Sarah Grattan ere she replied:
He has, uncle. I knew not his regard for me
until this hour, though I have loved him long. Not to
save any one from the consequences of their rash
impulses
have I a right to do such irrevocable violence
to his confidence and affection as marry this man
for, O, God! exclaimed Sarah, with an emotion
which she could not control, if he knew but half my
love, no earthly consideration could induce him so to
crush me in heart and hope forever and forever.
I know it allallSarah! exclaimed Sidney
Fitzhurst, springing into the room, and folding her to
his heart. Sarah uttered a faint cry of joy, and fell
lifeless in her lover's arms. Sidney bore his gentle
burden to the sofa, and, while he was doing all he
could to reinstate her, Bronson touched Elwood on
the shoulder, and they stole out of the house
together
.
18*
CHAPTER XX.
Gordon's
wife, Catharine, was, shortly after her
visit to Miss Atherton, instituted as her maid. Miss
Atherton had formed an attachment for her, which
arose in some measure from some slight similarity of
character which had once existed between them.
Now it was no longer apparent, for Catharine's love
for Gordon and long consequent suffering had
entirely
erased the spirit of coquetry and love of
dominion
which had once possessed her.
Happy in abundant spirits, and, in her situation near
one she loved and respected, Catharine was wont to
assist at her mistress's toilet, which she delighted to
expatiate
upon the number of the lady's triumphs to a
not unpleased ear. While Miss Atherton was not
averse to the recital of her own conquests, it pleased
her to draw forth her maid upon her own, and, in
this way, she learned the depth of Catharine's
affection
for Gordon.
After Gordon married Catharine she left the
service
of Miss Atherton, and the narrative which she
gave her of her leaving Europe and finding Gordon
in the United States, is precisely as it occurred.
Miss Atherton had not been forgetful of her promise
to Catharine. She got Langdale to employ Mr.
Mason in his casethat gentleman, however,
remarking
in the spirit of candour, that he did not believe
that any professional service, whatever, would be of
any avail in rescuing him from what he could not but
say would be merited punishment.
Miss Atherton told Catharine what Mason said,
but it only increased her sadness of spirits, and she
begged her mistress to suffer her to see Gordon. To
this Miss Atherton reluctantly consented, and
Catharine
took a seat in a stage which went to Springdale
every other day promising to return with it.
Catharine's feelings were so absorbed in her interest
for Gordon that she noticed nothing on her way,
except
the lagging paces of the horses up the rough
unpaved
hills. She bore a letter from Mr. Mason to
the sheriff, requesting him to admit her to the cell of
Gordon. She found an immense concourse of people
in Springdale who had convened for the purpose of
holding a political meeting. With great difficulty, in
the afternoon she gained the ear of the sheriff, who
had given orders, on learning that Bronson had visited
Gordon, to admit no one to him without his written
permit. Bearing the mandate of the executive officer
of the law, she repaired to the prison door whence she
had been roughly driven by Pike, and on showing
him the sheriff's order, was most graciously
admitted
.
Pike's domestic cares restrained his garrulity; and,
opening the cell of Gordon just sufficiently for
Catharine
to enter, without saying a word he turned the
keys on her, and hastened to the side of his wife.
Gordon lay upon his mattrass on his prison floor in
a state of partial intoxication. Through the window
where Bobby had conversed with Pompey, as our
readers may remember when his grandmother's
funeral went by, an accomplice, Tom Fenton, who
had secreted himself in the woods, and who had been
met by Bronson on his visit to Elwood, and informed
of Gordon's situation, had conveyed to him brandy,
and tools wherewith to effect his escape. Fenton
was induced to do this at great risk to himself, from
the fear that Gordon would inform upon them; and
from the fact that he was without any of their booty
himself and was entirely destitute, and with the hope that
through Gordon he might be supplied. Bronson had
given him a few dollars, pretending it was a
charitable
relief, though they both understood each other
and that the money was in aid of Gordon's escape.
Gordon's stillness since he had obtained the liquor
had induced Pike to believe that he had become more
reconciled to his situation, which made the jailor less
wary. Instead, however, of instantly setting about
preparing the means of escaping, Gordon, as soon as
the brandy was given him, drank deeply, and had
been partially intoxicated ever since.
As Gordon lay in drunken sensuality in a dark
corner of his cell, his wife could not see him, owing
to the contrast of the little light within to the glare
without which she had just left. Several times she
ejaculated
:
John! dear John! before she spoke to him.
He had observed her, however, from the first; and
had his eye fixed on her in sullen anger.
Come at last, have you? he growled out,
raising
himself upon his arm, and frowning on her with a
ferocious stare.
John, I came as soon as I could. How are you,
Johndear John, aint you well.
Well; by God! Do you expect a man to be well
here? have you got any money?
Yes, John; here's five dollars.
Is it counterfeit?
No, John; no.
Then give it to me. I'll have no counterfeits;
you've ruined me by counterfeits. That's the way
Ross got me.
John, Mr. Mason, the lawyer, will attend to your
case. I've seen him and talked to him about you.
Ha! will hethat's right; ask him to come and
see me.
I think, John, she continued; that I can interest
Mr. Pinckney for you, too.
Blast him! exclaimed Gordon; come closer
let me whisper to you.
Catharine submissively took a seat by Gordon on
the edge of his mattrass.
He's the chap, if you must know it, who had my
twin brother punished for robbing himmy twin
brotherhe just made him deliver in the streets one
nightnever touched a hair of his headbut, no
matter
,
I'll do for him yet if I get out of this scrape.
Yes, John; and was that the reason? replied
Catharine, that you made me take his likeness from
Miss Clara.
No; I got that for that Italian woman who loved
him; she paid me well for it, but what's it to you.
What about the locket, hey?
Nothing, John, nothing; I thought I'd ask you.
I think Miss Clara Atherton would do something for
you, too, John.
Would she, ah! do you think she would?
exclaimed
the prisoner, eagerly catching at the thought.
Tell meI know it, she's privately married to Mr.
Ashley, she ran off to this country; she don't want it
known, hey?
Never, John; never! exclaimed Catharine.
I heard so, rejoined Gordon; I called to see her
to sell a horse to her, and meant to talk round, but
she seemed not to know what to make of me, and I
left her. Think she will help me? There was
something
wrong there.
Mr. Ashley fought with another gentleman on
her account, and was killed, that's all, John; but,
John, I wish, O! I do wish, that you could get out of
this. She says
You've seen her? said Gordon, in a low,
compressed
tone.
I have, John.
What did she say? he replied, in manner meant
to be insinuating.
Why, JohnO God! but I'll tell the truththat Mr.
Mason says there's not much chance for you, John
but there is, there is; I'll see them all, and beg for
youcourt, jury, all.
No chance! where do you live? you're dressed
well; see how I look. Where do you live?
I live with Miss Clara, John, replied his wife,
in a deprecating tone, alarmed at the angry
earnestness
with which he asked his questions.
Live with her, and she my enemy; and I here!
he exclaimed, grasping her wrist with manacled
hands, and maddened with drunkenness and rage.
John, she said, imploringly, in a low voice, do
me no wrong here, it will only injure you. John;
they'll know it, it will make your case worse.
Worse! you have betrayed me; you told your
Miss Clara about the locket.
John, but it was for your sake.
Ha! for my sake, my sake! he muttered, pressing
her to the floor with his hand upon her throat.
John, when, O God! don't kill me, John. II!
helpIfor the love of mercy.
As Catharine ejaculated her mortal terror, Gordon
pressed her throat the tighter; the fear that she would
be overheard giving vigor to his revenge.
She gathered her whole strength, and succeeded
in disengaging his hand from her throat:
John, this is not hanging matter, this
counterfeiting
you may escape if you don't murder me, John.
As she spoke she half arose, and got her body from
the bed. He seized her at this instant by the arm,
and jerked her down with such violence as to strike
her head with stunning force upon the floor.
Gnashing
his teeth with demoniac hate, and with a
momentary
supernatural strength, arising from his fury and
the brandy he had swallowed, he twisted the
ironbar
which joined together the manacles on his wrists
round her throat, and, palzied by the effort, fell
prostrate
by her side.
The scene of that horrible night, when, in his
excited
fancy, he sold himself to the evil one, now
revived like a fearful reality in the brain of Gordon,
and he heard Ross laugh, and the tempter claim him.
In accents almost inarticulate from intoxication and
guilt, he called on his wife again and again to look
at him and smile; and he tried to loosen the bar from
her throat, and he begged her to pray for him; and
he put his ear to her lips, and heard no voice, and felt
no breath. Cursing her again, he twisted the bar
closer, and sank senseless on her bosom; that bosom
which had always cherished him, and where he lay
her murderer.
CHAPTER XXI.
The
cry rang through the streets of Springdale
just as the sun was settingso different a setting sun
to the twothat Gordon had murdered his
unoffending
and confiding wife.
The crowd forgot their excited talk of politics, and
rushed in wild horror to the jail. The sea of heads
around moved like the waves when the storm strikes
them.
Lynch him! Lynch him! was the shout from a
thousand turbulent voices.
The cry for summary justice reached the appalled
prisoner in his cell. Pike, not without calling in
assistance
,
had succeeded in freeing the throat of the
woman from the twisted bar of the manacles which
bound it closer than a halter: she was stone dead;
for it was more than an hour after Pike locked her in
that fatal apartment ere he returned. A coroner's
inquest had been instantly summoned, and the verdict
was:Wilful murder against Gordon.
Gordon begged Pike, who stood beside him as the
crowd gathered, swarmed, and shouted without, to let
him see the body of his wife.
She's not dead! he exclaimed; they can't
prove it on me; let me see her.
She's as certainly dead as you are certain to be
damned, said Pike, or hanged; an' that you'll be
without judge or jury.
They dare not; they dare not! said Gordon,
covering his head in his bed-clothes, to shut from his
senses the loud cry of Lynch him! which now, in
accumulated wildness and strengthening purpose, rung
forth on the ear of night, and over the hitherto
peaceful
village, from the assembled multitude, who had
gathered in dark masses round the jail.
They're breaking in upon us! exclaimed Pike,
frightened at the thundering at the jail doors which
now took place, and the stern demand to give up the
murderer.
Door after door, with steady determination, was
crushed in by the mob. The sheriff had endeavoured
to curb them; but had been hustled off by them with
threats against his life.
I couldn't get out, said Gordon, lifting his head
from the mattrass, how can they get in?
They've got in! shouted Pike, hastily leaving
the prisoner alone. I must look after my family
place or no place. Gordon quailed beneath the
frowning men, who had climbed up to his prison
window, and were scowling at and cursing him.
He called on Pike not to leave him, but in vain.
The crowd, with lighted candles and torches flashing
to and fro over their heads and against the prison
walls, had entered the passage, where they met Pike,
and demanded him to show them the room of the
murderer.
He pointed it out, and, unable to break through
them, crouched in the recess of one of the cell doors.
They pressed past him with the fierce fury of so
many fiends, and entered the cell of the murderer.
Gordon begged them, for mercy's sake, to spare him.
You did not spare her! cried several of them,
seizing him.
VOL. II.19
Ha, Hall! I know you! cried Gordon to the
tavern-keeper, at whose house Ross had arrested
him, and who was trying to win a good name by
Lynching his former comrade; I know youyou're
a
No murderer! shouted Hall, leaping upon him.
Gordon struggled with terrific energy; but, manacled
as he was, he was soon overpowered, and dragged
like a beast into the street.
Here Gordon made a stern struggle; and,
notwithstanding
his fetters, broke loose from the mob. He
sprang at Hall, and with one blow felled him to the
earth; the iron on his wrist fracturing the skull of
his captor. The crowd stood back, frightened by his
desperation. He here saw Robert Gammon, and
putting his feet together, so as to leap with his prison
incumbrances, he made at the boy, who stood
looking
at him in pitynot anger. Bobby stepped aside,
and avoided the blow aimed at him. At this,
Gordon
turned on Hall, and again preparing himself for
a leap, he jumped with all his might on his prostrate
form. At this moment a large stone, thrown by one
of the by-standers, felled Gordon to the earth; but
he recovered himself.
The inflictors of summary justice, at this, gathered
close to him; impelled rather by the crowd around
them, than by their own desires, which, however
blood-thirsty, were rendered for the moment,
powerless
,
by the desperation of their prey. They seemed
like so many hounds, shrinking from the fury of a
stricken tiger. Another missile, hurled at Gordon,
laid him speechless before them. They then seized
him. Some cried out:
Let's hang him on the hustings!
No; exclaimed one of the candidates, who had
made the last speech there, that would degrade the
freedom of elections; and he was about making an
oration over Gordon, like that of Mark Antony over
Csar, though, certainly, not with his intentions, when
Gordon raised himself on his hands and knees, and
the speaker retreated in affright.
Let's burn him! cried out another, a carpenter;
let's burn him on the common: there's plenty of
shavings at my shop!
Unnecessary cruelty! shouted a butcher, knock
him in the head at once, and end the matter.
Gentlemen! protested Squire Norris, who thought
of the fee he should obtain for committing him, rather
than of his offence on the violated majesty of justice,
let the law take it's course: bring him before me,
and I'll commit him fullythere's no bail in these
casesand I'll commit him fully for the murder.
By this time Gordon recovered himself, somewhat,
from the effects of the blow, and flung his hands
wildly around him. Just as he lifted his hands to
wipe away the dust and blood from his face, he was
struck violently with a club. He sprung forward in
the direction of the blow, and uttered so piercing a
cry of mingled despair and rage, that the crowd
recoiled
from him for many feet; while their candles
and torches waved rapidly, and many behind were
prostrated by the recoilers. Gordon now stepped
back, unable to keep his feet, from exhaustion, though
still gazing round on the crowd in horror and hate,
with his face bloody, and his hands raised to protect
his head.
You're doing the very act he has himself
committed
,
cried out a humane individual, trying to
press through the crowd, to the protection of the
murderer. He was, however, jerked violently back
by the more sanguinary.
Don't kill him at once! exclaimed Thompson,
Pompey's old enemy, who had an amateur's love for
the use of the horse-whip upon human flesh, with an
old stager's practice, as each and all of his slaves,
male and female, could testify by the mean exhibition
of their persons, and who was perhaps desirous of
seeing the different effects of the lash upon a white
and black skinDon't kill him at once! strip him
naked, and tie him with his arms round a tree, and
let me operate upon him; I'll whip quickly a full
confession
out of him, or he shall leave his hide behind
him and climb the tree.
Thompson, you'd better clear out! exclaimed
Bobby, to him with a kindling eye, stepping up to his
side; or you may catch what you don't like
yourself
.
Gentlemenmy friends! shouted Thompson;
this boy, Bob Gammon, wants to stay the course of
justicelet's give him a taste of the horse-whipO,
Lord! let me operatelet's take him to my woods
I'll show you.
Do you object? said a man, taking Bobby by
the collar.
I do, said the boy firmly, releasing his gripe.
Do you hear that! exclaimed Thompson,
exultingly
,
he ought to have itjust say the word.
Remember the woods yourself, said a voice
near to him, while the rest were too intent upon their
purposes to hear or heed the byplay. A friend of
Bobby led him away.
Hang the murderer upon the sign post, called
out a friend of Hall's, pointing to that of a tavern
which stood nearby.
You shan't make a gallows of my sign, cried
the publican, attempting to resist the determination
of the crowd, who had assisted with a yell.
Here's a rope! shouted the friend of Hall, who
had once professed friendship for Gordon, and who
feared it might injure himself if he stood passive in
the matter.
In an instant the rope was fastened round Gordon's
neck. Several ineffectual attempts were made by
many persons to throw it over the sign post. At last
a negro boy of thirteen seized the end of it in his teeth
and clambered up with it. He threw it over: hundreds
below sprang to seize it. In a moment more the
body of the murderer was jerked rapidly up, where
it dangled in the night air not two feet from the
likeness
of Washington which formed the sign of the
tavern!!!
THE CONCLUSION.
The
rest of our story is soon told. The awful
death of Catharine produced a powerful effect upon
the character of Miss Atherton. She postponed her
marriage, and gave herself up to remorseful and sad
reflections. It wrought a radical change in her heart.
She abandoned her passion for coquetry, and wrote
Pinckney, who had informed Langdale of his break
with Fanny, the cause of that lady's conduct. True,
however, to the last, to her own pride of character,
she averred that Fanny's sight of his letters was
entirely
accidental. This Fanny believed herself; and
as Pinckney and she were soon reconciled, and more
devoted than ever, she so told him.
Pinckney, true again to his nature, never told Fanny
of the depth of his first lovewhile she believed him
irresistible; and had no doubt that Miss Atherton had
loved him. That lady, whenever she alluded to
Langdale, of her acquaintance with Pinckney abroad,
always treated the matter as if Pinckney had
entertained
a boyish love for her, and that she honoured
him in whim, until she found him serious. Though
these parties were soon married, and live now
intimate
friends, the whole truth of the attachment which
existed between Pinckney and Miss Atherton, has
never been revealed to the lady of the one or the lord
of the other. Langdale esteems himself the happiest
of men, and holds himself entitled now to speak more
knowingly of the sex than ever.
Bronson and Elwood were never heard of definitely
after they left the latter's house together. It was
reported, and believed, that a traveller in Kentucky,
who knew Bronson well, had paid a visit to the
penitentiary
where he recognised him as a convict,
sentenced
upon several indictments for a great number of
years, for passing counterfeit money. A New Orleans
paper contained the other day the description of a
man who was found murdered on the levee of that
city. The description answered to Elwood's. It
was thought he had been successful at the gaming
table, and had been followed out by a ruffian who
murdered and rifled him. What confirmed the
opinion that the corpse was his, was the fact that its
linen bore his initials.
The whole gang of counterfeiters was entirely
broken up by the sagacity of Ross, and the treachery
of Hall's wife, who, by the connivance of her husband,
had informed him of their manuvres. Ross waited
until liberal rewards were offered, before he explored
the cave in the hills, which our readers may
remember
Gordon entered one night. There he detected
most of the gang, who were visited by the law with
a just punishment.
Deep and long was the consultation between Miss
Rachellina and her brother, upon Sidney's
determination
to marry Sarah Grattan. At last they
concluded
that certain branches of her family were
certainly
highly respectable; and that they had better
say not a word in opposition to Sidney's wishes.
Sarah Grattan, therefore, with restored health, soon
gave him her hand, with as noble and gentle a heart
in it as ever throbbed in a woman's bosom.
Miss Rachellina and Miss Bentley were much
perplexed with the case of Robert Gammon and his
cousin. All others were for having them married
immediately. Not so, thought these ladies. Just,
however, as they had come to the decision that they
could not certainly be married
now
, at the instigation
of Sidney Fitzhurst they went before Squire Norris,
attended by Aunt Agnes, and had the knot tied.
Sidney
Fitzhurst established them on a farm, where
Bobby
has become thrifty and industriousPompey, now
too old to drive the carriage, spends much of his time
there, where he loves to officiate as the especial
protector
of a fine boy, of whom Peggy soon made Bobby
the father. He however never fails to make dutiful
reverence to his master each day, and enquire after
his gout, which we are glad to learn is getting
better.
Colonel Bentley has been so fortunate as to obtain
a handsome settlement from his aunt, Miss Amelia
Bentley, which has placed him above her caprices.
As for Miss Bentley and her friend Miss Rachellina,
they have become greater gossips than ever; and they
still persist in declaring, notwithstanding the many
love adventures of which they have latterly had
cognizance
,
that the chivalry of the tender passion is not
what it was even in their short memories.
Aunt Agnes is still living in her little cabin. Sarah
used all her influence to induce her to move to Holly;
but she refused, though she is almost a daily visitor
there.
Thompson was killed by one of his slaves, who
made his escape to Canada. Pinckney has built
himself
a splendid mansion near Langdale's, in the city.
There he spends his winters with his bride when they
are not on a visit to the South. His summers are
spent at Holly. It is rumoured in the literary circles
that a novel, founded upon adventures abroad, which
is soon to appear, is from his pen. Critical gentlemen
who have seen the MS. speak very highly of it.
And now, gentle reader, which of our couples think
you are the happiest? Langdale and Miss Atherton,
Pinckney and Fanny, Sidney and Sarah, or Bobby
and Peggy? Knew I your character I could telland
this much I will say, that your life will be a bright
one, though you were but as happy as the one you
think the least happyI hope it may be happier than
the happiest. How part weas friends? I have
known you but so slightly, and at such long intervals,
that I fear you will not claim me as an acquaintance,
except upon this passing self-introduction, which will
be as soon forgotten by you, and yet, by the light of
my life's hope, I would rather win your smile than
own broad acresparticularly if you are of the sex
called the gentler.
At long intervals, but perchance with more thought
than you will give me credit for, I have penned these
idle pages for your amusement. Sometimes, where
the crescent city New Orleans sits near the great
ocean, amid the things of the voluptuous and the gay
in that glorious city; and, sometimes, where St. Louis
lifts a head that will be the proudest in the west,
and where I have known a hospitality no where more
welcoming. Sometimes, where Louisville, with
Kentucky
chivalry, greets the stranger; and, sometimes,
where queen city, Cincinnati, lords it over the beautiful
Ohio, with law books round me; sometimes, in New
York, the great mother of the empire state; and,
sometimes
here, in the city of Penn, which is neither last
nor least in my affection, and where I write this now,
where I have received a greeting so quiet and kind,
that it seemed like a quaker birthright of which one
cannot
early dispossess themselves; amid all these places,
with more cares upon my head than yearsamidst
much waywardness and as much gaiety, and more
gloom and wildness than I'll tell of, though they're
past, have I attempted to trace for thee a faint
portraiture
of the passions of our race, as we see them in
our daily intercourse.
Hereafter, I trust we shall meet under different and,
on my part, happier auspices. Until then, dear reader,
from my heart of hearts, I bid you an affectionate
adieu.
THE END.